_	Tarrow explains that changes to ICT affect the way that communities deal with contentious politics, which “occurs when ordinary people – often in alliance with more influential citizens and with changes in public mood – join forces in confrontation with elites, authorities, and opponents.”
_	The award was "designed to honor a person who has continued to fight tirelessly on behalf of an environmental issue in the way that Kershner fought for old growth forests."
_	Segwit changed the way that transaction size is calculated, and the corresponding fee calculation.
_	Van Ree's use of the medium is particularly concerned with the way that the black and white image conveys a sense of time and timelessness, and that the contrast of her modern subjects with the temporal associations of the medium is a source of the intriguing qualities of her photographs.
_	We design and construct electronic circuits which function electronically in a manner remarkably similar to the way that lower life-forms function psychologically.
_	SMS hubbing is a new structure for the international flow of SMS between operators, reshaping the way that international mobile inter-operability works by implementing hubs to intermediate the SMS traffic and to offer a larger SMS coverage.
_	Enraged, Moroni throws a vial of acid at Dent, horribly disfiguring his face in the way that visibly depicts his eventual identity as the insane gangster Two-Face, who eventually shoots Moroni dead and then surrenders and goes to prison.
_	Pupils in the school help to influence the way that the school is moving through the pupil council.
_	Social inhibitions generally act to control or affect the way that one conducts themselves in a social setting.
_	Cleary gives some examples of the way that the text was commonly misinterpreted by Wilhelm and Jung, and describes such an instance in the very beginning of the text:
_	However, it is becoming more popular for them to run as a generic process akin to the way that RDBMSs behave.
_	The museum's name is derived from the way that the port identified each of its sheds.
_	One of the main differences is in the way that word-initial vowels are written.
_	According to Adam Garfinkle what Keith, Shaftesbury, Blackstone, Stoddard and the other nineteenth century Christians who used this phrase were saying was that the Holy Land was not the seat of a nation in the way that Japan is the land of the Japanese and Denmark is the land of the Danes.
_	There are concerns that personal information put into the website may not be secure in the way that users expect: on January 24, 2015 Kevin Counihan, the C.E.O. of Healthcare.gov, addressed concerns about privacy on the federal website.
_	The club want to try some players on trial in the meantime but this is not the way that I work.
_	The UK Green Building Council (UKGBC) is a United Kingdom membership organisation, formed in 2007, which aims to 'radically transform' the way that the built environment in the UK is planned, designed, constructed, maintained and operated.
_	This theory states that groups of animals moving in a fluid environment may save energy when swimming or flying together, much in the way that bicyclists may draft one another in a peloton.
_	Yorkshire was not a homogeneous natural or topographical area and the contrasting conditions and natural resources led to differences in the way that the different areas of the county developed over time.
_	The most common form of migration is the way that heavy small gauge earrings will migrate downwards out of the earlobe, as is common in older women who have worn earrings most of their lives.
_	Abilities allow the player to customize the way that they would like to play in battle.
_	One crucial reason is that Premier League clubs are not willing to trust in local youth in the way that other countries do".
_	The model also differs from traditional solutions in the way that data exchange occurs in the case of interacting programs.
_	Philip Sherburne of Pitchfork Media commented that "it's the way that Butler and his collaborators mold formalist fidelity into something stranger that makes the track really sing," and that the "chords give it the quality of an exploding rainbow."
_	O'Keeffe has said that she made the paintings to reflect the way that she saw flowers.
_	Denis is well known for the way that she combines history with personal history, giving her films an autobiographical element.
_	Armstrong said: "on the run of doing those two pilots we really created the show in the way that you couldn't if you hadn't tried it out."
_	Alain Silver compared the style of the film to those directed by Ken Russell, based on the way that the films incorporate the supernatural, psychology, and sexual imagery.
_	The story is one of Kipling's essays into farcical humour – with his frequent sardonic glances at the oddities of the way that the world works: here, the administrative world of the British Raj.
_	RPGamer gave the game its Most Original award, for presenting "a gaming experience unlike any this past year", including a "unique battle system" emphasizing tactical combat, the strategic way in which "the world map was opened up", the ability to "modify almost every aspect of the characters' appearances", and "the way that its story is told."
_	Throughout his trip to the store, the boy sees items along the way that play tricks with his memory, and items on his list one-by-one become substituted with other goods.
_	Cutoffs can affect the way that other river bends adjacent evolve over time, increasing their height of flooding and the direct momentum of the water which can then create further cutoffs and affect other bends further downstream throughout the river.
_	Some patience is necessary when starting to use a razor of this type, as the skin usually takes some time to adjust to the way that the electric razor lifts and cuts the hairs.
_	Coherency hardening occurs when the interface between the particles and the matrix is coherent, depending on parameters like particle size, the way that particles are introduced by.
_	The teacher already has the knowledge that he or she is trying to impart, but the way that knowledge is conveyed may not be the best for those without the knowledge already.
_	“It is a threat that is sanctioned by the State and that sanction is an important sanction because it justifies in the mind of others in society who are differently minded that the very lifestyle, life and existence of a person who chooses to live, in the way that the claimant does, is criminal and is deemed of a lesser value than anyone else.
_	These posts are appointed by the Presidents of the two houses of Parliament because the way that they are elected tends to ensure that they are impartial consensus figures chosen by both the government and at least part of the opposition.
_	The 1924 painting, a close-up of the flower with streaks of light blue and gray, immerses the viewer in the blossom, and is meant to convey the way that O'Keeffe experiences it.
_	A one-man exhibition, which opened in New York the same year he completed the painting, "Times Square", drew praise from "The New York Sun", "Mr. Webster paints in the way that at one time was thought the only way to paint, using the flowing strokes and well-thinned-out pigments that came to us through Sargent via Frans Hals and Velasquez."
_	This had an important effect on what Cotton taught and the way that he taught it.
_	I always admired the way that he played.
_	Evans changed the way that chapter leaders were paid: he insisted that they receive a fixed salary rather than commissions based on membership fees in a move that lowered their income.
_	Well, the revolution has come but not in the way that Albright thought.
_	I kind of wonder just how long "Stan becomes a horse" was written on the "American Dad" board, but there was something goofily charming about the way this all played out - much less the way that everything tied together in the end - that made the episode end on a high enough note for me to give it a Grade:
_	That’s about the way that came about.'"
_	In a book called "Critical Terms for Media Studies", the author illustrates his take on new media in technology: "technology---a focus on the mechanical aspects of media and the way that innovations and inventions transform the condition of both individual and social experience."
_	However, the way that only certain activities are classified today as art is a social construction.
_	Pareto originally used this distribution to describe the allocation of wealth among individuals since it seemed to show rather well the way that a larger portion of the wealth of any society is owned by a smaller percentage of the people in that society.
_	"We were almost Stalinist in the way that you had to shed all your friends, or everything that you'd known, or every way that you'd played before."
_	Only the questions survive; however, the way that the questions are phrased, as well as Geoffroi's actions in his lifetime, allow scholars to reach further conclusions about Geoffroi's conception of chivalry and war.
_	Bowie later described the title track the same way: the original demo was "totally different" from the way that Nile arranged it.
_	Instead "they are creating a patchwork of regulations affecting gay and lesbian couples — and may be raising questions about discrimination and fairness in the way that federal benefits are distributed."
_	A more continuous, two-way interaction between the Committee and the membership is now possible, thanks to the explosive development of the internet, which has had a profound impact on the way that TEG functions.
_	It attempted to help the UK's government to be able to keep track of the way that the UK labour market was affected by the workers from the A8 countries.
_	Farmers were upset with the way that the powerline route was initially conceived.
_	But what we do know is that researchers have uncovered uncertainties and flaws in the way that much animal research is designed and how it is approved and evaluated and that it has harmed patients and likely to have diverted attention away from other more reliable methods of pre-clinical research.
_	Lyricwise it is similar to the debut album, in the way that it is more personal and focuses on existential issues, but the mythological undertone known from "Belus" is still there.
_	In 2005 this research produced a study which questioned whether male bisexuality exists in the way that it is sometimes described; the study was based on results of penile plethysmograph testing.
_	By 1992, 1.5 million had been sold at $19.95 directly from TV advertising, and 2 million more had been sold in stores, This was described by Jay Conrad Levinson and Seth Godin as "a classic example of the way that informercials can drive the retail market".
_	The strength of her reportage, according to Carsten Hueck, is to be found in the way that she manages to blend together stories of brutality against drugs cartel victims with the otherwise anonymous statistics.
_	This model is used to determine how to proceed in situations that are detrimental to the environment by choosing the way that is least damaging and has the fewest lasting implications.
_	And if these guys don't learn how to play the media the way that Barack Obama played the media last election cycle and the way that Donald Trump is playing the election cycle, we're going to probably get a celebrity candidate.
_	Harvey’s Presidential Address to the American Finance Association, published in the Journal of Finance in 2017 challenges the way that research is conducted in empirical finance and points out some basic misunderstandings of statistics.
_	This is not the way that a country that now values democracy and human rights should really be behaving."
_	Picking up from McLuhan, media theorists Jay David Bolter and Richard Grusin , in their 1999 book Remediation: Understanding New Media, sought to describe how media forms interact with one another through remediation and the way that this media practice invokes the interrelated processes of immediacy and hypermediacy.
_	This includes not just an understanding of the intrinsic qualities of the materials themselves, but also the way that they affect and are affected by the other materials that they come into contact with.
_	Kane respected the Saints and admired their faith and some of their religious practices; however, she never really was a "friend of the Mormons" in the way that her husband was.
_	Daniels stated that the season would feature more big season arcs, saying "I'll tell you that the last couple of years, I don't think we did any big arc-type things in the way that we used to in the beginning, I think the thing we're going to do is bring back a lot of arcs."
_	In the way that his father Benjamin is placed in opposition to Eakins the painter, the two may be envisioned as playing out a psychological "conflict" across the other axis of the chess board.
_	In August 2006, the Gambling Commission in the United Kingdom started a consultation regarding the way that participation television operate.
_	Rosen discusses the way that the media framed the feminist movement and the reaction in society as women gained more influence.
_	Time is the dimension of the world's motion; and it is infinite in just the way that the whole number is said to be infinite.
_	The song is a protest song, listing in its early verses the way that British authorities have marginalised the Celtic communities of Scotland, Northern Ireland, and Wales.
_	Its terms of reference were to examine the way that "Government agencies dealt with issues of violence and child sexual abuse at the Swan Valley Nyoongar community"; to examine "how State Government agencies respond to evidence of family violence and child sexual abuse that may be occurring in Aboriginal communities generally" and to give "recommendations on practical solutions for addressing incidents of sexual abuse in Aboriginal communities, including any necessary legislative and administrative measures".
_	Once alone with Holly, Sam says that if he and his ex-wife had fought in the way that Messer and Holly did, they would still be together.
_	Influenced by psychoanalytic psychologists including Sigmund Freud and Carl Jung, these authors sought to understand the way that individual personalities were shaped by the wider cultural and social forces in which they grew up.
_	There is a disconnect between the way Tony feels about Britain and the way that his family feels, specifically his brother.
_	Modern airliners also commonly feature computerized Full-Authority Digital Engine Control systems (FADECs) that control their jet engines, air inlets, fuel storage and distribution system, in a similar fashion to the way that FBW controls the flight control surfaces.
_	It is meant in the way that Ayya giving the acts to Dharma Citar.
_	Coppola has called the film a "valentine" to Tokyo, in which she has displayed the city in the way that it is meaningful to her.
_	In this article Davies first outlined his theory that music is expressive of emotions in virtue of resembling the way that emotions appear.
_	The statistical interpretation is related to quantum mechanics in describing the way that energy is distributed (quantized) amongst molecules on specific energy levels, with all the energy of the macrostate always in only one microstate at one instant.
_	Rinder says that Miscavige was furious with the way that Sweeney had been handled and ordered Rinder to go to Sussex to dig ditches on a Church property there.
_	That was the way that ""barbarian newcomers"" could fit amongst the Romanised natives.
_	Subha J. Rao and K. Jeshi of "The Hindu", in their article "Laughter lines", highlighted the way that Nagesh "brings the house down as the impoverished poet."
_	Sakuma Shōzan coined the phrase "Eastern ethics, Western technical learning" (', ) which was later further abbreviated as "Japanese spirit, Western technique" (', ). This latter slogan is still in use as a description of the way that Japan ought to handle modernization.
_	The productive forces therefore cannot be distinguished from the relations of production in the way that technological determinism requires.
_	Demian's patent thus covered an accompanying instrument: an accordion played with the left hand, opposite to the way that contemporary chromatic hand harmonicas were played, small and light enough for travelers to take with them and used to accompany singing.
_	President Barack Obama expressed support for the proposed tax, saying that "I do think that giving a disincentive to insurance companies to offer Cadillac plans that don't make people healthier is part of the way that we're going to bring down health care costs for everybody over the long term."
_	Nevertheless, scholars have discussed the way that Gorean subculture groups on mediums such as Second Life and Internet Relay Chat have influenced the development of online role-playing and even the Mmorpg genre.
_	The functions of plant catecholamines have not been clearly established, but there is evidence that they play a role in the response to stressors such as bacterial infection, act as growth-promoting factors in some situations, and modify the way that sugars are metabolized.
_	This proposed the widely held belief that those of lower ranking, who were perceived to be of less clothing due to their casual performance of manual labor, were not protected in the way that the upper class were in that time period.
_	Either way, the ethos and tradition laid down over many years has shaped the way that the club conducts itself even in the modern era.
_	In one unusual case, a first or second year plumaged male martial eagle was seen assisting an adult female in the way that an adult male would but it was not known if he had merely replaced a deceased male that had sired the young or had actually bred with the female, the following year the young male was verified to mate with the female.
_	Reflecting the way that the Angels were winning the war, in October 1995, Harold Pelletier turned himself in to the "Sûreté du Québec", confessing that on the night of 7 August 1983 he murdered a drug dealer named Michel Beaulieu who was behind in his payments to the Pelletier Clan, and asked that the police provide him with protection from the Angels in exchange for more information about his crimes.
_	A significant part of aeronautical science is a branch of dynamics called aerodynamics, which deals with the motion of air and the way that it interacts with objects in motion, such as an aircraft.
_	Firstly there is the distinction that may be drawn between go opening theory, the codified variations that resemble chess openings in the way that they occur repeated in games, and "go opening principles".
_	A light bulb does not have content in the way that a newspaper has articles or a television has programs, yet it is a medium that has a social effect; that is, a light bulb enables people to create spaces during nighttime that would otherwise be enveloped by darkness.
_	This ascension to popular usage is reminiscent of, for example, the way that the baseball-inspired phrases "step up to the plate" and "he hit it out of the park," or American football-inspired phrases such as "victory formation" or "hail Mary" have entered popular North American vernacular.
_	The Doctor, Seven and Janeway relationship was also compared to Pygmalion showing Galatea to Venus in the way that the Doctor re-humanised Seven during the events of "The Gift".
_	Technology has been critical in the latter two processes, facilitating the rapid expansion of access to specialized knowledge and tools, as well as changing the way that people view and demand such access.
_	The suit insulates the wearer in one of two main ways: by maintaining an insulating layer of air in the undersuit between the body and the suit shell, (in exactly the way that thermal insulation garments work above water) or by using a watertight expanded neoprene suit shell, which is inherently insulating in the same way as a wet suit, and which can usually be worn with additional insulating undergarments.
_	They describe it as an "uncommonly neat little insurance racket-cum-murder thriller" and praise the way that its comic relief is "built into the fabric of the film's main narrative action".
_	Following the 1968 convention, in which many reformers had been disappointed in the way that Vice President Hubert Humphrey, despite not having competed in a single primary, easily won the nomination over Senators Eugene McCarthy and George McGovern (who announced after the assassination of another candidate, Senator Robert F. Kennedy), a commission headed by Senator McGovern reformed the Democratic Party's nominating process to increase the power of primaries in choosing delegates in order to increase the democracy of the process.
_	The constituent parts are all quite simple, but I think the way that they then blend gives real depth to the song."
_	The role required "serious primping" with eyebrow plucking and chest and leg hair removal, and Roger Ebert noted the way that Murphy played the character with a "bemused and hopeful voice".
_	Together they developed the AR Model 1, which changed the way that speakers were designed.
_	The song Children of Divorce is written about this as Craig saw that "It was fair to her, because I didn't love her the way that she loved me.
_	This season resembled Expedition Robinson more so than Survivor in the way that the tribes were divided up into two groups known as the North ("Kuzey") and South ("Güney") teams.
_	However, upon his return to Britain, he began to split from the communist Soviet Union and its policies, particularly after he was shocked at the way that they violently dealt with the Hungarian Uprising in 1957.
_	Multiple attempts have been made to improve both the way that researchers validate antibodies and ways in which they report on antibodies.
_	In regard to Templeton's photographic exploration of Russia, Moore explains: "Like litmus paper turning irreversibly red after it has been soaked in lemon juice, the photographs document the way that first impressions leave indelible marks upon our memory, shaping what follows."
_	The new phyletic approach changed the way that taxonomists considered plant classification, incorporating evolutionary information into their schemata.
_	No one does what she does in the way that she does it."
_	He stressed notable differences in the way that Millennials and Generation Z consume technology, in terms of smartphone usage at an earlier age.
_	-"Series 14 was unique in the way that it featured a double figure (Curtis Joseph); the two goalies were originally scheduled for a U.S/Canada split with the Oilers Joseph going to Canada and the Coyotes Joseph going to the United States, however TMP changed their minds and decided to share both figures evenly."
_	Stuff liked the way that his presence offered relief from the ballads on "Here I Stand".
_	The "Lithuanian Rhapsody" differs from the other of Karłowicz's symphonic poems in the way that it was not inspired by any narrative or philosophical concern.
_	In many ways, this disease mirrors persistent viral infection, in the way that it evades and progresses despite the immune system's effort to eliminate it.
_	The key is in the way that the objective function is modified.
_	The IRB recognised them for "their unique contribution to the way that Rugby was played", specifically stating that they "are credited with pioneering the passing game and the three-man backline, which became widespread during the 1880s."
_	But rather than embrace this obvious conclusion, Sternhell shrinks from it in much the way that other
_	In late-19th- and early-20th-century Turpan, Islamic modesty meant that Muslim prostitutes would not bare their bodies to clients in the way that Chinese prostitutes did.
_	Estimating the profitability of the Glamorgan estates is challenging because of the way that the accounts were drawn up during the period, but estimates suggest that once land purchases and the dock building cost were factored in, the estates cost the marquess much more than they delivered in income.
_	But the way that Browne's songs braid verbose emotions with melody remains magical."
_	Finally there is the reprise, which has been called “the most important concept from the "Logique"”, and roughly sketched is the way that the content of an attitude or of a category is taken up and expressed in the language of another attitude or category.
_	The two friends eventually make it out of the wilderness, discovering on the way that Charlie has been left a large fortune that must be claimed within one year.
_	The question is whether this northern MEP can become a brand in his own right in the way that Farage has managed to."
_	Gortney, "because of the very nature of the way that Cheyenne Mountain's built, it's EMP-hardened.
_	These works stretch, blur and manipulate the human form in space much in the way that two-dimensional digital photography can be manipulated.
_	And the way that Europe has developed is that the bankers and the multinational corporations have got very powerful positions, and if you come in on their terms, they will tell you what you can and cannot do.
_	The first explicit statement of frequency-dependent selection appears to have been by Edward Bagnall Poulton in 1884, on the way that predators could maintain color polymorphisms in their prey.
_	Another viewed the album as "an impressive mix of soulful-funky-jazz-rock that totally works in the way that they just don't make 'em anymore."
_	The notion had a profound influence on the way that popular customs were seen, and most of the 19th century writers who bemoaned the state of contemporary Christmases were, at least to some extent, yearning for the mythical Merry England version.
_	Alasdair Wilkins of io9 praised Troughton's performance and the way that it was structured to "constantly [expand] the story's scope", though he admitted there was still padding.
_	This realization is seen by studying the various cultures that have developed over the millennia, and trying to understand the way that freedom has worked itself out through them.
_	Thematically, the film is concerned with the construction of futures, and the way that science fiction can influence reality.
_	the way that he establishes is not the way of evil spirits.
_	The system changed the way that depreciation deductions are allowed for tax purposes.
_	It’s not just the way that Scott’s delusions of grandeur make him resemble an extra from a Christopher Guest mockumentary; the entire production plays like a sly riff on the hit 1999 documentary "American Movie", where director Chris Smith chronicled the low-budget filmmaking exploits of a modern-day Ed Wood, Mark Borchardt...
_	However, the film did not rally the critical support it would have needed to defy the code in the way that the 1953 film "The Moon Is Blue" had.
_	Some species, including "Athanas djiboutensis", are called "bulldozer shrimps" because of the way that they push sand and small stones about.
_	She also praises the way some of the failures of the protagonists (particularly Vera and Gwen) play into the episode, stating that "'The Categories of Life' exposes human vanity in the way that only a script by Jane Espenson could".
_	He examines the way that colonial state structures were created to protect tributary populations involved in the silver, fur and slave trades.
_	Although progress is always left-to-right, there are branches along the way that allow some gameplay liberty.
_	Furniture, carpets and domestic appliances are not used up soon after purchase in the way that food is.
_	Experience is the valid knowledge of the way that appearances succeed each other as objects.
_	The concept of causality refers to thoughts and statements about the way that successive appearances and perceptions are universally and necessarily experienced as objects, in any consciousness.
_	However, the way that Christ always has fresh wounds associated with some of the tools is at odds with such an interpretation.
_	The S-D logic approach is changing the way that marketers understand "value-creation" and is changing concepts of the consumer's role in service delivery processes.
_	Across the Atlantic, the Great Nordic Biker War for the control of organized crime in Scandinavia took place between 1994–97, and many of the Canadian bikers not with the Hells Angels were impressed at the way that the Scandinavian branches of the Bandidos held their own against the Scandinavian branches of the Hells Angels.
_	In both respects one may observe the way that affective display differs from culture to culture.
_	"A humane and closely reported exploration of the way that hurtful power relationships play out in the contemporary public-school setting".
_	As a means of confirming this recommendation, Mitchell conducted a study from 1989 to 1992 which evaluated three separate groups of women and the way that health services and education about HIV transmission was delivered to them.
_	Therefore they aren’t reproducing the way that they are supposed to.
_	This paradigm plays into adolescent sexuality in the way that there is less communication about oftentimes sensitive topics such as adolescent sexuality.
_	These ideologies may take the form of assumptions of the role that a woman plays in society, her needs or capabilities, which thus affect the way that an issue is framed and implemented.
_	It's also different than a lot of Arabic variants in the way that phonological assimilation occurs to a multitude of words, but not to all of them.
_	Still disappointed with the way that the various record labels had handled the duo's albums and accompanying promotion during the first decade of their career, Thes One made the decision after "Carried Away" to take complete control of the production process for the group's albums from start-to-finish.
_	In addition, due to the way that the prespinal and postspinal laminae project upwards, the neural spine of the vertebra appears to be V-shaped from the side, and resemble a Greek cross in cross-section.
_	After Marrone quit, several players expressed their displeasure and disgust with both the decision and the way that he informed the team; one of the captains and the longest-tenured player on the team, running back Fred Jackson, said it was "like getting punched in the stomach."
_	Derham immediately sought to depart radically from the way that law had been taught previously in Australia.
_	College radio stations are typically considered to be public radio radio stations in the way that they are funded by donation and grants, but as a radio format the term "Public radio" generally refers to classical music, jazz, and news.
_	Discussing the song's origins, Howard said that "Shivers" was "intended as an ironic comment on the way that I felt that people I knew were making hysterical things out of what were essentially high school crushes".
_	In the 1910s and 1920s physicists and engineers tried to reproduce and measure in the laboratory the way that radio waves propagated in ionized gases in the ionosphere.
_	The hope was to change the way that the public interacts with art and the urban environment, because art is normally found only in a museum and these Buddha heads in urban areas changes one’s concept of public space.
_	It's just really low-key in the way that, say, "Dilbert" is low-key."
_	She has a particular interest in women in society and coined the term "double presence" () to describe the way that women have a responsibility to both private, family life and the public world of work.
_	Digital and social media are changing the way that consumers use media and are also influencing how consumers acquire product information.
_	This leads to petrels being grounded, which is a significant issue due to the way that Westland petrels must take flight.
_	A nighttime scene will usually contain duller colours and will often be lit with blue lighting, which reflects the way that the human eye sees colours at low light levels.
_	Picus said that voters turned against Lorenzen because of the way that the councilman had forced streetlights—and the resulting taxes—upon certain residential districts that did not want them.
_	Looking back, she lamented the way that in the appetite for liberation "the guerilla fight in West Germany and in all the imperialist countries excluded from the headlines the more experienced, intelligent, persistent and constructitive aspects" of the movement.
_	The perception of a positive or negative emotion on a face affects the way that an individual perceives and processes that face.
_	Occupational segregation refers to the way that some jobs (such as truck driver) are dominated by men, and other jobs (such as child care worker) are dominated by women.
_	In the vanguard of this pattern is the way that BI is being incorporated with shared, cloud-based applications.
_	In addition, Nietzsche (in "Beyond Good and Evil") and Alasdair MacIntyre (in "After Virtue") have pointed out that the ancient Greeks did not associate morality with altruism in the way that post-Christian Western civilization has done.
_	Jules and his wife, Ann, still live with his parents, but Ann is quietly enduring the way that her opinionated mother-in-law Eva dominates the household.
_	The 27 sculptures were supposed to represent the starving people in the Third World countries that are influenced by the way that the summit focuses on corporations' profit, instead of poor peoples' interests.
_	The "Down Beat" review by Bill Meyer says that ""Elastic Aspects" can be seen as a companion piece to its predecessor in the way that it very explicitly breaks down the components of his trio music and isolates how they interact."
_	All cells with mitochondria can take ketone bodies up from the blood and reconvert them into acetyl-CoA, which can then be used as fuel in their citric acid cycles, as no other tissue can divert its oxaloacetate into the gluconeogenic pathway in the way that this can occur in the liver.
_	Owen Gleiberman of "Entertainment Weekly" praised Renner's performance writing that he "imbues Jeffrey Dahmer with a very solemn desolation that looks just enough like ”normal” pain to let you in on the way that this repressed, lonely freak could pass himself off as just another sad-eyed outcast."
_	He states that the two main themes in his research laboratory are the evolution of surprising traits in behaviour and morphology, including co-operation with unrelated individuals (as opposed to kin selection) and the existence of conspicuous warning signals; and the way that individual behaviour shapes the spatio-temporal dynamics of populations, as when travelling waves are set up when individuals move over a landscape feature.
_	Reinhold's emphasis on history is evident in his declaration that philosophies and religions are to be judged on the way that they respond to the needs of reason in a particular era.
_	Originally self-published in 1978, "Super/System" was the book credited with transforming poker by giving ordinary players insight into the way that professionals such as Brunson played and won, so much so that Brunson believes that it cost him a lot of money.
_	Robin, Lily and Ted each describe how they would deal with Arthur's aggression, and Barney explains that Marshall "shouldn't" deal with it - the way that the chain (or circle) of screaming works is that one person screams at someone "below" him, then that person screams at another person, and so on.
_	Play is something that most children partake in, but the way play is executed is different between cultures and the way that children engage with play varies universally.
_	Their actions earned British Waterways the praise of Rhodri Glyn Thomas of the Welsh Assembly, who applauded their ""courageous decision"" to manage the breach in the way that they had.
_	Patti constantly thinks about vitamins in much the way that an alcoholic thinks about drinking.
_	This near-disaster was due to the way that ammunition handling was arranged and was common to both German and British battleships and battlecruisers, but the lighter protection on the latter made them more vulnerable to the turret or barbette being penetrated.
_	Koot Hoomi, through Sinnett, revealed that high-ranking members of mystic organizations in India and Tibet were able to maintain regular telepathic contact with one another, and thus were able to communicate to each other, and also to Sinnett, without the need for either written or oral communications, and in a manner similar to the way that spirit mediums claimed to communicate with the spirits of the dead.
_	His death is seen as inspirational within that context, but his death was not the whole goal in the way that penal substitution depicts it.
_	On the other hand, human to computer communication is the way that people communicate with new media.
_	The Society has not been directly involved in publishing scores in the way that its predecessor was.
_	In general, though emotion researchers disagree about the way that emotions and dispositional affect should be classified, a common classification of emotions assumes that each emotion is a combination of pleasantness (pleasant or unpleasant) and activation (high or low).
_	God has the right to allow such evils to occur, so long as the 'goods' are facilitated and the 'evils' are limited and compensated in the way that various other Christian doctrines (of human freewill, life after death, the end of the world, etc.) affirm.
_	Finally, supervenience claims typically involve some modal force, however, the way that modal force is specified depends on which more specific variety of supervenience one decides upon (see below).
_	Mayor Eric Garcetti said the effort represents ""a shift from the way that our neighborhoods have been planned in Los Angeles,"" with a new focus on ""walkability and transit.""
_	Visitors to the Vortex Garden can experience such implosive forces and empathize with the way that life forces can or may emerge, grow and develop.
_	Such a language would be extensional, in the way that two predicates which are true about the same objects are interchangeable again without altering the truth-value.
_	I love the way that sounds: the texture of super compressed digital beats coming out of a cellphone and just a voice over it.
_	Legislators will promise to vote the way that another legislator wants on one issue in order to gain their opponent's vote on another issue.
_	In another contribution to the same volume, Christian Gerlach and Nicolas Werth discuss the topic of mass violence, and the way that it was used by both Stalinism and Nazism.
_	The current head General Sir Nick Carter said "If that’s the best method of getting to the heart of the matter then I guess that should be the way that we go."
_	So the history biographers write about will not be the way that it happened; it will be the way they remembered it.
_	At the end of the video it states that the way that things are going, Armageddon won't be long.
_	Typically, they are motivated by a desire to set a research agenda to direct efforts to specific problems, or a wish to clarify, update and extrapolate the way that subdisciplines relate to the general discipline of mathematics and its possibilities.
_	He ultimately sacrifices himself to save the life of his wife, showcasing heroic qualities and subverting the way that villains are often portrayed in the genre.
_	In geometry, ramification is 'branching out', in the way that the square root function, for complex numbers, can be seen to have two "branches" differing in sign.
_	Stem cells and tumor-causing cells, however, do not have gap junctions so they cannot be affected in the way that one would control a typical epithelial cell.
_	Gossip: Gregory satirizes the way that people are happy to believe the worst about their neighbors, and tend not to think before they talk.
_	"The Last Guardians", Social & environmental documentary, by "Tierra Productions" (Joe Tucker, Adam Punzano), 44 minutes, The Last Guardians offers a unique insight into the way that indigenous people live and see the world, and also a warning of what the world stands to lose if their rights and beliefs are not respected.
_	This is the feature that appears at Bristol, at a very early date, and quite unlike the way that "lierne" ribs are used elsewhere.
_	While many island travelers go out of their way to pick up a Caribbean variety, more and more small U.S. companies are competing, much the way that craft beers are competing with the large beer manufacturers.
_	Libertarian perspectives on affirmative action consistently coincide with the way that libertarians view the state as a coercive power.
_	Srividya Ramasubramanian talks about the way that stereotypes turn from being harmless into something that can be deeply offensive.
_	There are, at times, criticisms of the way that the court administers itself.
_	In a 1992 interview, Nadja Salerno-Sonnenberg said: "I think the greatest things about Dorothy DeLay is that she has the ability to look at a young student or an old student and pretty much size up their character and the way that they think — their personality, basically — and how in a short period of time what's the best door to use to get them into here.
_	In his words: "Do we make dancing spectacular ourselves, in the way that we watch?
_	This name finds its origins in the fact that there was a bridge ("hashi" 橋) crossing the Tone River and not far from the bridge there was a small refreshment house with a stable ("umaya" 駅家), often used by people travelling on the Tōzan-dō (the way that was connecting the capital to the eastern regions of Japan).
_	Similar to the way that a terrestrial gyrocompass uses a pendulum to sense local gravity and force its gyro into alignment with Earth's spin vector, and therefore point north, an "orbital gyrocompass" uses a horizon sensor to sense the direction to Earth's center, and a gyro to sense rotation about an axis normal to the orbit plane.
_	No man's land in the 34th Division sector varied from and Prior and Wilson wrote that they had found no particular attention had been given to the way that the infantry were to cross the wider parts.
_	Matthew Weiner credited the cinematographer Chris Manley and director Jennifer Getzinger for the "gradations of darkness, of afternoon into night into early morning, the way that they’re posed together, it just really made the whole thing work."
_	Difficulties as to the mode of bringing these principles into practical operation were discussed, and full liberty had to be given to the several nations to carry out the proposals in the way that seemed best.
_	Owing to the way that Africa was carved up by the European powers in the 19th century in their so-called "Scramble for Africa", Luhonono lies right near several other countries, Zambia just to the north, Botswana about 30 km to the south and Zimbabwe about 50 km to the east.
_	She argues that it was so named because the shelter that it provides to Cockburn Sound was reminiscent of the way that the Isle of Wight, then known locally as the "Garden Isle", shelters the waters off Portsmouth.
_	The building typology of the Sea Ranch draws on the local agricultural buildings for inspiration, in the way that those buildings are designed to deal with prevailing weather and topography.
_	Shortly afterwards, Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke advocated for downsizing four additional national monuments and change the way that six additional monuments were managed.
_	A number of them began to explore the limits of the CD in the way that earlier groups had stretched the limits of the vinyl LP.
_	It took two days to discover a route down the precipice and Ang Tharkay was the person who found the way that was at last successful.
_	He considered the post-war trials of alleged collaborators a great injustice inflicted upon many innocent people, and never forgave Belgian society for the way that he had been treated, although he hid this from his public persona.
_	The chopper style of hip hop eventually spread among West Coast and East Coast hip hop artists as well with very few actually adopting the style as their main act including rappers such as the San Diego-based rapper Twisted Insane, J.L (of B.Hood) from Kansas City where he quotes in one of his songs, "...all that I really know is bustin' chop on percussion eh, this the way that I wanna make my livin' ..." as well as the horrorcore rap group Firing Squad from Washington 509 and arguably New York-based rapper Busta Rhymes.
_	The final scene of "Stick", featuring a conversation between Stick and Stone, was meant to hint at further ties between the series and other areas of the MCU in the same way as Marvel's film post-credits scenes, though it could not actually go after the episode's credits due to the way that Netflix begins the next episode during the credits of the current one.
_	The name came from a misheard line in a song, with Hartley explaining "I like the way that the mouth moves when you say Bog Shed".
_	Instead, in Buffa Opera, a work in which the world of today is seen from the partial but acute perspective of insects – be they cockroaches, bees, butterflies or spiders – Francesconi was able to use a vast array of stylistically characterised objects (from jazz to avant-garde, from the musical to the canzonetta) to send up the music of today and the way that it is consumed".
_	Unhappy with the way that editors Max and Crystal Eastman and a few others were able to live off the struggling magazine, while he received a nominal fee or worked pro bono, Young left "The Liberator" in 1919 to start a magazine of his own, "Good Morning".
_	It seemed to me that the script had a sense of place in the way that "Breaking Away" did.
_	Or does the Latin origin of the word 'lubricilleux' not make itself felt to a speaker of French in the way that it would if it were an English word ('lubricilious', perhaps)?
_	(Note the way that the "engine room establishment officers" are not listed with the "officers".)
_	In 1979, he abstained from a crucial vote in the House of Commons which brought down the Labour government, citing the way that the government had failed to help the nationalist population and tried to form a deal with the Ulster Unionist Party.
_	As evidence, she contrasted the way that Bergdorf's comment was received on social media with the way that the politician Jacob Rees-Mogg and conversion therapist Mike Davidson—both white men—had been publicly received after making controversial comments during that same month.
_	The main impact is not the physical destruction but the way that rocket fire affect the lives of Israel's population and cause people to flee northern Israel.
_	Beyond the design of objects, the way that people choose to interact with objects could also demonstrate techno-animism.
_	Still, many questions remain about the way that "Salmonella" has evolved into so many different types, but "Salmonella" may have evolved through several phases.
_	In both "The Gnostic Gospels" and "Adam, Eve, and the Serpent", Pagels focuses especially on the way that women have been viewed throughout Jewish and Christian history.
_	Throughout the 1830s and 1840s Kitson shaped the way that Torquay developed to such an extent that he is known to this day as the 'Maker of Torquay', acting in the place of the absentee Palk who had by now fled to Dieppe to avoid debts.
_	According to Exodus 32:7-8, in a divine speech to Moses, Yahweh reveals the events going on at the base of Mt. Sinai to Moses, judging the golden calf to be a violation of the recently revealed law: "They have turned aside quickly from the way that I commanded them".
_	Alter described the book in terms of ambivalence and complexity, quoting Orange, himself a graduate of the Institute of American Indian Arts, born to a Cheyenne father and white mother who converted to evangelical Christianity and denounced his father's spiritual beliefs, "I wanted to have my characters struggle in the way that I struggled, and the way that I see other native people struggle, with identity and with authenticity."
_	Having grown up in his father’s non-denominational, North Carolina church, Neff-U learned to express the way that God made him feel through music.
_	Sir John Tooley, former General Director of the Royal Opera House (1970–1988), described him as "one of the most outstanding stage designers of the past century ... a giant and a poet amongst designers [who] dominated the second half of the twentieth century in the way that Léon Bakst and Alexandre Benois had done in the first part."
_	This work evolved into a larger interest in the way that the social and physical setting in which a person lives affects behaviors and attitudes.
_	In addition to this, the way that an individual responds to stress can influence their health status.
_	Ball directs TeachingWorks, a major project at the University of Michigan to redesign the way that teachers are prepared for practice, and to build materials and tools that will serve the field of teacher education broadly.
_	But also added, "Manipulating time in video games isn't a new thing, but the way that "STF" uses the gimmick feels fresh and clever.
_	In "Mimesis and Alterity" (1993), the anthropologist Michael Taussig examines the way that people from one culture adopt another's nature and culture (the process of mimesis) at the same time as distancing themselves from it (the process of alterity).
_	The ZX81's distribution arrangements were an essential part of its success and marked a watershed in the way that computers were sold in the UK.
_	Her research investigates connections between how society is organized and how that relates to mental health of its citizens, specifically focusing on the way that social inequalities around gender, socioeconomic status, race/ethnicity, and age lead to differences in mental health along those differentiators.
_	She praised the way that the viewer is able to see the "barren emotional landscape in which the Cigarette Smoking Man dwells" via the "tone of the script".
_	Graham Gardner has said that he could not have written "Inventing Elliot" in the way that he did without the lead set by "The Chocolate War".
_	The mirror system meant that the image of the script was not visible to the main camera lens, and indeed this is still the way that most teleprompting systems operate.
_	Irvine wrote that while Austen did see England as different from the rest of Europe, she did not see England as apart from Europe in the way that Gard claimed, or as a part of "Anglo-Saxon civilisations", which apparently include the United States and English-speaking parts of the Commonwealth, a way of thinking that did not exist in her time.
_	In 1976, the BSA allowed the Boston Council and the other councils surrounding Boston (Cambridge, Minuteman, and North Bay) to form a "consolidated council" similar to the way that New York City and the five boroughs were organized.
_	It is a bit mad really but that is the way that football is."
_	Aztec writing has not been considered a true writing system, since it did not represent the full vocabulary of a spoken language in the way that the writing systems of the Old World or the Maya Script did.
_	She was especially taken with "his beautiful Mediterranean bay, his tables spread with white cloths and bright fruit" and the way that "pitchers and jugs and bottles of wine could be seen far down the street"; she considered the cover design aided the success of the book, but was less convinced by his black and white drawings.
_	Blackman says that the way that Williams used all four limbs to attack the drums strongly influenced her.
_	The experiment relies on the way that, according to quantum mechanics, atoms may behave as waves as well as particles.
_	The reference was to the way that the exodus of East Germans to the west through Berlin had been blocked by the new wall, but the meaning for Arno Fischer and his publishers was that "Situation Berlin" was not going to be published within foreseeable time.
_	"I'm kind of a novelist in the way that 9/11 was a Great American Novel" the singer added.
_	This legal change formalized Mapuche slavery that was already occurring at the time, with captured Mapuches being treated as property in the way that they were bought and sold among the Spanish.
_	The above logic is quite subtle in the way that it works.
_	It was Scirica's opinion that the court upended the way that judiciary reviews agency rule making, as it was his belief that principles of deference be accorded to agency decision-making.
_	Esler also writes on the way that biblical stories have been represented in Western art, including his study of two Rembrandt depictions of Saul and David in 1998.
_	This to Anowa does not make sense because it makes Kofi no better than the European colonists whom she detests for the way that she feels they have used the people of Africa.
_	His parole officer, Kiyoura, takes some basic steps to reintroduce Kikutani into society; Kikutani is unaccustomed to his newfound freedom, and has difficulty doing basic things such as going to the bathroom without asking permission or walking normally without marching in the way that he and his fellow prisoners were required to do.
_	"Basically the way that went was, we had another guitar player in the band, Steve,
_	Also, reference was made, by AIM personnel, to many actual MODOCs who, apparently, really did function in the way that MODOK was originally supposed to have done (namely, as docile organic supercomputers).
_	This grief is presented in the way that this version differs from the other depictions of the Virgin of Passions.
_	This changed dramatically the way that custody of the children after divorce was granted.
_	Copies of such recordings could be made that were exact duplicates of the original recording, and such copies do not exhibit degradation in the way that analog audio tape does.
_	The appearance of the town is corrupted in the way that her own flesh was wounded."
_	A model conforms to its metamodel in the way that a computer program conforms to the grammar of the programming language in which it is written.
_	Instead, what is being denied is the way that the antecedent is framed.
_	There is some discussion of the way that short aphorisms of this sort can be variously interpreted – Hersilie points out that for women, it is often the inverse of "the maxims of men" that prove to be true.
_	Robin Smith, a teacher, book reviewer, and participant on multiple American Library Association award committees, praised Santat's use of greys and colors and the way that the story being told through Beekle's point of view helps readers to feel Beekle's emotions.
_	It changed the way that historians looked at local communities in early modern England.
_	After the first rehearsals, the Greek composer, Yiannis Valvis, was unhappy with the way that the director, Geoff Posner, intended to film his song, specifically a series of six heavily-emphasised chords accompanied by six dance moves which Valvis felt the director was not placing enough emphasis upon.
_	Many such weapons were ornately decorated, and yet their functionality shows in the way that the axe head was mounted tilting upwards slightly, with a significant forward curve in the shaft, with the intent of making them more effective against armoured opponents by concentrating force onto a narrower spot.
_	The film has been criticized for fictionalizing the events and the way that the characters were portrayed.
_	The spelling of the series title alludes to Tagliano's dog Lily that was killed in the first episode during an attempt on his life, and the way that Frank and some other anglophones pronounce the town's name.
_	This is very similar to the way that doublet–triplet splitting is done in either higher-dimensional grand unified theories or string theory.
_	Sarah Rodman of "The Boston Globe" complimented the way that Knowles "declares herself an equal" and "disturbingly conflates transforming her man into a leader".
_	Heidegger seems to think this is the way that a linear relationship with time, or temporal existence, is broken or transcended.
_	Tweedy was unhappy with the way that Bennett mixed parts of the album, particularly the sequences between songs.
_	No other persons involved with the bombing of Hiroshima expressed guilt in the way that Eatherly did.
_	He wrote that if there is some mental fact that works "in practice" the way that a universal would, that fact is a universal.
_	One example is the way that the Macaca video spread virally through the internet on YouTube and contributed to the electoral defeat of Sen. George Allen of Virginia during the 2006 U.S. midterm elections.
_	According to Isaacs, "The title and overall concept of "Ones and Zeros" refers to the future of society via the information superhighway and the way that we're able to take the wealth of the world's knowledge – history, science, entertainment, art and commerce – and reduce everything down to ones and zeros."
_	She analyzed it and concluded "It is about the way that Moon Knight's fortunes descend while Black Spectre's rise, and the way that Moon Knight conquers his weakness while Black Spectre falls to them.".
_	His literary theory saw individual aesthetic sensibilities and creativity to interact with learned cultural traditions to produce unique and new poetic forms, echoing the way that he also saw individuals and cultural patterns to dialectically influence each other.
_	With Impressionism the intention was to depict colors and images the way they are seen, not the way that artists were taught to paint them.
_	President of Production Jeff Robinov reflected, ""Superman Returns" didn't quite work as a film in the way that we wanted it to.
_	Using a biositemap does not guarantee that resources will be included in search indexes nor does it influence the way that tools are ranked or perceived by the community.
_	The buildings remaining among the ruins of ancient Rome appeared to respect a simple mathematical order in the way that Gothic buildings did not.
_	A classic example is the way that shadows 'hug' the corners of rooms.
_	Class directly ties into education and race, and this is reflected in the way that the characters of color interact with the predominantly white world that surrounds them.
_	I like the way that "Red Line 7000" has a community of characters all staying in this Holiday Inn together and hanging out.
_	Chris I. of "Digitally Downloaded" wrote, “Like Bastion before it, Transistor’s strength isn’t found in its action-RPG elements alone, but in the way that its narrative unravels along.”
_	Despite the many benefits that techno-globalism brings in terms of resources and cooperations, techno-globalism can pose certain challenges to the way that people deal with technology.
_	The EPIC website says, "The incredible complexity of P3P, combined with the way that popular browsers are likely to implement the protocol would seem to preclude it as a privacy-protective technology," EPIC continues on to state, "Rather, P3P may actually strengthen the monopoly position over personal information that U.S. data marketers now enjoy."
_	With ethnochoreology’s roots in anthropology taken into account, and by the way that it is studied in the field, dance is most accurately defined and studied within this academic circle as two parts: as “an integral part of a network of social events” and “as a part of a system of knowledge and belief, social behavior and aesthetic norms and values”.
_	He calls the album "more accessible" in the way that it "moves away from Primus' pet herky-jerky shifts of meter long enough to establish serious, straightforward grooves", but also "more accomplished than inspired" with an "increasingly obvious soul deficit."
_	Typically, the way that a WISP operates is to order a fiber circuit to the center of the area they wish to serve.
_	According to the therapist, "Gus is just bored and mildly crazy in the way that a lot of people are in New York".
_	Through their content and the way that they are delivered, curricula, learning materials and extra-curricular activities in educational settings – such as sports or theatre – convey influential messages about 'normality', legitimacy and power.
_	(p. 12) Kuhn's idea was itself revolutionary in its time, as it caused a major change in the way that academics talk about science.
_	I think we’re very lucky to have Melissa as a writer because she really grasps the insight of what it is to have a friendship with a woman, and the way that two women can actually be competitive and friendly, and love each other and hate each other, and have a history with each other."
_	The celebrated Portuguese historian, Father Gaspar Frutuoso referred to Lagoa, in the way that the first settlers named it, a name that was dependent on where they made their homes:
_	Still disappointed with the way that the various record labels had handled the duo's product during the first decade of their career, Thes One made the decision after "Carried Away" to take complete control of the production process for the group's albums from start-to-finish and release all new material under a new business entity, Piecelock 70.
_	Proponents argue that even when the modern synthesis allows for the ideas in the extended synthesis, using the modern synthesis affects the way that biologists think about evolution.
_	They're able to say their goodbyes, Sam finally telling Molly that he loves her in the way that she wants to hear ("The Love Inside").
_	Najib criticised the way that the NEP had been implemented over its 40-year history, arguing that affirmative action policies of the NEP needed to be better targeted.
_	It is currently believed to have originally been the planet of WD B1620-26 before becoming a circumbinary planet, and therefore, while discovered through the pulsar timing method, it did not form the way that PSR B1257+12's planets are thought to have.
_	These issues for many years strongly affected the way that Latin American society was organized.
_	Kouwenhoven has described Day’s style as inherently American in the way that it combines both popular and folk design traditions, but these carved faces of angular design do somewhat reflect African design traditions and could represent a cultural link in Day’s craftsmanship to his heritage, however tenuous.
_	While Vasily Botkin was raving about "the elemental poetic force emerging from secret depths of a human soul... for Katerina's love is a woman's nature thing exactly in the way that any of climactic cataclysm is a thing of physical nature", critic Nikolai Filippov lambasted the play as an "example of vulgar primitivism", calling Katerina "shameless" and the scene of rendezvous in Act III "scabrous".
_	According to the Jornal do Brazil of 04/09/1987, the Federation proposed the way that the league would have 4 different champions.
_	Unusual in Europe at the time, but appreciated by customers, was the way that the rear doors opened wide - to a full 90 degrees.
_	For example, with the rising of "promposals", which are extravagant ways of asking someone to prom, exhibit the way that the expectations of romance are increasing.
_	The area is designed to give drivers a greater understanding of the latest ABS, traction control and crash mitigating technologies, and the way that they affect vehicle control.
_	Making a gaseous product in a membrane reactor generally affects the way that pressure affects the extent of reaction at thermodynamic pseudo-equilibrium.
_	This platform was inspired by the way that outdoor sports with her father helped her to overcome being bullied as a child: "I was bullied when I was a kid.
_	Purchase-to-pay systems are designed to provide organizations with control and visibility over the entire lifecycle of a transaction – from the way an item is ordered to the way that the final invoice is processed – providing full insight into cashflow and financial commitments and is now deemed an important tool for proper implementation of Resource Accounting and Budgeting, not least by UK Government Departments such as HM Treasury.
_	Critics praised the song for the way that Iglesias and Scherzinger's voices complimented each other.
_	It also includes a variant psion class called the "erudite" which does not specialize in a specific discipline in the way that psions do (putting it on par with wizard and archivist).
_	An anonymous historian suggested another scenario, noting the way that the Fright was spread out from London along the main communication routes:
_	On November 28, 2006, an all-party Culture, Media and Sport select committee held a hearing into the concerns regarding the way that quiz channels operate.
_	Huaiyang cuisine characteristically bases each dish on its main ingredient, and the way that ingredient is cut is pivotal to its cooking and its final taste.
_	It is the way that parameters are used that define IoC.
_	Tyler Martin of Stylus Magazine enjoyed the way that the song unconventionally mixed a range of experimental sounds.
_	This is in accordance with Kant's usual concern with the correspondence between subjectivity (the way that we think) and objectivity (the external world).
_	This series worked to challenge the way that Indian people are portrayed by the media.
_	It refers to the way that the airport defenders were able to fend off constant attacks by DPR forces in close quarters with little sleep or support, just as science-fiction cyborgs are "indestructible half-men, half-machines", or "superhuman".
_	French philosopher Jacques Rancière updated his key work "Les Ecarts Du Cinema", in which he notes the way that "Road to Nowhere" creatively advances the themes of Alfred Hitchcock's classic thriller "Vertigo".
_	He challenges her to a personal war, which she accepts only when he threatens her mother and sisters the way that she had previously threatened his parents.
_	That was just about the way that Whittaker Chambers expressed it to me, as I recall it.
_	A variety of silicate minerals can be identified by the way that the tetrahedra links differ, also by the cations present in the mineral.
_	The judgment held that there was an implied constitutional freedom to publish material discussing government and political matters as well as the way that members of the Parliament of Australia conducted their duties and their suitability for office.
_	Madison, like Jefferson, desired a separation between church and state that meant no public financing of religion, but Henry believed that taxpayers who were Christians should be assessed for the maintenance of the Protestant church of their choice, financing an array of churches in the way that Anglicanism had been funded in Virginia until the start of the war.
_	Ian Crouch of "The New Yorker" felt that the work had a "tonal echo" of Don DeLillo's 1972 novel "End Zone" due to thematic similarities "with the way that the order and logic of football might act as a counterbalance to the chaos of the real world".
_	Fergus eventually grew tired of the way that his father was treating Bridget and so told her the truth himself.
_	The 1920-21 season was also significant in the way that it was also Malmö FF's first season with the now iconic skyblue match kit.
_	He describes the way that radically depleted fisheries were evaluated by experts who used the state of the fishery at the start of their careers as the baseline, rather than the fishery in its untouched state.
_	She also did not like the way that she was treated by the Associated British Corporation (ABC).
_	When casting was opened for the role of Jeannie, producer Sidney Sheldon could not find an actress who could play the role the way that he had written it.
_	In the formulation of other articles of faith, the controversies to which the compilers had been exposed influenced both the selection of the specific principles to be accentuated, and the way that they were presented.
_	On May 10, UVA women's lacrosse coach Julie Myers explained the team planned to go forward with its role in the NCAA tournament: "Let's do it the way that Yards would want us to do it."
_	Thus redundant publication could serve a valid purpose analogous to the way that various newspapers in different cities and countries often report news items from elsewhere, ensuring that people in many places receive them despite that they do not read multiple periodicals from many other places.
_	The ability to distribute manuscripts as preprints has had a great impact on computer science, particularly in the way that scientific research is disseminated in that field (see CiteSeer).
_	During the October 12, 2010, episode of "The Daily Show with Jon Stewart", in an interview with Rep. Eric Cantor (R-VA), Stewart credited Joyner with the joke: "Sort of in the way that murderers get sometimes, like, 'I found Jesus and I'm OK now.'
_	Heer articulated that, in dealing with the ordeal in the way that they did, both "Maclean's" and its supporters reflected Canada's inability to constructively talk about the reality of racism.
_	Eastwood was unhappy with the way that United Artists had produced the film and swore "he would never work for United Artists again", and the scheduled two-film deal between Malpaso and UA was cancelled.
_	The pleasure in Crouch’s increasingly funny play is in the way that...he gradually enlarges the metaphysical and physical space.
_	Wollstonecraft was offended by the way that the Jacobins refused to grant Frenchwomen equal rights, denounced "Amazons", and made it clear the role of women was to conform to Rousseau's ideal of as a helper to men.
_	Though Wollstonecraft disliked the former queen, she was troubled by the way that the Jacobins had made Marie Antoinette's alleged perverted sexuality that had caused her to engage in an incestuous relationship with the Dauphin one of the central reasons for why the French people should hate her.
_	What is clear is the way that Salahuddin's reign ended.
_	Her introduction of the term "semi-speaker" and her attention to the way that speech competence develops differently in endangered and obsolete languages led socio-linguists to take an interest in understanding different speaker types and their relations to the process of language shift and language shift reversal.
_	In the way that feminist history unsettles traditional history, feminist aesthetics challenge philosophies of beauty, the arts and sensory experience.
_	According to Rusu "by making it easy for people to capture their surroundings on any mobile device, [Fyusion is] revolutionizing the way that people view the world around them" and also states that for "AR to be successful, anyone should be able to create content for it" opposed to the current "small number of content creators and an even smaller number of hardware players".
_	Due to the way that the terms have evolved over time and the idiosyncratic nature of university structure, the use of the three terms varies considerably from institution to institution.
_	About the video, Stan particularly confessed that "[it] is very dinamic and colored, the way that the life of a pop artist looks like."
_	TWA will be designed in the way that it can overcome those challenges.
_	Alternatively, Scots is sometimes treated as a distinct Germanic language, in the way that Norwegian is closely linked to but distinct from Danish.
_	Harvey is very critical of the way that complaints against chiropractors have been handled by the Australian Health Practitioner Regulation Agency's (AHPRA) Chiropractic Board of Australia, regarding violations of its registration standards since the board's inception.
_	and on the way that I will go,
_	and his perceived favouritism in the way that he dispensed promotions.
_	What distinguishes them is the procedure for determining (training) the optimal weights/coefficients and the way that the score is interpreted.
_	What makes Psalm 119 unique is the way that these requests are continually and explicitly grounded in the gift of the Torah and the psalmist's loyalty to it.
_	Is the way that governments and societies generally react to it the best way to react?
_	Whiting, they say, has taught a lesson: "to try to see China and the world the way that influential Chinese see China and the world and you will be not only a much better scholar but a more effective advisor to those creating policy toward Beijing in the United States and elsewhere.
_	She believes that the way that the event was handled has resulted in the United States continually reliving the trauma of that day, and believes that the War on Terror is one significant cause of this cycle of unending trauma.
_	The "New York Times" art director Jean-Claude Suares can also take a great deal of credit in this fundamental curatorial change to the way that illustration was viewed from a top-down 'do as you are told' profession to a more artist-driven form of artistic communication.
_	He always escapes in the end of each arc, and always manages to steal his target, although not always in the way that the characters or the reader expects.
_	Sikhs are not ubiquitous worldwide in the way that adherents of larger world religions are, and they remain primarily an ethnic religion.
_	The songs on "Democrazy" are very sketchy, and some of the songs are unfinished in the way that they simply end by turning off the sound completely.
_	This has implications, both in resources and practice, for the ability to subject the research to true ethical oversight in the way that traditional research has come to be regulated.
_	These software frameworks vary in their interpretations, mainly in the way that the MVC responsibilities are divided between the client and server.
_	Because the motions are produced by a combination of movements of several of the jacks, such a device is sometimes called a "synergistic motion platform", due to the synergy (mutual interaction) between the way that the jacks are programmed.
_	Unregulated marketing companies now sell natural gas at variable prices, much in the way that long-distance telephone companies operate.
_	Several of Song Dong's works have conveyed a theme of the impermanence of change, highlighting the way that although a single person could effect a minor change it could only have a fleeting impact.
_	Discussion has surfaced around the idea that, historically, public space has been inherently contradictory in the way that it has always been exclusive in who has been able to participate.
_	After the overthrow of Porfirio Díaz's regime, which he took part in, Pascual Orozco became dissatisfied with the way that Francisco Madero was running Mexico.
_	Poe biographer Joseph Wood Krutch suggests that Poe did not need women "in the way that normal men need them", but only as a source of inspiration and care, and that Poe was never interested in women sexually.
_	Gaourang was hostile due to the way that Rabih had treated his southern vassals, and sent a defiant reply that invited war.
_	He attracted many people in the way that he addressed the issues and his people.
_	Amongst other things, the way that the expenses towards the maintenance of the church people in service in Macereto were dealt with, their rights and duties, the responsibilities of the Priori for all expenses – which they could not authorize without orders and planning from the architects, failure to do so would have resulted in them being held responsible with their own belongings – all came under strict regulations."
_	This is probably due to the fact that polycystic echinococcosis is restricted to Central and South America, and that the way that humans become accidental hosts of "E. oligarthrus" and "E. vogeli" is still not completely understood.
_	David Renshaw of "NME" praised it as "a record that bursts out of the speakers" and added that although the album is energetic, "it's the way that the album as a whole unravels and blooms through repeat listens that marks it as Foals' finest moment to date".
_	Icarus does eventually work, although not in the way that anyone may have wanted.
_	he somehow got New York City; he was at the center of things in the way that no other poet was."
_	ICRA also acted as a forum through which both policy and technical infrastructure are defined to help shape the way that the World Wide Web and content distribution channels work.
_	Because there are minor differences between the way that Shiites and Sunnis pray and between prayer times, Shiites are forced to either pray the Sunni way or take a break from work.
_	First, there is the "identification" of the system in use, in this case Enigma; second, "breaking" the system by establishing exactly how encryption takes place, and third, "solving", which involves finding the way that the machine was set up for an individual message, "i.e." the "message key".
_	She permanently changed the way that the AV industry and AV actresses were viewed by the general public in Japan.
_	In the video, "otherworldly happenings" illustrate the way that seemingly small moments in relationships often have a massive impact.
_	According to a 2010 study by Posada and Kaloustian, the way that an infant models their attachment to their caregiver has a direct impact on how the infant responds to other people.
_	The fourth is the way that both animals and women are objectified, treated as mere things to be used towards the ends of others.
_	Parr stated to Denver FOX affiliate KDVR, "I was inspired by Tim Tebow so I wanted to modify the lyrics...in his honor of the way that he lives his life as being a great example."
_	The NeuroLex is intended to help improve the way that neuroscientists communicate about their data, so that information systems like the NIF can find data more easily and provide more powerful means of integrating data that occur across distributed resources.
_	Note that most treatments of the multinomial logit model start out either by extending the "log-linear" formulation presented here or the two-way latent variable formulation presented above, since both clearly show the way that the model could be extended to multi-way outcomes.
_	He also explained why they decided to replace Brian with another dog, saying: "It felt like the way that this show was conceived by Seth all those years ago, was this entire family unit including the parents, kids and a dog.
_	That idea of "salient social membership" negotiation is illustrated well during an interview as the interviewee usually makes all efforts to identify with the interviewer by accommodating the way that is spoken and behaved to raise the chance of getting the job.
_	Database systems use indexes to quickly look up values and the way that most databases index data is not optimal for spatial queries.
_	She said "I think Jess as a person, and the way that her personality is, has some of myself and especially some of my younger self," she suggested.
_	Many Moravian theologians though, believe that the Lutheran doctrine of the sacramental union properly defines the way that Christ is present in Holy Communion, and have historically promulgated that view.
_	The latter can be unified to fight for their own interest and overcome national divisions, much in the way that Marx had hoped in the Communist Manifesto they would, but which a working class movement has not, so far, achieved because of national divisions.
_	As Dalley states: "I think the desire to shock was very important, it was the way that she made herself special.
_	She uses the literacy narratives of several individuals to illustrate the point that children from lower-class families do not have literacy integrated into their lives the way that children from middle- and upper-class families do.
_	A number of South African governing bodies came to the defence of Semenya, saying the athlete had been treated unfairly, and world record holder Michael Johnson was highly critical of the way that the sensitive issue had been dealt with publicly.
_	Feingold's concerns included the way that the bill was passed, aspects of the wiretapping provisions, the changes to search and seizure laws, the expanded powers under FISA that allowed law enforcement to gain access to business records and the changes to detention and deportation laws for immigrants.
_	A small piece of land, such as an island, can change the way that waves move, leading to different deposition of sediments.
_	Therefore, the way that the CAISO box spread is referred to suggests that SP is trading over NP, and SP-minus-NP is wider in 2013 than in 2012).
_	This region also happens to be some of the last of habitat of the Blakiston’s fish owl (Bubo blakistoni); along with being the world’s largest owl, it is unique in the way that it eats fish (primarily Masu salmon) and relies on old growth forests along river banks to feed, nest, and breed.
_	Gobineau was in particular struck by the way that newspapers in Halifax condemned the Royal Navy for offering generous signing up bonuses to sailors as a major problem as it forced the local ship-owners to offer higher wages to their sailors to prevent them from joining the Navy, which Gobineau used to argue that the Nova Scotians were utterly materialistic.
_	"Having worked on the "Walking Dead" TV show, I've really fallen in love with the way that TV shows are written, where a bunch of people get together and they plot stuff and people split off into their own little splinter groups and write episodes," he said.
_	Isay is considered a pioneer who changed the way that psychoanalysts view homosexuality.
_	Also, it misrepresents the way that the unaspirated consonants are actually pronounced.
_	For both local authorities and developers alike this is a significant concern because the standard of care has been drawn very highly, and could cause a rethink of the way that reclamation is carried out in the UK even though the facts of the case are historic."
_	In the way that he talks to God and that he looks at other people with deep sadness and pain, we know that he suffers greatly.
_	is the way that his characters use religious language; it is not forced, and sounds, to my ear at least, as how people who need language to express serious things, but who don't actually believe, are nonetheless forced back on the language of faith.
_	Hail may also have diminished the radar returns from storms, due to the way that X band radar energy reflects off hail.
_	They altered the way that PvP items behave when players fight, reducing crowd control abilities, and added a new PvP-focused island area called Ashran containing various objectives and battles for players to participate in.
_	However, just like those warlords, the bandits were also only interested in keeping their own power, and did not put any real effort in fighting the Communists in the way that some of the Nationalists who were still fighting for their "cause".
_	In Blackmore's definition, the way that a meme replicates is through imitation.
_	Realism claims, contrary to idealism, that perceived objects exist in the way that they appear, in and of themselves, independent of a knowing spectator's mind.
_	Picus said that voters turned against Lorenzen because of the way that the councilman had forced streetlights—and the resulting taxes—upon certain residential districts that did not want them.
_	This trip changed the way that he thought about music.
_	Before the "Convention on the Nationality of Married Women", no legislation existed to protect married women's right to retain or renounce national citizenship in the way that men could.
_	Producer and singer Joe Henry, in a 2011 interview, cited "Ode" as "an incredibly deft bit of writing in the way that that story is unfolded. …
_	The portrait of Dr. Gachet notes all the tiniest details of his appearance and depicts them in the way that van Gogh sees them.
_	A September 2012 "Nature" article featured Holt and his rare background as a research scientist: "[Holt] thinks what is equally important is having more scientific thinking, even among the non-scientists in government...[Holt states], 'I'm more interested in the way that scientists are trained to deal with uncertainty, to deal with evidence and statistical reasoning, things that are lacking in the political debate.'
_	The central figure, wearing a large straw sun-hat, was signing endless autographs, posing for photographs and exchanging friendly talk with young and old in the way that has made him as popular a cricketer as has ever visited Australia".
_	Lois, feeling a bit guilty for the way she acted, admits she was not supportive of Peter's work, and also admits that the show must have been good in the way that people found it entertaining.
_	One study has shown that extremely thin and extremely heavy models both have a negative effect on the way that some might see their own bodies.
_	John Veitch could not dismiss his colt and his ability because of the way that he closed strongly at the end of the Derby.
_	This is similar to the way that the nobility in earlier times could stage private musical performances or the use of domestic theatres in large homes to perform private plays in earlier centuries.
_	Files recalls that he felt honoured to be asked to rejoin the Andersons for another production following "Captain Scarlet", and that he was "tickled pink" to be performing with Davies, adding, "I hated the way that so many so-called producers wouldn't meet his eye.
_	Pratim D. Gupta of The Telegraph compared "Dhobi Ghat" with Satyajit Ray's "Charulata" in the way that the five characters, including Mumbai, operate like a string quintet.
_	Hence, the way that organisations respond can have a bearing on winning customers in the long term.
_	As another historian, Shen Yue, pointed out, Emperor Wen modelled his military planning on those of Emperor Guangwu of Han, but lacked Emperor Guangwu's military command abilities, and therefore could not draft proper military plans the way that Emperor Guangwu did.
_	Nettles apologized about the confusion in an interview with "Entertainment Weekly", saying "That's really our fault for the way that we explained it, to be honest.
_	This is not consistent with the way that the film was actually marketed.
_	He collaborated with other prominent economists to form the 1929 Young Plan to modify the way that war reparations were paid after Germany's economy was destabilizing under the Dawes Plan.
_	This is known as Phase I metabolism, similar to the way that the human liver increases the polarity of drugs and foreign compounds (drug metabolism).
_	He compared this effect to the way that various carbohydrate chains form.
_	For example, the modern version conclusive form of the classical verb ("k-u" "to come") is ("k-uru"), but the modern form is given in the table as ("k-u"), which is the way that a modern Japanese writer would write the "classical" Japanese word, rather than the way they would write the "modern" Japanese word.
_	In many monotheist religions, God is addressed as the father, in part because of his active interest in human affairs, in the way that a father would take an interest in his children who are dependent on him and as a father, he will respond to humanity, his children, acting in their best interests.
_	Differences in experience can greatly shape the way that we observe and engage with the world around us.
_	The criteria for seniority, used in this article, are derived from the way that the Father of the House is selected.
_	Introduction of machinery to the threshing process, and the way that the pedal-powered thresher is used have conflicted with cultural beliefs or practices in some cases.
_	It was wrong of them to ask the questions, and wrong, wrong, wrong of me to answer them the way that I did."
_	In a piece written for "Slate" and published in April 2017, Lorenzo Newman noted the similarities in the career trajectories between the two men - "Both grew their fortunes on allegedly mafia-linked real-estate developments, transitioned into successful careers as media moguls, and, against all odds, ascended to the helm of their respective national governments" - but also highlighted their shared tendency to question and undermine established institutions such as the judiciary and the press, the way that neither of them had been accepted by their countries' respective establishments despite their wealth, and how they channelled the resulting resentment into a populist form of politics by "portraying themselves as everymen, if not in wealth, then in language, tone (and) aspirations".
_	It is much like the UZI in the way that the magazine is located on the grip.
_	Several other critics praised the way that the film had kept the tone of James's story and the subtle approach to horror.
_	Salamanders are usually considered to have no voice and do not use sound for communication in the way that frogs do; however, in mating system they communicate by pheromone signaling; some species can make quiet ticking or popping noises, perhaps by the opening and closing of valves in the nose.
_	Her work is realist in the way that Rembrandt and Goya are realist.
_	The media reported that in an August 2017 YouGov survey of 2,025 British Jews, 83% of respondents thought the Labour party was too tolerant of antisemitism whereas 19% thought the same of the Conservative party; the study's authors noted that since Labour voters "are less likely to be anti-Semitic than other voters, so the cause of British Jews' discontentment with the party must be the way that it has very publicly failed to robustly deal with the anti-Semites in its ranks." 36% felt anti-Semitism was tolerated in the Liberal Democrats, while 41% said the same for the UK Independence Party (UKIP) and 40% for the Green Party.
_	Ho ho ho is the way that many languages write out how Santa Claus laughs.
_	Experienced objects exist, in the way that they appear, only in experience.
_	They do not exist, in the way that they appear, apart from a spectator's thoughts.
_	Snefru made use of this in the way that he had several posts for trade, military practices, and even slaveholders.
_	As judges "have seen it all before" and the lawyers on both sides "have seen them seeing it", as they can read the judge's previous ruling (which includes written reasoning for the previous verdict), the way that the judge thinks and argues is very predictable.
_	According to Sansone and Morgan, when students are already motivated to engage in an activity for their own personal pleasure and then a teacher provides the student with feedback, the type of feedback given can change the way that student views the activity and can even undermine their intrinsic motivation.
_	Waktu Lima ("five times") is similar to mainstream Islam, but more orthodox in the way that it tries to eliminate Wetu Telu.
_	The Foreign Policy in Focus's co-director John Feffer reviewed "Occupy" for the group's website, asserting that "What makes Chomsky's perspective so interesting, aside from the wealth of his political experience, is the range of his interests", evident through the way that he brings in examples from across the world.
_	Conchoidal fracture describes the way that brittle materials break or fracture when they do not follow any natural planes of separation.
_	Brave for its candor and enlightening for the social context it provides,” while IndieWire posited that the film was “fun and gossipy in the way that great documentaries about Hollywood often are, but it also speaks to a deeper truth about identity and perseverance and the large divide between one's personal and professional life.
_	It is in some sense a ghost story in the way that the novel is about a group of people telling an old but unsettling tale.
_	When the movie "Moneyball" was adapted from the book, DePodesta did not approve of the way that his character was being portrayed.
_	The manager of Rin'Go was unhappy with the way that the 2013 contest was judged and the technical standards of the contest.
_	The aftertouch feature allows keyboard players to change the tone or sound of a note after it is struck, the way that singers, wind players, or bowed instrument players can do.
_	Kant investigated the way that empirical "a posteriori" concepts are created.
_	Badland said that Babe is "quite Dickensian in the way that she finds things and slips them into her pocket to use against people!"
_	a full 18 months after the London opening, the piece has not dated the way that newspaper accounts of the same history already have. …
_	These beams strike the Earth at very regular intervals, similarly to the way that the rotating beam of a lighthouse means that an observer sees the lighthouse blink, and can be observed as a highly regular series of pulses.
_	Gossip protocols can be used to propagate information in a manner rather similar to the way that a viral infection spreads in a biological population.
_	The radar-time definition of extended-simultaneity further facilitates visualization of the way that acceleration curves spacetime for travelers in the absence of any gravitating objects.
_	The Doctor reveals that as he continued to travel with Ian, he grew more and more fond of the pair, and decided to try and be more like them after they had left, taking more youthful companions and began to see the universe in a way much closer to the way that they had.
_	In studies he conducted at Marine Biological Laboratory, the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution and other facilities around the world, Wolken did extensive research on deep sea animals, investigating the way that their lenses were constructed to allow them to see in the near-complete darkness in waters up to deep.
_	These distinctions may represent a certain degree of variation in the way that Gnostic cosmology was woven into a Christian context.
_	Croce suggested that "expression" is central in the way that beauty was once thought to be central.
_	A. O. Scott of "The New York Times" particularly praised the way that the interviews of the victims were shot writing, "Mr. Gibney films them, against dark backgrounds with soft, indirect light, emphasizes the expressivity of their faces and hands, and will remind hearing viewers of the richness and eloquence of American Sign Language."
_	The book is highly experimental in the way that it is structured.
_	He also added that he thought "the thing that's probably been more of an impact on me is just when we haven't performed the way that we want to, the way that I feel like we should, you just feel like you're disappointing people.
_	The "weak" form is the position that interaction is simply the way that learners find learning opportunities, whether or not they make productive use of them.
_	Geekwire criticized the way that the film oversimplified Atari's downfall, but awarded it an overall positive review, saying "It’s still a great story, and definitely worth watching."
_	"The result is a documentary that is rare in the way that it leads us deep into the emotions and turmoil of a family over the course of several years.
_	Subsequent discourse has failed to clarify whether contemporary music journals and fanzines conventionally understood "post-punk" the way that it was discussed in later years.
_	She was the appropriate deity to pray to for maintaining the water supply, in the way that Liber provided wine or Ceres bread.
_	That syllabus and the way that it is examined is modelled on the national exam of the target nation.
_	He has made contributions to our understanding of the brain mechanisms that represent the form and motion of objects, and the way that these mechanisms contribute to perceptual judgments and visually guided movement.
_	Our world is full of ideas about the way that humans should live.
_	In the 19th century companies and manufactures began to change the way that they promoted their products.
_	The term, which has been summarized as "product sent back", developed in the early 2000s, is also used to describe "the way that migrants own and build homes in the country of origin."
_	"The Admirer and The Admired" studies the way that objects from foreign cultures are often left out of major museum exhibits and how the subtle visuals of an exhibit are the first thing that audiences notice when viewing an exhibition.
_	They began the collaboration after recognizing a common interest in the way that forms are displayed and arranged in different museum spaces.
_	Karma also influences the way that citizens view Cole in addition to altering Cole's appearance and certain aspects of the game's story.
_	I saw that the lies that I told about others — my wanting my family, or Ellen (his second wife), or anyone else, to be different from the way that they are -- came from lies that I told about myself -- my wanting to be different from the way that I was."
_	In fact, this project did not work out the way that they wanted it to be.
_	where the operator acting on a wave function yields that wave function multiplied by the value , in an analogous fashion to the way that the position operator acting on a wave function yields that wave function multiplied by the value "x".
_	Aggravated, Atherton takes Woodville to his laboratory for a demonstration, picking up a stray cat on the way that he fantasizes to belong to Lessingham.
_	Another evidence of the recency effect is found in the way that participants initiate recall of a list: they most often start with terminal (recent) list items (an early description of the recency effect in the probability of first recall can be found in Hogan, 1975).
_	It's what electronic instruments want to do and really can't in the way that the steel cellos can do.
_	However, these colonies are seldom if ever founded by a single founder (in the way that animals and plants are founded by single cells), which presents a number of theoretical issues.
_	Everleth especially lauded the characterization, both visually and in their objectives, writing they are "unable to escape their fates, in the way that many of us can feel pushed and pulled around by our own emotions."
_	In 1997 he began to write a series of letters to the editor of a local newspaper, the "Quesnel Cariboo Observer", disagreeing with the way that homosexuality was being presented in the curriculum.
_	This requirement made it difficult to quickly find a group of strangers to play with — the way that online games are most commonly played today.
_	The colorful "tipsy coachman" label comes from a 19th-century Georgia case, Lee v. Porter, 63 Ga 345, 346 (1879), in which the Georgia Supreme Court, noting that the "human mind is so constituted that in many instances it finds the truth when wholly unable to find the way that leads to it," quoted from Oliver Goldsmith's "Retaliation: A Poem" written in 1774:
_	Are you still struggling the way that I am?"
_	Liang is best known for the way that he died, committing suicide in a spectacular fashion as a final act of defiance against Shanxi's Communist invaders.
_	Towards the end of inhalation the bellows bottoms out and activates an addition valve, in much the way that a regulator diaphragm activates the demand valve, to make up the gas discharged by the inner bellows.
_	The artillery revolution in Europe caught on during the Hundred Years' War and changed the way that battles were fought.
_	There is a difference in the way that quasiparticles and collective excitations are intuitively envisioned.
_	Commoner examined the relationship between poverty and population growth, disagreeing with the way that relationship is often formulated.
_	"In the moment that we took him out of the country, in the way that he was taken out, there is a crime.
_	Prior design guidelines from Microsoft had not done much to address the issue of how user interface text is phrased, and as such, the way that information and requests are presented to the user had not been consistent between parts of the operating system.
_	I was brand new here and I wasn’t happy with the way that turned out, and it came back in about 5 or 6 episodes.
_	The Chess 'n Math rating system does not differ from that of the FIDE a lot in the way that the formula is derived, but the variables are different.
_	Harvey has called on the Australian Therapeutic Goods Administration (TGA) "to ban inaccurate, misleading or unethical promotion of medicines", and is a strong critic of the way that therapeutic claims of complementary medicines are regulated.
_	In the proposed redefinition of SI base units scheduled for adoption at the 26th General Conference on Weights and Measures (CGPM) on 16 November 2018, the definition of the kelvin will be changed to one based on a fixed, exact numerical value of the Boltzmann constant, similar to the way that the speed of light was given an exact numerical value at the 17th CGPM in 1983.
_	I only know the way that has worked for us that's what I know how to do," emphasizing the idea that Batman exists in a world where he is the only superhero and a similar approach to the "Man of Steel" would assure the integrity needed for the film.
_	Finally, the way that threats are presented to the public plays a large role in how those threats are addressed.
_	The name comes from the way that the pawns cause the gold (or golds) to move around as if they were dancing in their futile attempt to escape capture.
_	Because of the way that Cuyp painted his subjects bathed in light, it is hypothesized that he worked in Utrecht, which took many of its artistic cues from Baroque Italy.
_	The Prussian Secret Police, however, did not routinely engage in persecution or the abuse of police powers, and did not behave in the way that other secret police forces might.
_	Unhappy with the way that these sessions were heading, the band relocated back to Random Recordings – the Nottingham studio they had previously used to record their early demo tapes.
_	However, Kurosawa did not want to smother the young actor's immense vitality, and Mifune's rebellious character electrified audiences in much the way that Marlon Brando's defiant stance would startle American film audiences a few years later.
_	Typically it’s framed the way that things were so bad for people that they had to consider suicide.
_	This, along with grooming and licking of the host foundresses and workers, is thought to be the way that the "P. sulcifer" queen camouflages herself in the host cuticular hydrocarbons.
_	His family group portraits are often faceless, which Alston states is the way that white America views blacks.
_	Metabolites of paracetamol (acetaminophen) have been demonstrated to bind to the TRPA1 receptors (probably agonism which then can lead to desensitization of TRPA1 receptors in the way that capsaicin does it in the spinal cord of mice, causing an antinociceptive effect.
_	Recently, Guth and Brabham examined the way that ideas compete within a crowdsourcing platform, providing a model about the relationships among design ideas, communication, and platform.
_	This was an aspect of his attempts to influence the way that Australian Settler society understood Aboriginal society.
_	In a separate review on AllMusic, William Ruhlmann explains "the result was a record that had nothing to do with pop music trends in 1975, which was exactly the way that Bennett wanted it.
_	These customizations can include tweaks to built-in game settings, content that is downloaded by clients when they join the game, and new code which changes the way that the server behaves.
_	Legacy and the family history are central to the way that Guy raises George and are recurring themes throughout the film.
_	"JFK" marked a fundamental change in the way that Stone constructed his films: a subjective lateral presentation of the plot, with the editing's rhythm carrying the story.
_	Post-publication of this document changed the way that medieval society treated anyone who performed anything considered an act of magic or witchcraft.
_	While this extreme appears unrealistic, it actually reflects reality in the way that many voters become disenfranchised and apathetic if they see no candidates they approve of.
_	Esham is quoted as saying ""Sacrificial Lambz" and my whole style and just the way that I rap has been a sacrifice to the industry.
_	As optical instruments, conventional slit lamp biomicroscopes do not natively record or document exam findings in the way that imaging devices, such as OCT, MRI or CT, do by storing images.
_	They are constantly innovating the way that the Internet is used and how it impacts their people.
_	In addition, new traditions are being (re-)invented in the way that Ancient Macedonian holidays are added or existing holidays expanded with Ancient Macedonian features and/or new ceremonies.
_	The character was adopted by citizens of New England from 1783 to 1815, when Brother Jonathan became a nickname for any Yankee sailor, similar to the way that G.I. is used to describe members of the U.S. Army.
_	This is not surprising given that speech does not stay at fixed intervals in the way that tones in music do.
_	Another study showed that exercise can change the way that genes are expressed in muscle cells.
_	Due to his recovery not going the way that Kentucky desired, Bowie sat out the 1982–83 season as well and was forced to use a medical redshirt.
_	It’s hip-hop, the way that she approaches it rhythmically, she’s got so many jazz influences.
_	Attenborough were jointly profiled in the second of a three-part BBC Two series, "The Way We Went Wild", about television wildlife presenters and were described as being largely responsible for the way that the British and much of the world views wildlife.
_	However, during the 2007 season prior to a game in Richmond, Clark had been introduced to a Korean scout who was in attendance and stated that he liked the way that Clark played.
_	It is noteworthy for the way that Burney employed her rhetorical skills in the name of tolerance and human compassion.
_	"Incorporated" territories are a part of the United States, though not of any particular constituent state, and as are not readily saleable or cessionable to other powers in the way that "unincorporated" territories are.
_	The film was praised by "Discourse" for the way that it demonstrates "the dangers of increasingly aggressive copyright legislation."
_	Loughlin observes that this is suggestive of homosexuality on Ash's part, although he is revealed to be far stranger than that when he attempts to kill Ripley with the pornographic magazine, an act which is both an echo of the way that the alien "facehugger" infests its victims, and a sexual symbol of phallic penetration and rape by an android that, even if he did have a phallus (which is not specified in the film) would probably have been sexually non-functional.
_	Detroit had seen the way that Leswick would go after Howe and knew that took guts.
_	It was typical of the way that publisher Ziff-Davis conducted its business over the nine years of its presence in the UK.
_	I made a comment about the way that girls were dressing at Warped Tour to remind them to respect themselves, and [subsequently] had a huge uproar of people that were offended by the comment.
_	It has also been thought to cause problems for our understanding of the way that mental states cause behavior.
_	Also located on the property are a barn, a garage, an outhouse, and two wooden sheds; as all were built or rebuilt in the twentieth century, they do not contribute to the house's significance in the way that the previous house sites and the tanning pits do.
_	If the combination of two violins, viola and cello was not unknown before Haydn, when it occurred in chamber music it was more likely through circumstance than conscious design; certainly the string quartet enjoyed no recognized status as an ensemble in the way that two violins with basso continuo – the so-called 'trio sonata' – had for more than a hundred years.
_	I am convinced that Poe indeed wrote his poem "The Raven" in the way that he indicated."
_	However, arithmetic coding has not superseded Huffman the way that Huffman supersedes Shannon–Fano, both because arithmetic coding is more computationally expensive and because it is covered by multiple patents.
_	This is parallel to the way that some greenhouses are called "hothouses" to emphasize their higher temperature, achieved either by the solar effects alone or by auxiliary heating via a heater or HVAC system of some kind.
_	Jungen realized the significance of ‘display’ to the colonial ideology and the way that museums of anthropology have historicized and “mythologized” Indigenous culture as a way of maintaining colonial domination.
_	The connections between the different types of entertainment are shown by the way that stories like this inspire a retelling in another medium, such as music, film or games.
_	If the way that DNA is wrapped around the histones changes, gene expression can change as well.
_	It also invited all United Nations Member States, organizations of the United Nations system and other international and regional organizations, professional associations and broadcasting unions, as well as civil society, including non-governmental organizations and individuals, to duly celebrate World Radio Day, in the way that each considers most adequate.
_	Effective altruism encourages individuals to consider all causes and actions and to act in the way that brings about the greatest positive impact, based upon their values.
_	Different types of looms are most often defined by the way that the weft, or pick, is inserted into the warp.
_	This is done in a way similar to the way that the main character in "Quantum Leap", "Sam", travels from body to body, and there is a different athlete featured in every episode.
_	In December 2013, Montag stated that she and Conrad have "talked a few times" since the series' conclusion, elaborating that "it's unfortunate things happened the way that it did, but we're both different people now, older and more mature."
_	"Road Rage" was received positively by the press, with particular praise given to the way that Matthews rolled the r's in the chorus of the song.
_	They hoped to spark changes in Massachusetts law to require lifeguards at hotel pools, in the way that law in New York City already did.
_	Toronyi-Lalic comments on the way that "the unfamiliar harmonies that Reich is forced to play with liberates him to explore a more dramatic palette.
_	Due to problems with the way that the genus "Oreodoxa" had been applied by taxonomists, Cook proposed that the name "Roystonea" (in honour of American general Roy Stone) in 1900 be applied to the royal palms.
_	Most probably, this happens because of the way that the human ear adapted to filter out the background noise from signals (visual, acoustic, tactile etc.) in order to show one signal disturbed by noise as one event, not several.
_	Both the QMCI and SQMCI are similar to the MCI in the way that they are graded on a 1 (extremely tolerant) to 10 (highly intolerant) scale.
_	However, they differ in the way that MCI is calculated using presence-absence data whereas QMCI uses quantitative or percentage data.
_	The author(s)/editor(s) of John may have known the synoptics, but did not use them in the way that Matthew and Luke used Mark.
_	The early 1990s were to see two important changes in the way that the company worked: firstly, in 1991, with the formation of the "Artistic Associates of The Australian Opera", a body of people was created which comprised some of the most important figures in the Australian musical and performing arts world.
_	Although the F-35B is fully capable of performing vertical landing, in a similar fashion to the way that the Harrier and Sea Harrier operated, this method of operation places limitations on the loads that the aircraft is capable of returning to the ship with.
_	As the knights (later, nobles - the szlachta class) started to acquire privileges, some of them began to change the way that the "pospolite ruszenie" functioned.
_	In the Langer lab, Karp was inspired by another lab's publication in "Nature" that described adhesives based on the way that gecko's feet stick to surfaces; he and Langer applied for funding from NSF to make medical adhesives based on geckos, and received the funding.
_	By July 18 he was able to write that he had regained his abilities with the exception of tying "my neck tie in the way that I have done for the past 20 years...
_	I promise you, folks, "Spartan" is bad—both in the way that only David Mamet can be bad and in a heap of others.
_	The problem is not in the tool itself, but in the way that people use it—which is partly a result of how institutions promote misuse.
_	The antinomy cannot be prevented as long as objects (mere appearances) of the sensible world are considered to be things–in–themselves (objects apart from the way that they appear).
_	NCVYS has committed itself to three values which guide the organisation in the way that it works.
_	However, if one changes coordinates, the way that coefficients change depends on the variance of the object, and one cannot ignore the distinction; see covariance and contravariance of vectors.
_	Paramount eventually agreed to modify the way that both shows gathered information for their stories.
_	The Journal of Consumer Affairs remarked upon the variety of topics that the book explored: the rise of ad campaigns for major American products in the foreign-language press; the rise of the summer vacation among working people; installment-buying as a way for working families to obtain expensive furnishings such as pianos; the role of Jewish women as agents of assimilation through their control over family purchases; and the way that American abundance altered religious rituals, especially holidays such as Chanukah and Passover.
_	She further commented that "I was doing cocaine...and I didn't really know what I was doing, and I was very angry about the way that my career had gone in the industry...the opportunities that I had and had not been given...
_	"I was satisfied with the way that my character was written out," she said.
_	Marissa Higgins, writing for xoJane, contended that the show "didn't accomplish anything with their portrayal of sexual assault" and said that she disliked the way that the story ended with Doggett effectively quitting her job as van driver in order to avoid further contact with Coates.
_	Um, however – the way that you present yourself, the actions you take, the comments that you make can lend themselves to having a 'beef' or having animosity."
_	These input actions can be used to control both the information being represented or the way that the information is presented.
_	In 2008 APA became a focus of congressional investigations regarding the way that money from the pharmaceutical industry can shape the practices of nonprofit organizations that purport to be independent in their viewpoints and actions.
_	What grips the reader is the way that Smith draws us deeper into Elisabeth’s world […] and the way the amiable, big-hearted Daniel triangulates and illuminates these lives."
_	She wants to show people light in the way that she sees it-as a potent, versatile, mysterious art form.
_	They worked on the title design for months, syncing it to the song "Jade" the way that the images would pulsate to Yoshiki's drum beats.
_	Missions also sometimes acted as though they were quarantining Chinese converts from the surrounding society (due to the pressure and hostility of family and friends against conversion), and the way that they were separated helped fuel bad rumours among Chinese about what the Christians were actually doing.
_	Gatiss says that they wanted to "fetishise modern London in the way that the period versions fetishise Victorian London".
_	Together with his wife and partner, Denise Scott Brown, he has helped shape the way that architects, planners and students experience and think about architecture and the American-built environment.
_	More generally, the way that an air distribution system causes ventilation to flow into and out of a space impacts the ability for a particular ventilation rate to remove internally generated pollutants.
_	It involves compiling minutely detailed inventories and diagrams of the way that species are grouped on the cave walls; of their gender, frequency, and position; and of their relation to the signs and handprints that often appear close to them.
_	The passage of Proposition 14 changed the way that elections are conducted for all statewide offices in California (including the Governor and other executive positions, members of the State Legislature, and members of the State Board of Equalization), as well as for United States Senators and members of the United States House of Representatives.
_	During World War II, first, Hilliard served in the Women's Army Auxiliary Corps (WAAC), where she headed up a secret Army experiment to determine the way that women might be used in an anti-aircraft battery.
_	Throughout the 1970s and 1980s, the member clinics and activists throughout the country participated in the women's health movement, changing the way that women receive health care services in the United States.
_	The easiest way of achieving this, and the way that minimizes losses along the transmission line, is for both the source and load to be real, that is, pure resistances, equal to the characteristic impedance of the transmission line.
_	A way; a path; being at the head; the way that leads to; a thoroughfare on all sides.
_	The reason for the different names was partly regional but also because the prognosis of the disease was different for individuals with each due to the way that it was treated in that region.
_	Warren Buffett believes that the directors should face consequences of their mistakes the way that other shareholders do.
_	Just caution came out at the wrong time, and we didn't get to make up the ground on the racetrack under green, where Dale was pitted and the way that they came out of the pits just didn't time out well.
_	Fenlon praised the way that Forster had dealt with the physical presence that Hearts had in their attacking line.
_	A fluent German and French speaker, he particularly admired the way that the Germans had reconstructed their country and developed a peaceful, stable and well-run political system in the aftermath of 1945.
_	Leonardo's study of plants, resulting in many beautiful drawings in his notebooks, was not to record in diagramatic form the parts of the plant, but rather, as an artist and observer to record the precise appearance of plants, the manner of growth and the way that individual plants and flowers of a single variety differed from one another.
_	Human activity has large effects on the terrestrial biosphere, changing the way that it acts as a carbon reservoir.
_	At the time of the ban she said the article was "defendable in that it highlights a very important issue", but when "Critic" interviewed her in 2012 she called it "a mistake to publish that particular article the way that we did".
_	Kennedy's Primer was so widely used and was so influential that this led to a permanent change in the way that Latin is taught in the UK.
_	Typical of this was the way that venereal disease was constructed as being spread by prostitutes rather than their largely male clients.
_	The exterior access was fulfilled by a slight descending reaching the way that is still used today to enter in the town.
_	The characteristic might be so salient that it could dominate the way that members of that clique are perceived and treated by other peers regardless of the individual differences that each member has.
_	In September 2015, the FCA changed the way that Gap Insurance premiums are sold by car dealers in the UK.
_	To demonstrate the new prowess, and the way that their expertise spread between aviation and motoring, in 1931 Alfa Romeo organized a race between an Alfa Romeo 8C 3000 Monza driven by Tazio Nuvolari and a Caproni Ca.100, also Alfa Romeo powered.
_	The time signatures and the way it was all put together, the way that the bass led most of it, and Chris filled in on guitar round the edges, and then there was this floating melody line over the top that Mick always used to do."
_	On Mee’s website, "the (re)making project", he says “There is no such thing as an original play.” and that his plays are “composed in the way that Max Ernst made his Fatagaga pieces toward the end of World War I: texts have often been taken from, or inspired by, other texts.”
_	In addition to these factors of the dam’s construction, the way that the power generated by the hydroelectric plant in the dam is distributed also speaks to American interests.
_	On October 29, 2012,—ironically, the 83rd anniversary of "Black Tuesday," the culmination of the disastrous Wall Street Crash of 1929—Wall Street was disrupted when New York and New Jersey, an area not normally known as a hotbed of hurricane activity the way that areas much further south are, were blasted by Hurricane Sandy.
_	The representative of South Africa took exception to the way that one proposal was held more worthy than the other as well as the lack of participation outside the Group of Friends in the drafting of the resolution.
_	After he was fired by the New England Patriots, Carroll read a book by former UCLA basketball coach John Wooden which heavily influenced how he would run his future program at USC: emulating Wooden, Carroll decided to engineer his program in the way that best exemplified his personal philosophy.
_	Mora's words especially focused on the way that Faber's own wife was a vocal admirer of Calderón, and that she ran an ultra-Catholic tertulia in Cádiz.
_	It is indicated throughout Niven's works that humans ("Homo sapiens") that have turned into protectors are far more intelligent than their Pak ("Homo habilis") counterparts (in much the way that humans are more intelligent than the primates they evolved from).
_	Other human rights organisations criticised the way that the attack had been continued after the train had been struck by the first strike.
_	Musings on "trophies" contrasts the way that some need a physical specimen to prove their conquest into the wilderness, though photographs may be less damaging than a trophy head to be mounted on the wall.
_	Leopold also rails against the way that policy makers need to find an economic motive for conservation.
_	Yoko Yoshikawa wrote on behalf of The Heat Is On Miss Saigon Coalition that they were outraged by the way that it perpetuated the idea that Asian women were self-erasing and Asian men were contemptible.
_	The players are asked how many innings they want to play and if they need a designated hitter prior to starting the game among other options like an optional digitized voice (for all the umpire's decisions) and the way that the game is viewed (front or back).
_	He abandoned the album when he realised that "I wasn't proud of the songs I was writing, and I was performing the music because I liked the way that people reacted rather than because I was proud of the songs."
_	Later, decided to enable more methods and classes, discovering on the way that many features weren't supported by the code generator and extension itself.
_	An analytic study of the way that people interpret symbols comes down to an investigation of the mechanism captured by the diagram:
_	Some of Bates's other major contributions included demonstrating that distinct characteristics of different languages determine the way that the brain organizes this information and incorporates it during development, adulthood, and in cases of disease, and illuminating the profound and lasting links between language and evolutionarily more ancient non-linguistic skills.
_	Every sport has a different governing body that can define the way that the sport operates through its affiliated clubs and societies.
_	The underlying theme of the film is the way that Hergé's private life affected his work; for example, Bianca Castafiore is a subconscious (or perhaps conscious) reflection of Georges' first wife, Germaine, and the way that Captain Haddock responds to her reflects the way Georges often felt towards his wife.
_	She says the way that radical feminists describe characteristics of men- competitive, rationalistic, dominating- are much like the characteristics of capitalistic society.
_	This section of the book also examines the power dynamics that the biomedical field possesses in governing the way that women make choices.
_	For these mothers, authoritative knowledge is perpetuated by the ultrasound machine and the way that these women rely on it.
_	Lewis and Lewis (1997) identified five segments based on the way that consumers use the Internet in the purchase decision process:
_	The word testimony describes the way that Friends "testify" or "bear witness" to their beliefs in their everyday life.
_	Promotoras have gained significant importance in the way that care is delivered in the United States for Latinos in the last two decades.
_	Recent work on Rupert's role as a commander has also highlighted the progress the prince made in formulating the way that orders were given to the British fleet.
_	Early theories focused on the way that gender influenced communication and many argued that language was "man made".
_	According to Jacques Ellul, "the aim is not to even modify people’s ideas on a given subject, rather, it is to achieve conformity in the way that people act."
_	"Joe had love but he didn't have the attention in the way that he got it from Danny.
_	I want to be respected in terms of the way that I treat people...
_	However Kota tells her that the only reason he met with her was to apologise for the way that he had left her.
_	However, Spinoza also held that everything must necessarily happen the way that it does.
_	He discussed the three pillars that he sustains: redefining the way that Romania is working, agriculture and developing the working field.
_	"In spite of a great cast and production team, Paradox did not find its audience in the way that we had hoped".
_	This war was unique in the way that it did not involve the issue of Kashmir, but was rather precipitated by the crisis created by the political battle between Sheikh Mujib, Leader of East Pakistan and Yahya-Bhutto, leaders of West Pakistan brewing in erstwhile East Pakistan culminating in the declaration of Independence of Bangladesh from the state system of Pakistan.
_	There are many different theories about the nature of emotion and the way that it is represented in the brain and body.
_	When he was in his early 20s, Whinney volunteered with a small conservation foundation in Southern Belize that was looking at the way that communities cultivated their crops.
_	This prince was once very powerful […]; although the grand lama who is called Dalai Lama stayed in Poutala, that our travellers called variously Botala, Lassa and Barantola, he was still not the temporal sovereign of the land; it was Tsan pa who then ruled, and who lost the crown in the way that I will recount.
_	I since migrated to the color commentary position much in the way that Jesse Ventura did before me."
_	"Comic Book Resources" highly praised White Diamond, calling her "terrifying in the way that some of the strange and beautiful cosmic entities of DC and Marvel comics are.
_	Digital technologies are also changing the way that consumers pay for goods and services.
_	"Maximum" commented that "as well as the extensive storyline, what really makes Riddle stand out from the crowd is the way that it looks and sounds."
_	When Zhu founded the Ming dynasty and became historically known as the Hongwu Emperor, Liu was one of his most trusted advisors, but the relationship between Liu and the emperor eventually deteriorated in a manner similar to the way that Liu had become estranged from the Yuan government.
_	Louis, Colbert and other French leaders were envious of the way that the gold and silver of the New World had allowed Spain to afford a powerful military, and very much wanted New France to play the same role for them.
_	It was the first recording of the piece that used the "sprechstimme" in the way that Schoenberg had conceived the piece.
_	I think people react so strongly because Jenny is just a mess in the way that so many people are."
_	At the speed of sound, the way that lift is generated changes dramatically, from being dominated by Bernoulli's principle to forces generated by shock waves.
_	Amnesty International has criticized the way that the Israeli state is dealing with the regional water resources:
_	UNIT is also referred to in the serial "The Lost Boy", where UNIT used its political clout to pull strings with the London police to have its former quasi-member Sarah Jane Smith (Sarah was never an official employee of UNIT in the way that her two predecessors were) released without charge after she was arrested for alleged child abduction.
_	Extraneous cognitive load is the mental effort imposed by the way that the task is delivered, which may or may not be efficient (for example, finding the math problem you are supposed to solve on a page that also contains advertisements for books about math).
_	And he walked in all the way that his father walked in, and served the idols that his father served, and worshipped them."
_	Goldsworthy continues to say that "her body of work [over four decades] adds up to a protracted study in the way that full-scale violence and tragedy can flower extravagantly from the withered seeds of malice and resentment ...
_	The aerosphere is viewed as habitat and the way that organisms respond to and take advantage of the dynamic aeroscape has relevance to the ecology, evolution, and conservation of many of the world's bird, bat, insect, and plant species.
_	Ocean acidification has been shown to alter the way that pelagic larvae are able to process information and production of the cues themselves.
_	It is important to study the object not necessarily for the sake of categorization or understanding the way that it is played or how it works but the meaning that it holds for the musician and the audience.
_	Molded in the way that Menudo, Los Chicos and Los Chamos were, but mimicking the fashion style of contemporary American boy bands like No Authority, Backstreet Boys and Hanson.
_	Affleck's crash also changed the way that the protective window nettings are constructed on both NASCAR and ARCA cars to this very day.
_	The proverb appears to have been used in the sense of one's actions having inevitable future ramifications, the way that Sunday inevitably follows Saturday.
_	If approved, 54 constitutional reforms were to be implemented, among which the reform of the way that the Constitution itself could be reformed, the restriction of state of emergency dispositions, the affirmation of political pluralism, the strengthening of constitutional rights as well as of the democratic principle and participation to the political life.
_	Some modern and experimental comb designs are complex in the way that they direct the air.
_	He plays guitar the way that nobody else in the world plays guitar," adding that Primal Scream considered Shields to be "part of the family, very much so."
_	The new phyletic approach changed the way that taxonomists considered plant classification, incorporating evolutionary information into their schemata, but this did little to further define the circumscription of Liliaceae.
_	This essay takes a particular focus on the way that a more medicalized way of birth has been resisted, specifically by birth activists, in this part of the world.
_	Dramatic distancing refers to the way that emotional and psychological problems can be accessed easier through metaphor.
_	Often portrayed as rich, McSwine sometimes competes with Scrooge for some type of prize in much the way that Flintheart Glomgold or John D. Rockerduck also do.
_	These receivers were powered by solar panels, going back towards Maubrey’s original ideas, and these receivers picked up radio waves by the way that the dancers positioned their bodies in sunlight.
_	Look at his regal cowboy hat, his spiffy red cowboy boots, and the way that cigarette nonchalantly dangles from his lips – doesn't Jeff remind you of a figure from days of yore?
_	Additionally, to traditional Islamic exegetics, the story of the Queen of Sheba is difficult to grasp because of the way that a woman in political power falls outside of the traditional gender role of women in society.
_	Keith Settles of Indie Vision Music said that "From start to finish every song is full of worshipful content that not only will get listeners to raise their hands in praise but glorify God the way that He intended.
_	Faulks also commented that "some people find it perplexing but I think the way that the book has been presented ... is a clever way of showing that it is not my book, although, of course, it is my book."
_	He often humiliated Liu Yu by putting him in stables and feeding him the way that pigs would be fed.
_	In a later interview Covarrubias said he was "sorry that [the internment] was a part of our history" and that "under no circumstances, regardless of who they are, should people be treated in the way that people were being treated during the World War II period".
_	Lyrics, music and stage performance appear to be equally important elements of the way that Lollobrigida band communicates with its audience.
_	Shimmer is beautiful in the way that a collapsing building is; more beautiful, because throughout it you can cling to the hope that the building will somehow put itself back together."
_	Innovation, however, can achieve advantage in product or process that results in a fundamental transformation in the way that type of business is conducted.
_	Our adversaries are changing the way that they communicate."
_	There were widespread protests across the Isle of Wight about the poor performance of AET and the way that AET were behaving with the Island's schools, leading to a demand that AET should be removed from managing all schools on the Isle of Wight, including Ryde Academy.
_	Research has examined the way that having either elevated or reduced power effects social interactions and well-being in social situations.
_	Both the ZX81 and its predecessor, the ZX80, have a significant drawback in the way that they handle visual output.
_	Insurance can have various effects on society through the way that it changes who bears the cost of losses and damage.
_	On allowing directors and writers to work within Marvel's shared universe concept, Joe Russo said that Feige has "big pieces that he knows he wants to build towards, but the way that you get there is open to interpretation and improv a little bit."
_	Attachment styles that people develop as children can influence the way that they interact with partners in adult relationships, with secure attachment styles being associated with healthier and more trusting relationships than avoidant or anxious attachment styles.
_	The ten songs on the album mark a departure from their older songs in the way that all the songs have a particular and serious meaning behind them.
_	Modern work on the way that cell membranes self-assemble, and the work on micropores in various substrates may be a halfway house towards the development of independent free-living cells.
_	When he was 17, he studied the way that triangular and square numbers interleave, and eventually found a recursive relation describing it.
_	Such were his photographs and uniqueness, and the way that he used them, that in the opening chapters of his book "Action Stations 2 Wartime Military Airfields of Lincolnshire and the East Midlands", were a selection of control tower photos – this was the first time this had been done in any book.
_	The Breckenridges are Protestants, while the Fontaines are Catholic Louisiana Creoles, and the plot hinges on the way that pride and misfortune conspire with cultural and political differences to keep prospective lovers from marrying.
_	The song includes a reference to Stefani's fashion line, with Stefani going, "They like the way that L.A.M.B. is going 'cross my shirt".
_	It is more or less "static" in the way that it is the basic or initial particularity of a person, what makes him different from everyone else.
_	The Quietus reviewer James Ubaghs observed that:"A reoccurring feature is the way that vocal samples frequently sound like synths, and synths sound almost like vocals, on the verge of attaining sentience.
_	Of the tour, Bachmann said, "We got back and we were not real happy with the way that [the tour] went.
_	The Defense of Harbin at the start of February, that rallied Harbin in the way that had already formed militias in Fengtien, convinced local authorities and leading citizens in the hinterlands of Kirin that they should resist Japan's occupation of the province and form their own bands and militia units.
_	His direct influence was small, but his influence through pupils such as John of Salisbury was great, and his method of applying rigorous logical analysis to theology shaped the way that theological criticism developed in the period that followed.
_	In 2013, Crawford introduced a bill that would change the way that midwives are licensed in South Carolina.
_	On 7 April 1831, worn down by years of administrative turmoil and political dissent with both liberal and conservative sides of politics, including an attempt of republican secession, and unreconciled to the way that absolutists in Portugal had given in the succession of King John VI, Pedro I went to Portugal to reclaim his daughter's crown, abdicating the Brazilian throne in favor of his five-year-old son and heir (who thus became the Empire's second monarch, with the royal title of Dom Pedro II).
_	I was contracted for four months and the way that it ended is very up in the air and I'm sure that they will use me whenever they need to shake things up a bit, you know".
_	Masayuki Tokioka, president of National-Braemar (the company that had been selected by SFRA to develop the Japan Center site), is credited with the idea to include a pagoda on the site; according to a 1961 article in the "San Francisco Chronicle" covering Mayor George Christopher's request to the Japanese government for the gift of a "Pagoda for Peace", Tokioka "envisoned it as a symbol of Japanese-American friendship in the way that the gift of the Statue of Liberty enhanced Franco-American amity".
_	Enterprise bookmarking tools differ from social bookmarking tools in the way that they often have to meet taxonomy constraints.
_	Clairmont questions stereotypes, kitsch, and the way that Lewis and Clark's exploration is represented in gift shops and culture in contemporary times.
_	For others still, they see the Dharma as referring to the "truth", or the ultimate reality of "the way that things really are" (Tib. Cho).
_	On the other hand, in some cases all pilots concerned might receive a full credit to his personal score, as victories at this time were not divided fractionally, in the way that became common practice later.
_	Due to the way that the bulb is formed, with the stem emerging from a depression, it is best to plant it on its side, to prevent water causing rot at the top of the bulb.
_	Confucian thought and the government's desire to appear "civilized" influenced the way that homosexuality was viewed by both the Japanese state and by the population at large during the Meiji period.
_	Although several members of Alice's colleagues are sketched out, they don't stick in the mind in the way that, say, Jan Costin Wagner achieves so apparently effortlessly in ICE MOON, or Hakan Nesser in BORKMANN'S POINT.
_	In an interview Ure recalled the way that "music video changed after that.
_	But for him it's a place of honor, and from there, things don't go quite the way that he hopes."
_	"The Spectator" is one of the few British publications that tends to be cautious of idolising examples of popular culture, in the way that (for example) "The Daily Telegraph" did under Bill Deedes, or "The Times" did under William Haley.
_	The vertices of Feynman graphs come from the way that and from different factors in the interaction Lagrangian fit together, whereas the edges come from the way that the s and s must be moved around in order to put terms in the Dyson series on normal form.
_	The picture book details the way that moods (both bad and good) are spread through simple actions.
_	Its history provides an insight into the way that NSW defence policy reacted to changing technologies, threats and types of warfare.
_	Radford documented the way that this 'cigarette currency' was subject to Gresham's law, inflation, and especially deflation.
_	While each of the above-mentioned elements is designed to work independently as an asset for the university, it is actually the way that the various program components work together that will result in a one-of-a-kind destination for the campus, community and the surrounding region.
_	They are unique in the way that dream, reality, humour, and the absolute fantastic are mixed.
_	While there’s not much actual burlesque action in the film, Deacon does employ a whole lot of seductive teasing, but just not in the way that may be expected."
_	Evolutionary psychology provides several possible explanations for why humans typically respond to social dynamics in the way that they do, including possible functions of self-esteem in relation to dominance hierarchies.
_	The liquid is sucked up back to the evaporator by capillary action, similar to the way that a sponge sucks up water when an edge is placed in contact with a pool of water.
_	"Mad Men" has always been about the relentless march of history, about the way that time waits for no man.
_	None of these lamps are known to have featured sequential substitution of images depicting motion and thus don't display animation in the way that the zoetrope does.
_	A tribe of American Indians is unhappy about the way that the three radio crooners (Bing Crosby, Russ Columbo and Rudy Vallée) have influenced their squaws and the cartoon opens with the braves singing the “Crosby, Columbo and Vallée” song.
_	The upper courtyard was key to the way that the main house functioned: it linked almost all the ground floor rooms in the house, as well as providing access to the cellars, and gave an impressive view of the turret towers.
_	This is significantly different from previous years in the way that these events were hosted mostly by area restaurants and the local drive-in.
_	Thompson claims that she was disappointed by the way that Tom Hanks portrayed the manager.
_	Bowles has recently studied the way that people are motivated by selfishness and the desire to maximize their own income, as compared to altruism and the desire to do a good job and be well regarded by others.
_	Of the four, only one, , entered into combat in the way that was intended, with full crew and under steam.
_	The storyline "The Dragon Bellow Conspiracy" includes elements reminiscent of the classic Akira Kurosawa films "The Seven Samurai" and "The Hidden Fortress", particularly the way that Usagi collects various allies to raid an evil lord's fortress.
_	When leaders from the Pechanga Band of Luiseño Mission Indians, a tribe of Luiseños claiming a cultural connection with the Nicoleños, visited the island, they were troubled with the way that the human remains were being handled by excavators.
_	For much of the history of Christianity this RGM has not taken its legitimate prominence because of the way that Christianity was accommodated to Greek pagan philosophy in the writings of some of the Church Fathers such as Justin and Athenagoras.
_	The record was not measured the way that it is today, with the time after the first goal and the time before the last goal not being counted.
_	There are a number of changes regarding the way that the police deal with alcohol misuse.
_	Secondly, the personality of the individual might also influence what they observe, since (it is argued) preferences are based on sense-impressions, differences in preferences can be attributed to differences in the way that people are affected by the object.
_	Anthony Kenny sought to justify the distinction, other philosophers such as Hartley Slater and Crispin Wright have argued that the distinguished category of "entity" cannot be associated with predication in the way that individual objects are associated with the use of singular terms.
_	Eric Newby, Bettina Selby, and Anne Mustoe have all used cycling as a means to a literary end, valuing the way that cycling brings the traveller closer to people and places.
_	Kracht's 2012 novel "Imperium" follows on from "Ich werde hier sein im Sonnenschein und im Schatten" both in its very favourable reception by critics and in the way that it presents a reimagining of history that incorporates actual persons and historical "reality" while playing fast and loose with dates and details.
_	Anti-environmentalism refers to the way that various groups in society have sought to counter the effects of environmental ideology and movements, to redirect and diminish public concern about the environment, to attack left-leaning environmentalists, and to persuade politicians against increased environmental regulation.
_	I've seen a lot of elements in this show that other shows have, but they’re not used in the way that we use them.
_	The word "testimony" describes the way that Friends "testify" or "bear witness" to their beliefs in their everyday life.
_	It was originally recommended by the Federal Courts Study Committee that the U.S. Parole Commission or a successor agency conduct hearings in supervised release cases, but this proposal was rejected by the Judicial Conference of the United States, partly because the judges felt that the judicial officer who imposed the supervised release conditions would be best able to interpret those conditions in the way that was intended at sentencing.
_	Also Donatello's sculpture differs from medieval works in the way that drapery is used, specifically in that St. Mark's figure is revealed by a realistic draping of linen.
_	In the host society, hegemonic social constructions such as race, ethnicity and nation structure the way that persons categorize transmigrants and the way that transmigrants experience and view their own social positions and identities.
_	It had far-reaching and important effects for the way that people listen to classical music and the way it is taught, performed, sponsored and sold.
_	Tail shapes influence the way that boards perform in the line-up.
_	Producer John Walker said, "I think that one of the things that excited Brad and Ralph Eggleston, the production designer, was the fact that the technology existed now to finally realize the designs in the way that they had hoped to realize them in 2004.
_	Nor is there any significant sense in which one composer was "schooled" by another (in the way that Berg and Webern were taught by Schoenberg), though it is true that Beethoven for a time received lessons from Haydn.
_	Norton considered "The Painted Veil" to be in the spirit of films like "Out of Africa" (1985) and "The English Patient" (1996), seeing it as "rooted in really looking at the way that men and women hurt each other".
_	Women's liberation movements in Asia sought to redefine women's relationships to the family and the way that women expressed their sexuality.
_	Finally, if all possible rightful orders of primogeniture and representation have been exhausted, then the General Courts will select a successor in the way that best suits the interest of Spain.
_	Mindful of the way that Americans and most Europeans enjoyed extraterritorial rights in China at the time, accounts in Chinese literature about the Russians living in Manchukuo and their "mixed water" children often display a certain "schadenfreude" recounting how the Russians in Manchukuo usually lived in poverty on the margins of Manchukuo society with the local Chinese more economically successful.
_	"The Symphony of Ages" series is unique in the way that these classic mythologies are blended together to create a story that is familiar and yet at the same time, fresh and unique.
_	Campbell who played First Sergeant Milt Warden, said that the "James Jones novel really portrayed homosexuality and prostitution in the way that it existed in those days and we've dived in head first.
_	The investigation concluded that the Davidians died as a result of a suicide pact, but it also uncovered numerous instances of negligent conduct in the way that the federal government conducted the siege.
_	Changes in rigidity affect the way that the flexible hose
_	In order to try to change the way that people digest music, we had to take a leap of faith," says Royce.
_	Ahmad ar- Rifâi taught the Sunnah (the way of the Prophet Muhammad ) and the details of the Qur’an to the public, and he always said that the trade of a wise man is to show the way that leads to Allah and to direct hearts towards Allah.
_	He said that it was an excellent episode, due in part to the way that the character's dynamics are formed.
_	Authors such as Virginia Woolf, D.H. Lawrence, and Joseph Conrad have written works that are Impressionistic in the way that they describe, rather than interpret, the impressions, sensations and emotions that constitute a character's mental life.
_	Bridges also called for a speedup of the pace of work—which may not have been inconsistent with the ILWU's goal of controlling the way that work was done on the docks.
_	Cano has argued that the positioning strategy JWT used for Lux exhibited an insightful understanding of the way that consumers mentally construct brand images.
_	In postmodern, meta-fictive books, the reader is intentionally made aware of the way that the book calls attention to itself.
_	This search for coherency, and the drive towards the universalization of meaning by the elimination of incoherencies highlights the way that Weil thematizes violence.
_	Perkins said that his change of mind about spending high picks on left tackles came about because the way that many teams were now lining up their best athletes at right end or outside linebacker had caused left tackle to become a skill position.
_	After # 41-ranked Israel defeated # 3-ranked South Korea and # 4-ranked Taiwan, Lavarnay noted: "two generations ago, the way that this team was put together would have meant that we were being killed...
_	REV's utility reform proceedings are intended to change the way that electric utilities make money.
_	Harmoush also stated that the migration of Jews to Israel was part of a plot “to take over that beautiful land in the way that we all know, with killing, crime and massacres.”
_	With Dashboard Confessional's mainstream success, Carrabba appeared on a cover of the magazine "Spin" and according to Jim DeRogatis, "has become the 'face of emo' the way that Moby was deemed the prime exponent of techno or Kurt Cobain became the unwilling crown prince of grunge."
_	He later wrote that the dialogue of "Portal 2" was funny due in part to "the way that the frantic, nervous babble of Wheatley contrasts so effectively with the cynical, sinister goading from GLaDOS" and that neither are overbearing.
_	"He had established a way of working with arranger René Hall out on the Coast, and even though Sammy Lowe's string arrangements were not all that different from some of René's, the song still did not say Sam Cooke in the way that some of his earlier Keen hits indelibly, if indefinably, had," said biographer Peter Guralnick.
_	This is the way that the nurse became attached to the baby Elizabeth.
_	As a written formula the value of this is −20 because the minus sign is intended to indicate a negative number, rather than a subtraction, and this is the way that it would be interpreted by a formula calculator.
_	The mind plays a central role in influencing the way that the world is experienced: we perceive phenomena through time, space and the categories of the understanding.
_	Reviewing the same concert, "The Statesman" wrote "Kamalini Mukherji holds in her singing a promise to succeed in popularizing Rabindranath Tagore’s song among the present generation", while "Anandabazar Patrika" praised her arrangement of Tagore’s Devotional Songs and Love Songs, and the way that she was able to draw out diverse moods such as happiness, wonderment, separation, and earnestness.
_	Art critic Peter Timms has said that attention is drawn to the way that craft objects must subscribe to particular values in order to be admitted to the realm of contemporary art.
_	It has definitely transformed my way of thinking, the way that I approach the stage and overall, my life".
_	To understand the culture in which an object is featured, an anthropologist looks at the object itself, its context, and the way that it was manufactured and used.
_	players will always act in the way that best satisfies their ordering from best to worst of various possible outcomes.
_	Her voice actor commented, "In the first game, she's a lot younger, she's a lot more naive, and she looks at things as being very possible, and in the second (game), has seen murders and adventure...the way that any person grows, you see that in her.
_	He added, "Phillip Phillips has never quite rocked out up to this point in the way that he does on "Fly", and he does so so very well.
_	He founded the Indian Automotive Racing Club as he was unhappy with the way that motorsport was organised in India, and then helped in the forming of the Federation of Motor Sport Clubs of India (FMSCI).
_	As for Jamie and Awasin, they decide to go the way that Denikazi and the other hunters went, so they can join with them on the journey back.
_	Playing as a mobile ruckman, Stynes is credited as having changed the way that the position is played and along with his Brownlow his Australian Rules achievements included the Leigh Matthews Trophy, two time All-Australian team selection, a night and day Grand Final and four club trophies for Melbourne.
_	The process of acidogenesis is similar to the way that milk sours.
_	Once Riverdance became a large production, it changed the way that Irish dance was performed and viewed.
_	He was inspired by the way that snowboarding is preferred to skiing due to the greater artistic potential, and decided to design a snowboard equivalent for the conventional bicycle.
_	Daniel Kraus, writing in "Booklist", lauded the way that the author handles the movement of characters like Ruthie, Ian, Mrs. Miller, and Ty in and out of the story, calling this "both absorbing and jarring."
_	dk's leader has expressed dissatisfaction with the way that Blu has edited episode 5, arguing that the episode was edited such that it gives the impression that he fires the group's researcher on-screen, when in reality she chose to leave the group and the two had been discussing it for a long time before her exit from the group.
_	DPA's Chief Investigator posted a response to a comment on the group's Facebook page, stating that he felt that his group was being ridiculed in the way that it was depicted in "Spøgelsesjægerne".
_	It shipped with Linux 2.6, GNOME 2.6, KDE 3.2, and SELinux (SELinux was disabled by default due to concerns that it radically altered the way that Fedora Core ran).
_	We are ready for that next step and we couldn't be more excited to finally get out there and present Thirty Seconds to Mars in the way that we see it.
_	He approached Stephen Roth, then director of the European Jewish Congress, and told him that changes had to be made in the way that Israel represented itself abroad.
_	The autobiographical genre had turned into English-speaking alternative comics subculture's "signature genre" in much the way that superhero stories dominated the American mainstream comic books, the stereotypical example recounting the awkward moment which followed when, the cartoonist sitting alone in a coffee shop when their ex-girlfriend walks in.
_	Third, if the desired behaviour is not being performed in the way that was agreed upon in the contract the punishments that were defined in the contract must be done.
_	It’s irresistible dance music, in the way that Michael Nyman’s Greenaway soundtracks are.
_	Power and control in abusive relationships is the way that abusers exert physical, sexual and other forms of abuse to gain control within relationships.
_	Although naturally disappointed with the lack of success in the league, they understood the reasons for the sub-standard results (namely the absence of several key players due to injury) and were pleased with the way that Ferguson had reorganised the club's coaching and scouting system.
_	In later projects (2003–2006), which grew to include video installation, their concerns shifted towards the way that our perception of nature and the landscape had been augmented and modified by technological mediation.
_	What is in fact astonishing is the way that, while constructing a piece of very carefully directed and intelligently written melodrama, Penn manages to avoid sentimentality or even undue optimism about the value of Helen's education, and the way he achieves such a feeling of raw spontaneity in the acting."
_	The basic concept of the song is the global obsession with fame and the way that celebrities are not appreciative of how fortunate they are.
_	I don't think 'New Year's Day' was a pop single, certainly not in the way that Mickie Most might define a pop single as something that lasts three minutes and three weeks in the chart.
_	Aloe is so named because of the way that its rosette tilts to one side, in the direction of the greatest sun.
_	This design constraint resembles the way that an IDE handles a project, and it provides many benefits, such as a succinct project definition, and the possibility of automatic integration of a Maven project with other development tools such as IDEs, build servers, etc.
_	"I don't know how you could be from a certain place or area or region and not have it affect the way that you see things.
_	The child may create a habit of spinning the mobile in its crib, but they are still trying to find out methods to reach the mobile in order to get it to spin in the way that they find pleasurable.
_	It is important to include “indicators of performance” in the way that it can be measured the results against explicit requirements, whether qualitative or quantitative.
_	This focused on school bullying, with a particular interest in the way that traditional research had isolated pupils and their problematic personalities, rather than seeing them as part of a broader system of relationships, including teachers and parents.
_	It may also affect the way that the news is covered and compromise journalistic objectivity.
_	Reserves and Cadets are based in the local community in the way that regular forces are not.
_	The text is written this way to help the reading audience relate to the happenings of the story better, by familiarizing the way that each chunk of dialogue is received.
_	The Clinton Doctrine is not a clear statement in the way that many other United States Presidential doctrines were.
_	Rifles, with their relatively lighter components (which overheat quickly) and smaller capacity magazines, are incapable of sustained automatic fire in the way that machine guns are; they trade this capability in favor of increased mobility.
_	A surpassing area of application has been in studies of various aldol reactions, the addition of ketone-derived enol/enolate nucleophiles to electrophilic aldehydes, each with functional groups varying in size and group polarity; the way that features on the nucleophile and electrophile impact the stereochemistry seen in reaction products, and in particular, the diastereoselection exhibited, has been carefully mapped (see the steric and orbital description above, the aldol reaction article, and David Evans' related Harvard teaching materials on the aldol).
_	The new law finally strengthened the RFA in the way that previous reports and conferences had recommended.
_	He also recreates the focusing effect of the camera in the way that it sharpens certain subjects of an image, but not others.
_	One thing that discursive psychologists would be interested in would be the way that Connie depicts the arguments that she and her partner have as the routine kind of arguments that everybody has.
_	He was bothered by the way that wealthy Americans tried to copy the habits of Europe.
_	The difference is that an asymptotic series cannot be made to produce an answer as exact as desired, the way that convergent series can.
_	they said:“In these letters, the way that certain characters like ‘yo’ and ‘ya’ were written coincide directly with the writing habits of the late actress Jang Ja-yeon.
_	I mean, the arc of her life so informs mine that – she’s – I really can’t think of anyone I admire [more], the way that she’s lived her life."
_	These types of clines characterise the way that a genetic or phenotypic trait transforms from one end of its geographical range of the species to the other.
_	It is only now that the South has experienced violence that they are reacting in the way that the North has sought for so long.
_	It begins with the idea that behaviors have evolved over time, similar to the way that physical traits are thought to have evolved.
_	Alan Sepinwall of HitFix said, "I like seeing the relationships evolve in the way that they have, and I enjoyed the episode overall, but it ultimately felt a little lightweight."
_	There are physiological reasons that some athletes possess the ability to be best, the way that their mind functions and the hormonal excretions in their body allow them to push themselves hard and longer than the regular person.
_	They reject this idea and accept that there is no one true way; that each individual must find the way that is right for them.
_	This can also refer to changing the inheritance or type tree, and thus altering the way that existing types behave (especially with respect to the invocation of methods).
_	The Alzheimer's Association has classified Axona an "alternative treatment", has "expressed concern that there is not enough evidence to assess the potential benefit of medical foods for Alzheimer’s disease", and notes that the safety of Axona is not regulated in the way that drugs are.
_	The project also marked Manilow's return to his former label, Arista, with the company's founder, Clive Davis, setting the singer up with 1950s pop classics much in the way that the savvy businessman steered Rod Stewart in the direction of jazzy standards in his successful "The Great American Songbook" project.
_	Such imagery comes from books, magazines, television, cinema, and, above all, advertising that can directly impact the landscape (in the form of posters and billboards) and also subtly influence, through persuasive techniques and an increasingly pervasive presence, the way that people perceive reality.
_	Boerhaave attributed fevers to the body's response to a stressful situation or shock, similar to the way that chemical reactions produce heat, in which the body encountered an unexpected onset of heat or freezing temperatures.
_	Moreover is there support for local businesses in the way that every Thalia chain store has a section for local literature (featuring local history, vernacular etc.), keepsakes and related articles.
_	They all agreed that it was time to give back to the land and produce food the way that their grandparents had; without any synthetically produced chemicals, pesticides, fungicides and herbicides.
_	These discoveries drastically changed the way that man viewed the world and nature.
_	Maust said that he could relate to that phrase with the band saying that it's "very similar to how [we] conduct ourselves, the way that [we] write songs and the way that [we] view each other in the band.
_	However, is different in the way that it accomplishes this.
_	I mean, that's really the way that we work.
_	He coined the term "combination problem", in the specific context of a "mind-dust theory" in which it is proposed that a full human conscious experience is built up from proto- or micro-experiences in the way that matter is built up from atoms.
_	I think the way that we were able to inspire people was something that I will never be able to achieve in that way again in my life.
_	This had a major effect on the way that the Soviets carried out their new mentality when dealing with countries they once tried to control.
_	A fierce critique of academic language, she says, "Poetry is not caught up within larger structures that pressure you to adopt a certain set of practices while you present your ideas in the way that academic language is" and thus, prefers to use it for her activism.
_	In June 2013, Clark Gregg explained how the series would tie into the Marvel Cinematic Universe films: "...the exciting part is going to be seeing the way that "Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D." interacts with the S.H.I.E.L.D. component in "", and the other movies, and whether those movies will then affect our show."
_	However, a concept store goes beyond merely selling products, and instead offers an immersive customer experience built around the way that a brand fits with the customer's lifestyle.
_	In response to a question from "The Independent" as to whether the programme was scientifically accurate, Friis-Christensen said: "No, I think several points were not explained in the way that I, as a scientist, would have explained them ... it is obvious it's not accurate."
_	Instead, it is the way that the pulses change over the time of one scan cycle that reveals the angle.
_	Communication by sea seems to have been an important factor in the siting of these church centres, which would have drawn civilian habitation to them, in the way that the 'vici' were drawn to the Roman forts.
_	However the Welsh Labour-Liberal Democrat Assembly coalition rebuffed these proposals, with Assembly housing spokesman Peter Black stating that "we [can not] frame our planning laws around the Welsh language", adding "Nor can we take punitive measures against second home owners in the way that they propose as these will have an impact on the value of the homes of local people".
_	The growth of the impalement arts was greatly facilitated by the way that circus developed in the 19th and early 20th centuries, and in particular by American influences.
_	He is credited with changing the way that the University was governed and making it more open and inclusive for both faculty and students.
_	And I guess the way that I deal with it is to shake it off.
_	According to Jean-Pierre Coursodon, his films were recognized as "unpretentious, closely observed, finely textured works...there comes a point when, looking back, one sees that their consistency itself – consistent excellence – is telling us something: something about the way that cinema itself is able to move out and look around."
_	In 2014, Ireland said she was disappointed in the way that Kookaburra Jamie Dwyer, also from Rockhampton, was told he wouldn't be competing in the 2014 Commonwealth Games after he was told in an email that he was axed from the team.
_	They then said "There can be no excuse for the way that Israel completely mishandled the incident."
_	This isomorphism has the consequence that Möbius transformations of the Riemann sphere represent the way that Lorentz transformations change the appearance of the night sky, as seen by an observer who is maneuvering at relativistic velocities relative to the "fixed stars".
_	Sexual abuse is a crime that rips apart families and I am very pleased with the way that Hollyoaks has thoughtfully approached an enormously emotive and challenging subject.
_	The abolition of the evil or bad customs took a long time and this could primarily be attributed to the way that it formed part of the identity of the serfs, serving as an essential element in the definition of their servile bond and legal status as subordinate to the lords.
_	As in those epigrams in the Greek anthology, he admired the way that concision could give a precise shape to a poem.
_	Richard Horton, the editor-in-chief, wrote, "It seems obvious now that had we appreciated the full context in which the work reported in the 1998 "Lancet" paper by Wakefield and colleagues was done, publication would not have taken place in the way that it did."
_	He made widely cited contributions on the way that fissures and joints in rocks affect the propagation of seismic waves, which has become a standard basis for inferring rock properties in the Earth, and contributed to understanding stressing and deformation in the inflation of the human lung.
_	They are not confined to a narrow range of temperatures and luminosities in the way that most pulsating stars are.
_	Also he described a theory of abiogenesis in his book in the way that he believed that the first life forms formed from mist.
_	For example, Miller noted that critics rarely "identify catchy melodies as specific passages within a song," in the way that working musicians might discuss "the A-minor in the second measure of the chorus."
_	The discussion about media bias has been affected in the way that the Media Cloud project is viewed as having transformed the debate into less of a matter of personal opinions of journalists, and more into a data-driven discussion.
_	It involves hot-seating between two players by pressing 'pause' on a virtual stopwatch, similar to the way that competitive chess is played.
_	However, the U.S. APEC Business Travel Card can’t be used in lieu of a visa to enter an APEC member country in the way that some other countries’
_	On why she returned, Curtis stated, "As soon as I read what David Green and Danny McBride had come up with … and the way that they connected the dots of the story, it made so much sense to me that it felt totally appropriate for me to return to Haddonfield, Ill., for another 40th-anniversary retelling.
_	Thus, she demonstrates the way that political interests to keep the wages of the poor low create a climate in which it is politically convenient to buy into the idea of culture of poverty .
_	They might have thrived and become stable in the way that Europe recovered after World War II through the Marshall Plan; however, their economic growth was slowed by the oil crisis but boomed immediately after.
_	The idea, as Harris told Firing Squad as the company announced itself, was that they had "accumulated a ton of ideas about the way that the Internet can create new and different takes on the games we've all played.
_	Group process consultation consists of activities designed to increase group awareness and understanding, so that the group or organization can take steps to improve the way that its members work together.
_	MacArthur was dissatisfied with the way that Rowell had prosecuted the campaign in Papua, and was opposed to Rowell returning to New Guinea.
_	Lipids can be classified by the way that they are made by an organism, their chemical structure and their limited solubility in water compared to oils.
_	The existence of many interactions in the early stages of group formation provides each of the teammates the opportunity to get to know other team members' training, level of expertise or the lack of knowledge in certain areas, and develop a shared understanding of the task's requirements and the way that the total of the teammates knowledge combines together.
_	They argue that the "Brown" decision has been achieved and that there is no segregation in the way that existed before the ruling.
_	Influenced by psychoanalytic psychologists including Sigmund Freud and Carl Jung, these authors sought to understand the way that individual personalities were shaped by the wider cultural and social forces in which they grew up.
_	Although acts such as the Violence Against Women Act have been passed to take steps toward preventing such violence, there is still sexism rooted in the way that the legal system approaches these cases.
_	It described its mission as "catalyzing the power of young people to fight for the ability of all people to build the families they want, access the healthcare they need, and to live and love in the way that's true to who they are."
_	The Nixon Foundation objected to the proposed exhibit, specifically the process by which the proposed exhibit was crafted due to the fact that the Nixon Foundation was not consulted in the way that other presidential foundations are in similar situations.
_	The poem is very similar to "The Spider and the Fly" in the way that it rhymes and mimics its flow and tune.
_	Alshich taught that thus reflects the way that the evil urge works.
_	The learning environment includes the physical layout of the classroom, the way that the teacher uses the space, environmental elements and sensitivities including lighting, as well as the overall atmosphere of the classroom.
_	Kinomichi is a traditional art in the way that it was created, its transmission and evolution.
_	Other groups like CFM, including the Young Christian Workers, the Grail Movement, and the Sister Formation Conference, prompted Catholics and the Church as a whole to reevaluate the way that the laity could play an active role in ministry:
_	He continued to campaign around the interference with DSIP funds of opposition MPs, claiming that past governments had not discriminated against the opposition in the way that O'Neill had.
_	When Felicity was around three, Judy and John realised that ‘something was not quite right’ due to the fact that their daughter wasn’t able to use her language to communicate in the way that other children her age were.
_	In Spanish, "palomillo" means moth or butterfly, referring to the way that it is split in thickness to make two thin steaks of equal size.
_	Due to the way that the progressive tax is applied in France, a couple filing joint income taxes, in almost all cases, pays less tax than they would filing separately if one of the partners earns substantially more than the other.
_	Written by Justin King, a former chief executive of UK supermarket chain Sainsbury's, the review's report was critical of the way that the company had dealt with the children's family, saying that its responses had been "intermittent, sometimes ill-timed and often ill-judged.
_	She explores the way that ghinnawas, songs in a poetic form that she compares to haiku and the blues, express the cultural "patterning" of the society, especially with regard to the relations between women and men.
_	Seeing the way that everything has turned out for the best, he quickly forgives the couples for their underhand behavior and all ends in general rejoicing.
_	The Tribunat was an organ intended to improve separation of powers, but the way that the separation of powers was structured did not let the Tribunat run effectively.
_	While performing, dancers may also change dance formation similar to the way that marching bands change formation during shows on football fields.
_	Tone-clock theory is also concerned with the way that the three-note pitch-class sets (trichords or 'triads' in tone-clock terminology) can be shown to underlie larger sets, and considers these triads as a fundamental unit in the harmonic world of any piece.
_	The birth of Protestantism led to extensive changes in the way that Christianity was practiced (and hence the design of churches).
_	The committee determined that the paper still advanced the field of technical analysis and investor sentiment, so a revised version of the paper was released, and the MTA changed the way that the award is reviewed in order to increase the likelihood that a committee member would be familiar with prior work in the field that is not necessarily widely published or cited.
_	This toon also jokingly mocks Norway, specifically the way that Norwegians dance.
_	There has also been some innovation in terms of the way that the 16 Club runs itself but none of these have altered the joys of 16 Club membership.
_	Suggestions have been made that there is universality in the way that a rainbow is perceived.
_	The change will bring greater coherence to the way that light role units prepare for operations, through improved co-ordination of training".
_	He is ignorant and easily duped like the other "cafoni" but doesn't react in the way that Berardo does, even though he admires what Berardo does.
_	Mocks are like stubs in the way that the object and the method being mocked need to exist.
_	While Wolff pulled together the work of Culmann and von Meyer, it was the French scientist Roux, who first used the term "functional adaptation" to describe the way that the skeleton optimized itself for its function, even though Wolff is credited by many for that.
_	It just has this like magical sound the way that it’s built.
_	Conditions such as size and shape of the boulders and the way that the boulders are supported or stacked certainly influence the sounds that the boulders make but do not in themselves impart the ringing ability.
_	The new political economy approach is expected to go beyond the dominant political economy tools formulated by international development agencies to analyse climate change initiatives that have ignored the way that ideas and ideologies determine the policy outcomes (see table).
_	This week’s episode is straight-up children’s television, and not in the way that it can be enjoyed by all ages.
_	As the formation of glucosamine-6-phosphate is the first step for the synthesis of these products, glucosamine may be important in regulating their production; however, the way that the hexosamine biosynthesis pathway is actually regulated, and whether this could be involved in contributing to human disease remains unclear.
_	The band's intention was to record the album on their own terms and for the songs to sound the way that they had originally intended.
_	The building represents the way that changing curricula and teaching methods influences the design of an educational institution.
_	Browne also commented that the album "doesn't always snap and crackle the way that single ("Lonely No More") does".
_	He described this notion as the way that groups and individuals act and react to changing circumstances.
_	Such collaboration between NGOs and the WHO forever changed the way that the WHO treats nongovernmental organizations, and in 2002 the WHO constitution was amended to reflect this shift in relations.
_	Thus, dancehall in Jamaica is yet another example of the way that the music and dance cultures of the African diaspora have challenged the passive consumerism of mass cultural forms, such as recorded music, by creating a sphere of active cultural production that potentially may transform the prevailing hegemony of society.
_	A goal of the MEP is to understand these differences from Earth along with the way that wind, water, volcanoes, tectonics, cratering and other processes have shaped the surface of Mars.
_	"The next thing I knew, the sun was rising and my heart was breaking, but in a good way, the way that resurrects you, that shows you everything you forgot to pay attention to, forgot to remember, and I closed it because it was done, again, finished for the third time, and I could’ve turned back to page one and began again, which is how the first two readings happened, in consecutive days, because this book burns you, burrows deep, and smolders, lives, reconnects cells, and balances chemistry."
_	Defenders of Thomson's argument reply that the alleged disanalogies between the violinist scenario and typical cases of abortion do not matter, either because the factors that critics appeal to are not genuinely morally relevant, or because those factors are morally relevant but do not apply to abortion in the way that critics have claimed.
_	After graduating from high school in 1921, Livingston entered nearby Pomona College, intending to major in chemistry, but he disliked the way that chemistry was being taught there, and arranged with the Professor of Physics, Roland R. Tileston, to take physics courses as well.
_	Students tackle economic issues, such as strategic new business ventures, worldwide income distribution and financial management, while at the same time discussing budgets, trade, migration and the way that businesses and finance overlap with other social sciences.
_	SONET therefore is not in itself a native communications protocol and should not be confused as being necessarily connection-oriented in the way that term is usually used.
_	Supernatural elements are hinted at in earlier issues, most notably in the way that Alex is unable to leave the village without the road seemingly curving back into Strangehaven, and in the visions Alex has of The Woman on the Road, whose physical form also seems to be kept in a fishtank in the house of an unseen villager.
_	The "paradox", as it were, comes from the way that Bell constructed his example.
_	Maybe the time has its own way of healing, maybe it dries the tears in your eyes, but never change the way that I'm feeling, only you can answer my cries."
_	It was, in other words, an attack on Robert Walpole and the way that he was referred to as "the Great Man" and his supposed control over Caroline of Ansbach.
_	However, at the end of the nineteenth century, second president of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints Brigham Young said that the Saints could no longer justify disobeying the Word of Wisdom because of the way that it was originally presented.
_	In response to the UK government's official drugs advisory body's opposition to cannabis reclassification (upwards, from a class C to a class B drug) in 2008, prime minister Gordon Brown said: "I believe that if we're sending out a signal, particularly to teenagers – and particular those at the most vulnerable age, young teenagers – that in any way we find cannabis acceptable, given all we know about the way that cannabis is being sold in this country, that is not the right thing to do.
_	Again focusing on the left, Ludendorff was appalled by the strikes that took place towards the end of the war and the way that the home front collapsed before the military front did, with the former poisoning the morale of soldiers on temporary leave.
_	I'm not sure I've ever encountered a filmmaker who combined discipline and control with sheer wild-ass joy the way that Tarantino does."
_	Rich uses the example that heterosexual people never have to come out as heterosexual, displaying the way that homosexuality is viewed as an anomaly.
_	Critic Liam Lacey, of "The Globe and Mail", believed the film was missing "any image of the economic misery that made Dillinger a folk hero", and, "the most regrettable crime here is the way that Mann, trying to do too much, robs himself of a great opportunity."
_	Like the missionaries, she wanted to share the gospel in the way that church elders did.
_	Jacques Derrida challenged his thesis as phallocentric, and the charge was taken up by second-wave feminism, extending the focus of protest from Lacan to Freud, psychoanalysis, and male-centered thinking as a whole: the way that “[t]he phallus, centre of meaning, became man's identity with himself... a masculine symbolic”.
_	Hence there is potential for deception in the way that principled behaviour, and deviation from it, is understood and justified.
_	In particular, they suggest that funds can do better at synchronizing their reporting of data, being consistent in the way that they report their figures, and providing detailed information on the implementation of projects and programmes over time.
_	In addition, as the state had reformed many policies toward women and political and economic situation had shifted dramatically, activists felt a need to shift the way that they engaged with the state and public.
_	C differs mainly in the way that rhymes are constructed.
_	They demonstrated an impact on user performance by changing the way that the rules of the game are represented, using variations in the physical design of the game components.
_	In August 2004, the information commissioner, Richard Thomas, drawing a parallel with the way that governments in Eastern Europe and Spain gained too much power and information in the 20th century, expressed concern over this and other national databases, including the Citizen Information Project, NHS National Programme for IT, and the introduction of identity cards, warning that there was a danger of the country 'sleepwalk[ing] into a surveillance society'.
_	In differential geometry, the Calabi flow is an intrinsic geometric flow—a process which deforms the metric of a Riemannian manifold—in a manner formally analogous to the way that vibrations are damped and dissipated in a hypothetical curved "n"-dimensional structural element.
_	Shorthand systems can also be classified according to the way that vowels are represented.
_	The two had some great episodes in the show's early going, as the series examined the way that Abe's inability to be a good single parent reverberated down through the years (in a much, much funnier way than that sounds)."
_	Throughout the book it is evident the way that Lorde helped the black German women access this type of community to formulate a consciousness surrounding their own oppression in Germany and their role in the transnational diasporic network.
_	"I call all knowledge "transcendental" if it is occupied, not with objects, but with the way that we can possibly know objects even before we experience them."
_	There are some critics that the Forum Thomanum project will change the way that the "Thomaner" are instructed and recruited.
_	"Pan" has also been described as fantasy literature, Modernist literature, and a cautionary tale against men mistreating women the way that Raymond mistreated Mary.
_	These terms are used similarly to the way that 'essence' and 'accident' are used in Catholic theology to describe transubstantiation.
_	In the way that he interprets the Letters of St. Paul, Troels Engberg-Pedersen expresses that in Paul's call to bring the gospel to the Gentiles, Paul sets forth a model of discipleship that spans beyond his place in history, but rather provides a structure for Christianity which will continue to guide the Church into the future.
_	Owing to the changes taking place in the way that books and content are bought and accessed, Cambridge believes that digital products, services and solutions could account for two-thirds of its sales by 2020.
_	Advocates of this method claim that this is the way that historic artists like Titian, Diego Valesquez, John Singer Sargent and Anders Zorn worked.
_	Demolition became known for their aggressive style in the ring and the way that they dominated their matches.
_	While in "Fact Magazine" stated: "The source material on "Official Girl" is pretty flawless – Cassie's brilliant, and Lil Wayne's always great when he's a) talking about giving oral sex in the way that most rappers won't ("I'll never diss you / and I'll kiss you / on your little pearl") and b) thinking he's said something really clever when he actually hasn't ("I know I can make you come... right back!")."
_	where τ is a truncation functor in the derived category, and "i" is the inclusion of "X"−"X" into "X"−"X" and C is the constant sheaf on "X"−"X". (Warning: there is more than one convention for the way that the perversity enters Deligne's construction: the numbers "p"("k")−"n" are sometimes written as "p"("k").)
_	"The great Sugar Ray Leonard, right now, if he was boxing, the way that they want you to fight, the people that pull the strings of the puppet, he would be boring today.
_	Alexander envisioned a pattern language as a structured system in which the semantic relationships between the patterns create a whole that is greater than the sum of its parts, much like the way that grammatical relationships between words make language meaningful.
_	He also condemns the way that groups of parents underestimate the intelligence of teenagers and their ability to analyze literature.
_	In that case, the TMB expressed concerns about the manner in which he oversaw a physician assistant at a weight loss clinic and the way that he applied the clinic's patient care protocols.
_	They used numbers to philosophically disagree and prove the reasoning of "why" something worked the way it did and not only "how" something functioned the way that it did.
_	From the driver's seat, it was clear that no attempt had been made to conceal the way that details such as the gear lever and dashboard layout had been modelled on earlier DKW designs.
_	The product is predictable in the way that the catalyst approaches from the less hindered side.(see also Dynamic kinetic resolution)
_	Economics graduate students were the only subjects who behaved the way that economic theory predicted.
_	These theorems illuminated the way that first-order logic behaves and established its finitary nature, although Gödel's original proof of the completeness theorem was complicated.
_	Three stages signed the way that Luca Bassanese will decide to begin in his artistic path: the assiduous listening of Fabrizio De André Volume III album, the daily contact with his father harmonica player and the meeting with the composer, author and producer Stefano Florio with whom he begins an artistic and human fellowship that will take him to collaborate in the realization of his albums and his performances.
_	Milani argued that, given the way that the macho
_	To answer this question, Young reconsiders the way that English identity was classified in historical and racial terms in the nineteenth century.
_	This work has suggested similarities between the way that the brain processes language and the way it processes sequential images.
_	This ability and speed that which ideas can flow has literally changed the way that political parties stay connected to constituents.
_	It did not receive global attention until late 1980s to 1990s when some authors such as Monden (1992), Sakurai (1989), Tanaka (1993), and Cooper (1992) described the way that Japanese companies applied target costing to thrive in their business (IMA 1994).
_	Web 2.0 technologies such as blogs, social networking sites, video sharing sites and web apps, have radically impacted the way that information is exchanged and engaged in.
_	Characters were ultimately chosen based on the personal preferences of the creative team, as long as the "choices feel organic to the storytelling, and really, you have to sort of structure them in the way that they need to be there", and included some characters
_	The experiments give insight into the way that bodily systems circulate, which has led to many advances in the study of a variety of diseases.
_	In the 21st century, statistics-based approaches to machine learning simulate the way that the brain uses unconscious instincts to perceive, notice anomalies and make quick judgements.
_	It takes sensitivity to forms, colors, and textures and the way that they combine into a beautiful design that touches the viewer both aesthetically and emotionally.
_	Smith satirically created the concept of "Pathoheterodoxy", to show the way that the Soviet Union would have characterised Soviet dissidents and their failure to obey and conform.
_	During this early period of development Robbins had preceded reading Miller's book on Rimbaud with "The Diary of Najinsky", Van Gogh's "Letters", Kenneth Patchen's "The Journal of Albion Moonlight", Jack Hirschman's "Artaud Anthology", and Wilhelm Reich's "The Murder of Christ", making the connection to Rexroth's elegy for Thomas timely in the way that it lyrically and convincingly categorizes and specifies the violent multi-faceted alienation of society with the vulnerability and ensuing martyrdom of certain artists.
_	Nikolai Ilyin prohibited his followers to preach verbally based on the prophecy in Is. 41-25 "...he will do it the way that no one will hear him preaching a sermon nor breaking a bruised reed in the street"; in addition, preaching may easily lead to debate with members of other religions.
_	Added to this, the natural factor, the Amazon forest, with its high level of rainfall and rapid growth, destroyed entire stretches of the rails, leveled ground, and bridges, reclaiming a large part of the way that people had insisted on clearing to construct the railroad.
_	Thematically, "Part 2" "examines the technological and enforcement end of the copyright wars, and on the way that using the internet makes you a copier, and how copying puts you in legal jeopardy."
_	Vaea seemed to encourage progress and change in Tonga saying in the interview, "Sometimes I think it would be best if Tonga changed, . . . we should let go of some of our beliefs and the way that we do things that seem to weigh us down."
_	According to founder Robert Baden-Powell, the Scout method works naturally and unconsciously: naturally in the way that it follows the natural impulses of the Scout, and unconsciously because the Scout is not aware of the education.
_	From the outset, researchers tended to identify two strands of historical research; the history of marketing practice and the history of marketing thought which was fundamentally concerned with the rise of marketing education and dissecting the way that marketing was taught and studied.
_	Thus, the shift into print technology radically altered the way that all later media would be both formed and operated: "Printing from movable types was the first mechanization of a complex handicraft, and became the archetype of all subsequent mechanization" (170).
_	In the division of the world history in three stages, and the way that this division is shown, a clear influence of Joaquim de Fiore can be seen.
_	He felt that the way that Spain treats both demographics pushed them to live "a escondidas" or "hidden away".
_	Labour also made many changes to the election administration underpinning the way that elections are run.
_	In mid-October 1916, another attempt was made to arm a Halberstadt D.II with rockets, this time for observation balloon attacks with a more formal method, using eight "Le Prieur"-like rockets mounted on the outer wing struts, the way that the French Nieuport 11 had been armed nearly a year earlier.
_	I am delighted with the performance of Public Contracts Scotland and I look forward to that having a further effect on the way that the market operates in years to come."
_	Dewey not only re-imagined the way that the learning process should take place, but also the role that the teacher should play within that process.
_	"As the way that we store information about ourselves develops, memories stored in files that use older technology are becoming harder to access.
_	The car was modified and changed with unusual frequency even by the standards of Renault in the 1930s, and following its evolution in retrospect is rendered more complicated by the way that the Renault catalogue frequently listed two succeeding generations of the model simultaneously, but the Vivastella always occupied a place in the manufacturer's line-up a little below the slightly longer Renault Reinastella.
_	Similar to the way that electromotive force (EMF) drives a current of electrical charge in electrical circuits, magnetomotive force (MMF) 'drives' magnetic flux through magnetic circuits.
_	Shug not only influences the way that Celie allows Mister to treat her, but also shows Celie that actions deemed sinful by others may not truly be evil or transgressive and that they do not prevent one from believing in and living for God, thereby broadening Celie's views on religion and ethics.
_	In July 2014, the Labour Party called for a new inquiry into the way that the allegations had been handled, and the Prime Minister, David Cameron, ordered the permanent secretary of the Home Office, Mark Sedwill, to investigate the circumstances of the lost dossier.
_	Thomson describes this series as "a more sophisticated version of "A Year in Provence", bringing France to the English in just the way that they most like it".
_	But he thinks that a certain history of western art has come to an end, in about the way that Hegel suggested it would."
_	Melcher Media founded and produced The Future of StoryTelling (FoST) summit, an exclusive gathering of highly influential people that are shaping the way that technology is revolutionizing human communications.
_	During the production of the film, Prashanth was unhappy about the way that his character was depicted and his father Thyagarajan was involved in a spat with the director over the issue.
_	"The Colbert Report" and the "Daily Show" [...] have changed the way that young liberals of a certain class think and talk about civic culture."
_	Some mental entities for example in a phenomenological field, are not able to be found (and do not behave in the way that is expected) in physics.
_	He went on the record saying "I'll tell you that the last couple of years, I don't think we did any big arc-type things in the way that we used to in the beginning, I think the thing we're going to do is bring back a lot of arcs".
_	The Roman style of history was based on the way that the Annals of the Pontifex Maximus, or the Annales Maximi, were recorded.
_	Being true to Lear fashion, the situation of Ben and TT's age difference was an issue in itself, but the show also tackled other environmental and social issues in the way that his earlier shows ("All in the Family", "Maude", etc.) did, with a dose of spirituality.
_	"In a heartbeat I could tell you, one of my only regrets out of everything I've ever done is the way that record was mixed.
_	Tatum forces him to drive to a quarry, revealing along the way that the plan wasn't supposed to involve killing him, just driving him crazy, but since he's being stubborn about it, he has to die.
_	However, other students who cared for Nim longer than Petitto disagreed with her and with the way that Terrace conducted his experiment.
_	She soon regrets her decision but Phil reassures her when he shows her a garage full of their old possessions, proving by the way that he didn't get rid of them.
_	But it doesn’t take enough risks and consequently doesn’t touch a raw nerve in the way that "Taare Zameen Par" did."
_	Nick Webb from All About The Rock said ""The album has a good balance with the way that the songs are written, amalgamating the different styles together with ease"".
_	"The Guardian" critic described it as a "vivid score", saying that the partnership between composer and orchestra was "clearly bearing fruit" and noting the way that Puw used the huge orchestra with restraint.
_	These three are extremely similar to one another, more so than other proteins, but they are all highly distinct in the way that they bind DNA and active transcription "in vitro" with different affinity.
_	Crabb has said that his early experiences informed his views on welfare: "The most powerful thing to me, looking back, is the way that my mother went through a crisis in her life and became welfare dependent.
_	However, once he becomes ‘lucid’, he starts seeing things the way that they really are.
_	They are unique in the way that they brew their own beer, distill their own spirits, farm their own ingredients and cooper their own barrels.
_	Goodrick-Clarke (1985: 192–202) examines what evidence there is for influences on Hitler and on other Nazis, but he concludes that "Ariosophy is a symptom rather than an influence in the way that it anticipated Nazism".
_	It may be similar to a halo hat in the way that it frames the face and can be worn straight or at an angle.
_	In a 2017 interview, commenting on the ongoing Brexit negotiations, Zephaniah stated that "For left-wing reasons, I think we should leave the EU but the way that we’re leaving is completely wrong".
_	The piece "Knowing the Ropes" is a sort of "list" in the way that "Trysting Fields" is a list, but he is unclear on the relationship of the two pieces, which are similar to one another.
_	The term was coined to speak to the way that patterns of discrimination were taking new forms in a cultural context marked by more egalitarian values.
_	And that connection between us, the way that the combination produces magic, it's stronger than ever."
_	Giving the album 9 points out of 10, Joe Goggings of "Drowned in Sound" said it is "pretty in its sonic gloominess and witty in the way that it wears its anxieties on its sleeve, but what makes it special is the way that all of that is grounded by the sturdiest of anchors - the quiet optimism that friendship inspires."
_	The mission profile of the unit changed in the way that they became a multi-role squadron being able to perform all kind of missions.
_	We definitely talked about different versions of how that was happening and different versions of ending [the game] cinematically, but I think the way that it ultimately ended up is just a really well-paced, significant and emotionally impactful ending."
_	Another common element that algorithms analyze is the way that pages link to other pages in the Web.
_	Brighton College of Art did not have specific industrial links in the way that was the case with similar educational organisations in Manchester and Birmingham.
_	Although having a small range of movement, the proximal interphalangeal joint (pastern joint) is also influential to the movement of the horse, and can change the way that various shoeing techniques affect tendons and ligaments in the legs.
_	Contrary to the way that the Luxembourgish broadcaster, RTL Hei Elei, selected their entry in the past, a national final took place to select the song that would represent Luxembourg at the Eurovision Song Contest 1992 in Malmö, Sweden.
_	It became a gallery of photographs and a website showing the tremendous richness of the way that Chicagoans present themselves to the public - the faces, bodies, attitudes, clothes, accessories and tools of everyday life that people lug with them - morph wildly from North to South and East to West of Chicago.
_	The date is celebrated in a manner similar to the way that Valentine's Day is celebrated on February 14 in many other parts of the world, with gifts, romantic activities, decorations and festivities.
_	This manifests itself in a number of ways, but the most important in terms of producing moving images is the way that a series of still images displayed in quick succession will appear to be continuous smooth motion.
_	Lethe greets "Blastfield" and Easy and complains about the way that Shorthand and Rearage are carrying on with the Wench.
_	Gould moved to Newtown in 1981, where Warren Ryan was still honing his innovative coaching approach that transformed the way that top-grade rugby league was played in Australia throughout the next decade.
_	The works challenge the way that English culture places black people in cities.
_	Other paradigms are concerned mainly with the way that code is organized, such as grouping a code into units along with the state that is modified by the code.
_	On the one hand, he writes, he expects that the book "will set the intellectual agenda in much the way that its predecessor ["The Great Stagnatio"n] did not," but on the other says that its "somewhat cryptic tone" requires "explication."
_	The Epistles are admired for the way that their poetry and music fit so well together.
_	In a statement they said "According to the topics treated and the way that they are shown in both films, the commission considers they are not appropriate to be nominated" and "In addition, the committee unanimously decided this year not to [propose] any film."
_	In this extension, the second state variable "v" is obtained from integrating a third "acceleration" state, analogous to the way that the first state is obtained by integrating the second.
_	He also enjoyed the way that Andy and Erin's subplot was developed, writing that "Andy becomes a deeper, more lovable character with each passing episode" and that "Erin has quickly become an appealing, engaging character."
_	The construction of this church is in the way that the pillars inside the church is in the model of the Hindu temple and a tomb at the top of the church which resembles muslim mosque.
_	Frazier argues that Walden Two thus avoids the way that most societies collapse or grow dysfunctional: by remaining dogmatically rigid in their politics and social structure.
_	As they strove for extreme realism, Dutch Golden Age painters mastered the art of depicting the quality of light, particularly concentrating on the way that it behaved and reflected on various surfaces.
_	Disappointed to see no solutions were in place, Wadhwa started working on Tyrelessly with an objective to create positive impact on the way that people think about their end of life tyres and the damage they may have done in their lifetime.
_	The group drew on work in anthropology and sociology which focused on the way that human communities engaged in collective rituals or acts of distribution such as potlatch.
_	In the pages of "Old Man Logan", Ashley Barton is the daughter of Tonya Parker and Clint Barton who did not like the way that Kingpin was running Hammer Falls.
_	According to AllMusic's Joe Viglione, the 1972 single "The Way of Love" is "either about a woman expressing her love for another woman, or a woman saying au revoir to a gay male she loved" ("What will you do/When he sets you free/Just the way that you/Said good-bye to me").
_	In the aftermath he vowed to create a new course designed to "bond students to the institution and transform the way that undergraduate students were taught."
_	Specifically, she said: “It’s only recently that I’ve questioned the way that I’ve been consuming.
_	A prominent factor in this work is the augmentation of the harmonies and melodies and the way that they develop this piece.
_	However, as the novel goes, such a reading is countered by the way that Emma begins to take in the previously excluded into the realm of the elite, such as visiting the poor Miss Bates and her mother, and the Coles, whose patriarch is a tradesman.
_	The classical model of drug cutting, according to Preble and Casey (1969), refers to the way that illicit drugs were diluted at each stage of the chain of distribution.
_	Later in her life Ferran’s interests have extended to histories of birds and the way that their natural environments are changing.
_	These authors also suggest that it is impossible to free oneself of preconceptions in the collection and analysis of data in the way that Glaser and Strauss say is necessary.
_	In 2010, "Fact" magazine ranked it the fourth best album of the 1990s, calling it "gloriously knotted, soulful and uniquely psychedelic;" "Fact" critic Mark Fisher wrote that the album "succeeded in simultaneously being of its moment and transcending it," praising in particular "the way that Gerald transforms the jungle sound into a kind of dreamy OtherWorld music [...]: humid, tropical, full of strange bird cries, seething with nonhuman sentience."
_	They have similar characteristics to equity index derivatives, but are always traded OTC (over the counter, i.e. between established institutional investors), as the basket definition is not standardized in the way that an equity index is.
_	Anthony Hall of the London School of Economics told the BBC after her death that she was instrumental in developing the plan to bundle various social programs together in the way that has become characteristic of the successful Bolsa Familia social program.
_	Unlike the Crown dependencies in the Channel Islands, the Isle of Man does not have island-specific opt-out of the BBC or ITV regional news programmes, in the way that the Channel Islands get their own version of "Spotlight" and "Channel Report" and instead the Isle of Man is included as part of BBC North West and ITV Granada.
_	One acts in the way that one finds most pleasant."
_	The College's enrollment, structure, and academics stagnated for the remaining forty years, with many of the college presidents doing little to change the way that the College functioned.
_	His scholarly concerns focus on the way that the very questions of representation and mediation that preoccupy us today have manifested themselves historically across western culture.
_	When asked about the result by WEEI-FM radio in January 2012, Martínez said, "I'm not afraid to say that the way that George King and Mr. LaVelle Neal III went about it was unprofessional."
_	Crais defects to Moya to save himself, accepting along the way that Crichton had not meant to kill his brother.
_	The Rovers and other supporters who receive this award have a lasting impact on the way that Rovers operates on a wide base.
_	Actual studios are safer in the way that they are soundproofed.
_	Rebus University is a online real estate training resource as part of Hiban's goal to "disrupt the way that traditional real estate is taught", with guest instructors that are active and successful within the real estate industry, including Hiban himself.
_	Brian Morris similarly criticises the way that anthropologists treat non-Western attitudes to nature as monadic and spiritualist, and contrast this "in gnostic fashion" with a simplistic treatment of Western, often 17th century, mechanistic attitude.
_	Each contract is to be terminated in the way that its clauses are set out; but it is not to be destroyed by any contract-holder.
_	Silver said that "Music for Objects" is about "how the form of the object has an impact on the way that [he] approach[es] the world" and "the small things in life to express something larger and life-affirming."
_	It was a combination of software and hardware providing its user the tools to record, edit and mix audio material in a professional environment, similar to the way that Pro Tools work.
_	This was similar to the way that the Church explained the Last Supper, since Roman Catholic theology teaches that the Mass is the sacrifice of Calvary made present on the altar, and Christ did not die before the Last Supper.
_	Although he held this post for just three years, he made an enormous impact on the way that the island would be governed for the rest of the century.
_	But to get the one thing out of the way that everyone wants to know—did he quit or was he fired—the answer is: Kind of neither.
_	As well, agenda-setting describes the way that media attempts to influence viewers, and establish a hierarchy of news prevalence.
_	He must be able to handle any issues that parents may have with the way that the head coach is running the program, all along while staying professional and not being demeaning.
_	The film seems to substitute the cap for the sea shell Diana finds, this also seems to be where they got the idea of taking "the item of power/birth right" from the mermaid as it is a major part of the fable and the way that Mr Fitzgerald is able to keep his mermaid wife with him much like Earl Barker does with Betty and Venus.
_	However, she became very dissatisfied with the way that the "Office of National Emergency" (O*N*E*) was handling the situation and was one of the many to leave the estate grounds with the mutant messiah figure Mister M.
_	The reviewer continued: "The rest of the prestige classes, while they are interesting and fulfill crucial roles, do not make stretch the genre my motor run and the way that the Fang of Lolth does.
_	Archie Comics President Mike Pellerito stated that the code did not affect his company the way that it did others as "we aren't about to start stuffing bodies into refrigerators".
_	An example is the door safety system used on garage door openers that use a light transmitter and receiver at the bottom of the door to prevent closing if there is any obstruction in the way that breaks the light beam.
_	Hiele levels are sometimes misunderstood to be descriptions of how students understand shape classification, but the levels actually describe the way that students reason about shapes and other geometric ideas.
_	Sputnikmusic gave the album five stars out of five, proclaiming that "We could relate to the way that Lacey screamed "This is the reason you're alone, this is the rise and the fall" at the end of 'Tommy Gun.'
_	The awards were launched in order to acknowledge how digital and social media are changing the way that organizations communicate with their various stakeholder communities.
_	The American releases have no on-screen episode titles, reflecting the way that the shows were originally transmitted.
_	The actual mechanics are a tad clunky, but the world background and the way that the authors set the scene means that no ref can fail but to come up with dozens of classic campaign adventures."
_	However, the international growth of the financial sector has created many structural changes in the way that business investments occur, and in the way capital finance is really organized.
_	'It's the details and the backdrop, and a lot of the perspective of this kid and the way that he looks at the world,' explains Levine.
_	This is observable in the way that companies often point out distinct characteristic in their products when compared to others that may be almost entirely the same.
_	Currently the problem is not finding the best way to filter information, but the way that these systems require to learn independently the information needs of users.
_	She elaborated, "I live for the applause but I don't live for the attention in the way that people just love you because you're famous.
_	Although rhythm is not a prosodic variable in the way that pitch or loudness are, it is usual to treat a language's characteristic rhythm as a part of its prosodic phonology.
_	Some have criticized Americans For Fair Taxation for the way that they present the FairTax plan.
_	Richard Fields of Melbourne's 3CR radio compared the way that she engaged audiences to Jona Lewie, John Sebastian and Ray Davies.
_	some components of this class of models differ from the way that species and
_	"Those first tours were very grueling in the way that it is when you’re not used to it", recalled Alvarez.
_	Rel Dowdell has been compared to John Singleton and Spike Lee in the way that his filmmaking blends urban storytelling and suspense to tackle relevant and universal social issues that are intimately intertwined with a powerful moral message.
_	I'm trying to tap into the way that civic and public life makes me feel and the way it makes other people feel," resulting in what the "New York Times" described as CDs "informed at their core by a sense of intense Jersey-tude."
_	Charlotte became interested in the teaching of art, and achieved a reform in the way that drawing was taught, abandoning the "geometric method" in favour of freer and more spontaneous processes.
_	Instead of focusing solely on given symbolic structures and texts, scholars stress the active, social construction of reality as well as the way that individual behaviour is determined by the context in which it occurs.
_	Cwynar’s work presents a marriage of old and new forms that are intended to challenge the way that people encounter visual and material culture in everyday life.
_	Hawaiian Outrigger Canoe Paddling was not only the way that native Hawaiians discovered the Hawaiian Islands, it was a part of their everyday lifestyle.
_	In Barcelona the two meet up with young Chilean refugees from the Pinochet regime; one of the recurring themes of the book is the way that "ordinary" people do - or do not - become aware of the sufferings of others in police states, including their own.
_	Executive producer Bill Podmore told Jack Tinker in the book "Coronation Street", that he was "extremely pleased" with the way that the "youngsters" had fitted in.
_	It consisted of an overhaul to the way that OpenGL works, calling for fundamental changes to the API.
_	The somewhat disorienting quality of the ethereal sound is due in part to the way that humans perceive and locate ranges of sounds.
_	Many proper names are obscure in meaning as they lack any apparent meaning in the way that ordinary words mean, probably for the practical reason that when they consist of Collective nouns, they refer to groups, even when they are inflected for the singular e.g. "committee".
_	So I'm hoping that this song, a couple years down the line, is going to serve as a cathartic experience for the both of us to be like, 'look, this is the way that things happened and whenever we're ready to move on, let's do that.'"
_	Unfortunately, the film is marred by Debbie Wiseman's trite, overly emotional score, which has the effect of needlessly underlining every point along the way that has otherwise been made so subtly.
_	The "Electra Junior" name did not catch on in the way that the original Electra's name had.
_	Social Construction is the way that human beings process the world around us in our minds.
_	It also recommended that fundamental changes be implemented in the way that doctors are overseen.
_	His widow Mary continues to maintain it, and to exhibit his work and that of artists from all over the globe, in exactly the way that Arnold would have wanted.
_	The students play an active role in the way that the sixth form is run in the form of a student council, led by the principal students with representatives from each mentor group.
_	In terms of integrated communications, the literature identifies different types of integration: (1) "Image integration" refers to messages that have a consistent look and feel, regardless of the medium; (2) "Functional integration" refers to capacity of different promotional tools to complement each other and deliver a unified, coherent message; (3) "Coordinated integration" refers to the ways that different internal and external agencies (e.g. web designers, advertising agencies, PR consultants) coordinate to provide a consistent message; (4) "Stakeholder integration" refers to the way that all stakeholders such as employees, suppliers, customers and others cooperate to communicate a shared understanding of the company's key messages and values and (5) "Relationship integration" refers to the way that communications professionals contribute to the company's overall corporate goals and quality management.
_	Based on statements and illustrations in this same book, it is stated one of earlier Talons succeeded the old Owlman in a manner parallel to the way that Wayne as Batman was succeeded by Grayson in the role of Batman for a period of time.
_	Nature can refer to the general realm of living plants and animals, and in some cases to the processes associated with inanimate objects–the way that particular types of things exist and change of their own accord, such as the weather and geology of the Earth.
_	Com gave 84% rating, praised the cinematography and concluded: "I was taken on an emotional roller coaster ride from feeling anger at the way that Olumide was treating his wife, to sadness for her and then happy when the relationship was back on track.
_	There are differences in the way that Oriental Bicolours are registered in different organisations.
_	There is also currently no legislation to stop investment managers voting with other people's money, in the way that the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 §78f(b)(10) bans broker-dealers voting on significant issues without instructions.
_	Sociologists tend to see patriarchy as a social product and not as an outcome of innate differences between the sexes and they focus attention on the way that gender roles in a society affect power differentials between men and women.
_	Malone explains that when Lenski's editor Helen Dean Fish saw a draft of the book, she objected to the way that Lenski, seeking to accurately portray how 1830s-era New England culture marginalized and subordinated children's experiences, had pushed the character of Phebe to the margins of the story.
_	Mr. Varner came to the College in the fall of 1953, as the new director of bands, and immediately started a reorganization of the way that the marching band was conceived.
_	The court did not explain, however, the way that or other differences between copyrights and patents called for contrary results as to international exhaustion.
_	The Hunt Commission or Commission on Presidential Nominations was a commission set up in 1981 by the Democratic Party in the United States in order to change the way that the party selected its presidential candidate.
_	He's using these things to make music in the way that he understood, rather than trying to appropriate the orchestra.
_	Various commercial urea processes are characterized by the conditions under which urea forms and the way that unconverted reactants are further processed.
_	The secret rule for a piece may for example control the way that piece moves, captures, or is captured, and may cause it to affect other pieces on the board.
_	Handwriting analysis does have its plausible-sounding separation from those other techniques though, and that's the whole "handwriting is brainwriting" idea — traits from the brain will be manifested in the way that it controls the muscles of the hand.
_	The German historian Detlev Peukert wrote "no homosexuals obtained reparations after 1945" and only a brave "few" even tried because the 1935 version of Paragraph 175 stayed in effect until 1969, and that despite the way that homosexual survivors had suffered "profound damage to their lives" that they remained outcasts in post-war Germany.
_	In 2003 she published "Branded: The Buying and Selling of Teenagers" which illustrates and criticizes the way that corporations chase teenagers and pre-teens.
_	She went on to talk about her battle with anorexia in her teens, "a part of me, almost consciously, made that decision that said, "I don't want to look like an adult woman because of the way that adult women are treated, as sex objects, I'm just going to starve myself, and if I don't ever grow boobs then nobody will ever be able to treat me like that and if I just stay looking like a young girl, by being stick thin, I'll be protected from that.", and I remember thinking that very consciously...
_	No doubt he expected it to speak to an underrecognized audience in the way that one did.
_	Most migrants who speak Malinke try to hide their origins and assimilate to the higher status society by changing the way that they speak.
_	A collection of user-friendly programme tools, known as the YFS Toolkit, has been developed by loveLife to enrich the way that YFS is managed, delivered and evaluated.
_	He said "This is the way that private business is run.
_	She apologizes to Alan for the way that she treated him, and promises that the rest of the Cougars will stop bullying, with the exception of Mary and Gary.
_	He criticizes the way that adults use religion to terrorize children.
_	This was not the way that the members called themselves at the time.
_	The books suggests other approaches to dealing with harassment, more akin to the way that spam is filtered.
_	In what the author refers to as a minimalistic approach, his writings include a limited vocabulary and short sentences to mimic the way that an average person telling a story would speak.
_	Further changes to the Victims of Crime Fund increased the amount of money in the Fund and changed the way that funds were distributed.
_	Throughout most of her modeling career, Evangelista was referred to as the fashion industry's "chameleon" for the way that she constantly reinvented herself with various hairstyles and ever-changing hair colors that inspired hair trends.
_	Cost of revenue is different from Costs of Goods Sold (COGS) in the way that it includes additional costs such as distribution, marketing and other.
_	And the way that I was raised, I just don't do that.
_	When Outweek ceased publication, Tracey and Pokorny continued their writing collaboration and produced a self-published zine called "Dead Jackie Susann Quarterly" which was heavily influenced by the house balls and the way that fame and celebrity was lived out in the ball rituals.
_	The ultimate step towards eliminating paper is to change the way that documents are created.
_	To date, this, and all prior Bell tests, have found that the hypothesis of local hidden variables is inconsistent with the way that physical systems behave.
_	After joining the Audit Office as a clerk at an early age, Ratu Madraiwiwi had steadily worked his way up through the civil service, establishing connections along the way that were later to prove decisive in the life of his son.
_	It features case studies of the author's work interviewing consumers in their homes and using his observations to create hypotheses as to why they use products the way that they do.
_	Therefore, a judge could reject another judge's opinion as simply an incorrect statement of the law, in the way that scientists regularly reject each other's conclusions as incorrect statements of the laws of science.
_	Critic John Berger agreed, pointing out Fasanella's left-liberal critique of urban living, "the violence of the daily necessity of the streets .. the way that the density of the working population makes itself felt."
_	Smollett revealed that he formed a bond with Daniels and felt that because the character is loosely based on Lee Daniels own life, "whoever was going to play Jamal had to be able to bond with Lee because at the end of the day, Jamal is so close to Lee's heart that you had to tell it the way that he was truthful."
_	The portrayal of women scientists in film refers to the way that professional women in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) fields are written as film characters.
_	The new phyletic approach changed the way that taxonomists considered plant classification, incorporating evolutionary information into their schemata, but this did little to further define the circumscription of Dioscoreaceae.
_	During the 12th century, powerful guilds which controlled the way that trade was conducted were established and were often incorporated into the charters granted to market towns.
_	They manage to get some money but Kavya isn’t happy about the way that money is obtained.
_	Over time, Greek speakers would change pronunciation to avoid such a collision, and the way that vowels changed determined the dialect.
_	These finds were interpreted in the way that from time to time the hunting activities of the inhabitants of Asiab were unsuccessful and that then they were forced to consume food which they usually did not like.
_	Second, the way that the new attitude justifies this content by using the language of other attitudes and categories.
_	To elaborate on the way that the reference model is used to implement software and to keep track of the scope of implementation methods, the business control model and the business process model will be explained in detail.
_	OFSTED has also publicly criticised the £225,000 figure paid to the head of AET as an example of what it calls 'poor use of public money' as well as questioning the way that Trusts such as AET spend so much money on 'expensive consultants or advisers to compensate for deficits in leadership.
_	Another transition mode is change the way that economy grows and practice mode.
_	If indeed it turns out the way that people expect it to turn out, the American people will have spoken, and they will have rejected the course of action the president is on."
_	Regardless of the way that the Algerian patriot is treated by police, he must in all circumstances, when presented to the prosecutor state that he has been beaten and tortured...
_	A prominent feature of the bridge is its innovative curved design and the way that it crosses the river at an angle.
_	Sir Murray broadly concluded that there were no problems with the way that the inquiry had been handled.
_	After completing the second season, Soderbergh revealed he was finished directing for the show and said, "I told them [Cinemax] that I'm going to do the first two years and then we are going to break out the story for seasons 3 and 4 and try and find a filmmaker or filmmakers to do this the way that I did.
_	Chapter five also looks at how the rights of the upper and the middle class take priority over the rights of the sex workers in the way that the middle and upper class feel threatened and uncomfortable with the prostitutes but the rights of the prostitutes are not taken into account.
_	(Early Georgian houses can be distinguished from late ones in the way that the windows are not set back from the brick frontage.)
_	Clark sued the school board claiming that the school was violating Iowa's law and the state constitution by the way that they were segregating the school.
_	And then, in the middle of the book, comes the linchpin of the work - a one-hundred-page chapter on color, which dramatically conveys the way that consciousness and spirit are manifested in the world.
_	At NCoC, “civic health” is considered the way that communities are organized to define and address public problems.
_	For the people of Cuba they cannot understand how someone can dictate them the way that they are being treated.
_	Robert Wilson set up the Ormeau Bakery in 1875, revolutionising the way that bread was made and distributed.
_	"Heaven" will be the place where life will be lived to the full, in the way that the designer planned, each believer "loving the Lord their God with all their heart and with all their soul and with all their mind" and "loving their neighbour as themselves" (adapted from Matthew 22:37-38, the Great Commandment)—a place of great joy, without the negative aspects of current earthly life.
_	More completely, etiology is the study of the causes, origins, or reasons behind the way that things are, or the way they function, or it can refer to the causes themselves.
_	Reynolds described the period as "a fair match for the sixties in terms of the sheer amount of great music created, the spirit of adventure and idealism that infused it, and the way that the music seemed inextricably connected to the political and social turbulence of its era".
_	Although he held this post for just three years, he greatly affected the way that the island would be governed for the rest of the century.
_	The new Sky Marshal Phid, impressed with the way that Sky Marshal Anoke was rendered servile by the Arachnids' religion, decides the Federation should adopt a religion, and Christianity is embraced by the Federation.
_	It is often used to extinguish fires as part of Automatic fire suppression systems, especially in facilities housing electronic equipment and will not damage electronics in the way that water will.
_	Questions also soon began to be raised about the way that Campbell introduced Biblical criticism into his preaching, questioning the traditional ascription of books, and the origins of the text.
_	During a follow up interview with the Guardian, Mark Goldring repeated his apology for the way that Oxfam responded to the behaviour of some of their staff and acknowledged that major reforms were needed.
_	A free will is one that has the power to bring about its own actions in a way that is distinct from the way that normal laws of nature cause things to happen.
_	One approach that describes the way that CMC's technical capacities work in concert with users' impression development intentions is the hyperpersonal model of CMC (Walther, 1996).
_	One of his most notable experiments looked at the way that people judged the length of lines.
_	Busses and metro systems are not personalized, they run on pre-planned routes and schedules, making stops along the way that do not serve each individual, only the group of riders as a whole.
_	E-V257/L19 showed a parallel with its sibling clade E-V68 in the way that both clades show signs of having migrated from North Africa to southern Europe across the Mediterranean sea.
_	Such changes reflected a shift on the way that Biology is taught in survey courses.
_	Bryce Huebner, Michael Bruno, and Hagop Sarkissian (2010) have further argued that the way Westerners understand consciousness differs systematically from the way that East Asians understand consciousness, while Adam Arico (2010) has offered some evidence for thinking that ordinary ascriptions of consciousness are sensitive to framing effects (such as the presence or absence of contextual information).
_	Despite these differences, a meta-analysis of 15 experience sampling studies has suggested that there is a great deal of overlap in the way that extraverts and introverts behave.
_	Em Griffin, author of the Communication book; "A First Look At Communication Theory" and Professor Emeritus of Communications at Wheaton College in Illinois defines mindfulness as "the way that in-group members and strangers can reduce their anxiety and uncertainty to optimum levels".
_	"The Independent" stated that wonky pop caused a change in "pop's division of labour ... away from focus-grouped, production-line pop, and towards DIY [and] ... fresh flavours", which is rejuvenating pop in the 2000s in the way that Britpop gave a shot in the arm to pop in the 1990s.
_	It is also interesting to compare the results of games of "Railway Rivals" with the way that real railways developed in a particular area.
_	While Yeats never embraces Fascism the way that Ezra Pound did, the theme of the relationship between art and politics appears to focus heavily on that particular form of government as it was the prevailing political force in two of the three countries mentioned in the poem.
_	Paul II reinforced the localization of this view by permitting local Aztec dances during the ceremony in which he declared Juan Diego a saint, spoke in Nahuatl as part of the ceremony, called Juan Diego "the talking eagle" and asked him to show "the way that leads to the "Dark Virgin" of Tepeyac".
_	No foreign police are open to bribery in the way that Harold was told.
_	The Court declined to apply "Mithu v. State of Punjab", in which the mandatory death penalty had been found unconstitutional, stating it was "not possible" to interpret Singapore's Article 9(1) in the way that the Indian Supreme Court had interpreted Article 21 of the Indian Constitution.
_	McComb sings about feeling numb, or 'Cold' about the way that the relationship ended."
_	The superforming process varies mostly in the way that the metal is introduced to the form; the main 4 variations are:
_	Microsoft released Security Bulletin MS12-006 on January 10, 2012, which fixed the BEAST vulnerability by changing the way that the Windows Secure Channel (SChannel) component transmits encrypted network packets from the server end.
_	Burnett does not believe that music is limited in the way that most of the commercial marketing of it often presents to the majority of the world.
_	Sensuous knowledge represents things only in the way that they affect our senses.
_	There are signals next the way that prevent the visitor from animal attacks, advising the visitor to close the window and not to disturb the animals.
_	Her simultaneous studies were on scientific communication, to improve the way that scientists communicate with the public.
_	In the Latin world, Evagrius' influence came in the way that John Cassian, one of his most faithful disciples, preserved and propagated the basic elements of Evagrius' teaching on the stages of the monastic life, tripartite anthropology, and the eight thoughts (although Cassian never mentions Evagrius by name, since his reputation was already tainted).
_	Leven is also an unnatural offing in the way that he can manipulate the future over great distances.
_	Regardless of the way the tension between universities, individual scientists, and the scientific revolution itself is perceived, there was a discernible impact on the way that university education was constructed.
_	It's unusual for a company to recognise and remedy their error in the way that L'Oreal have, so we really appreciate their response."
_	The name comes from the way that a pencil could naturally be drawn along these corners.
_	However, Machin, angered by the way that Evguenie bullies and belittles Machine, ejects Evguenie from the house.
_	More specifically the way that stem cell research has been involved in neuroscience is through the treatment of neurodegenerative diseases and brain tumors.
_	Steve things do not unfold the way that she imagined.
_	Similar to the way that a changing magnetic field generates an electric field, a changing electric field generates a magnetic field.
_	Over all, a lovely pattern of snow dapples the sky in much the way that pattern works on Azuchi–Momoyama period decorative screens.
_	"Computers, in the way that they communicate, instruct and take turns interacting, are close enough to humans that they encourage social responses.
_	In the way that the dorsal pathway processes the moving pattern and in turn suppresses the ventral pathway's representation of the static salient objects, the same processes and patterns of activation may be found in the motion silencing illusion.
_	Elsewhere, she has confided that she “took a risk” in the way that she wrote her 2006 book "M.L.K.:
_	They called for a change in the way that the church was run and insisted that the buying and selling of indulgences and religious positions be stopped as well as the papal corruption that had been allowed to occur.
_	Todd VanDerWerff, writing on the overall show for "The A.V. Club", used "The Cutie Mark Chronicles" as an example of the show's overarching theme of "the way that little kids often look up to and emulate teenagers, even though those teenagers don’t have it all together" and letting the viewer "in on their insecurities and problems".
_	Though U.S. troops were able to fend off the Vietcong and ultimately prevailed militarily, this attack signaled a turning point in both U.S. troop morale and in public trust of the government's reports on the progress of the war, as many Americans had no idea that the Vietcong were capable of infiltrating American and South Vietnamese headquarters the way that they did.
_	It was, in other words, an attack on Robert Walpole and the way that he was referred to as "the Great Man".
_	"Though heaven hath set a veil upon these eyes," he says, "love's one star ... Shows clear the way that leads me to thy heart."
_	The types of video modulation can be classified by the way that a carrier wave is combined with video signal.
_	There is an interplay between the intended use of technology and the way that people use the technology.
_	The accommodations, security, and treatment of TCNs can vary greatly from the way that U.S. and multinational coalition personnel are treated.
_	This is often called an 'exact' method, but that is because it is based on the cumulative probabilities of the binomial distribution (i.e., exactly the correct distribution rather than an approximation), but the intervals are not exact in the way that one might assume: the discontinuous nature of the binomial distribution precludes any interval with exact coverage for all population proportions.
_	The visual light curves of the different supernova types all depend at late times on radioactive heating, but they vary in shape and amplitude because of the underlying mechanisms, the way that visible radiation is produced, the epoch of its observation, and the transparency of the ejected material.
_	Race not only plays an important role in the way that employees act with each other, but also how employees act toward customers based on what race they are associated with.
_	However, the definition of the class PPP highlights the way that the pigeonhole principle is a generalization of the "parity argument on a directed graph" principle that assures that search problems belonging to PPAD are indeed total.
_	Questions began to be raised about the way that Campbell introduced Biblical criticism into his preaching, questioning the traditional ascription of books, and the origins of the text.
_	This recording is believed to use the taxi horns in the way that Gershwin had intended using the notes A flat, B flat, a higher C and a lower D.
_	In any event, during that time he lived his life in the local bars, becoming increasingly aware of the way that when his Jewish friends disappeared to concentration camps they seemed never to come back.
_	There are numerous references to the hand, or arm, of God in the Hebrew Bible, most clearly metaphorical in the way that remains current in modern English, but some capable of a literal interpretation.
_	Hayman, a New York City-born Jew, saw the way that Montrealers had embraced Jackie Robinson with the Montreal Royals and believed the city was ready to accept a black football player.
_	Uematsu was personally very pleased with the way that the soundtrack for "Final Fantasy VI" turned out, and has said in interviews that he felt that "with the satisfaction and excitement I felt after finishing that project, I thought I had reached my primary goal, and could quit doing game music with no regrets."
_	The reason that qualities are nevertheless 'given' is that it is only an infinite understanding that can grasp the rules for the generation of qualities in the way that a human understanding can grasp the rules for drawing a circle.
_	Suddenly, the community may change the way that it treats the person.
_	Of the issues before it, this is certainly one of the best in the way that it showcases these characters individually whilst continuing to develop a story that is both interesting and entertaining."
_	As for representation, techno-animism is often embodied in the engineering design of objects and the way that people interact with those objects.
_	Average length of specimens are 2.50 cm (1 in) long and is hypothesized to have sucked the blood of pterosaurs in the Cretaceous, in the way that bat fleas feed on bat blood today.
_	In most cases, these solar maps are constructed out of satellite images and allow internet users to zoom in and out of the map that they are viewing much in the way that Google Earth and Bing Aerial operates.
_	An Act of Parliament in 1868, changed the way that parochial clergy were paid, and permitted perpetual curates to be called vicars.
_	The developers also noted that the Fan Requests helped to tap into the way that players had previously played games in the series, setting their own personal goals for certain songs.
_	Comparing with the traditional library services, the digital library can provide better services in the way that:
_	But according to Keen, this is an over-simplification of the way that the real economy behaves.
_	A reviewer for "Next Generation" praised the game's innovative strategic gameplay, but argued that the PlayStation version is not as good as the 3DO original, citing a lack of additional content, choppier animation, a slower pace, and the way that the player-controlled unit straightens itself out in the wrong direction whenever it bumps into a wall.
_	Anthropomorphism is the innate tendency to attribute human traits, emotions, and intentions to animals, and it is an important aspect of the way that people relate to animals such as pets.
_	Are we really about to see a time when ESPN can no longer afford to cover its most valuable property in the way that historically it has?"
_	MacArthur was annoyed at the way that Royle, a Royal Navy officer, communicated directly with the Admiralty; he was also aware that Royle had been critical of SWPA's command arrangements, and of some of his decisions.
_	I liked the way that sounded and so I wrote a song around it."
_	The century saw a major shift in the way that many people lived, with changes in politics, ideology, economics, society, culture, science, technology, and medicine.
_	Shepherds Hill Group formed an integral part of Newcastle's integrated defence system, and changes made to this system since the 1880s reflect the way that NSW defence policy responded to new threats as well as technological developments.
_	According to Neather, who was present at closed meetings in 2000, a secret Government report called for mass immigration to change Britain's cultural make-up, and that "mass immigration was the way that the government was going to make the UK truly multicultural".
_	From 1968 onwards, Resnais's films no longer addressed, at least directly, big political issues in the way that a number of his previous ones had done, and his next project seemed to mark a change of direction.
_	Whether or not you agree with Park's take on voodoo science, a message of the book is that if scientists do not take a more significant role in the way that science is disseminated to the public and especially to politicians, voodoo science will continue to survive."
_	He enjoyed the reunion between the Fringe team and Phillip Broyles, stating, "the way that he says “Agent Dunham” to Olivia and the way she answers “Philip” is one of the sweetest moments in Fringe history, and well-earned."
_	Obviously, air power had affected the outcome of the battle but not in the way that had been hoped for.
_	In the cone snail (Conus catus) ballistic movement can be seen in the way that it fires is harpoon-like radular tooth into its prey.
_	In 2009 a security flaw in the way that transparent proxies operate was published by Robert Auger, and the Computer Emergency Response Team issued an advisory listing dozens of affected transparent and intercepting proxy servers.
_	The song concludes with the artist lashing out against the listener with satirical self-pity, a rebellion against the way that fans saw Uncle Tupelo as only an archetype of Gram Parsons inspired country rock.
_	Peter Bright of "Ars Technica" argued that "the way that the Windows 7 UAC 'improvements' have been made completely exempts Microsoft's developers from having to do that work themselves.
_	This schema is a sketch or outline of the way that the parts of knowledge are organized into a whole system of science.
_	In May 1916 he resigned from the FAU because he objected to the way that the unit had been placed under military command.
_	Dukagjini's military success against the Ottomans was never extremely successful; he also lacked the ability to unite the country and the Albanian people in the way that Skanderbeg had.
_	"The A.V. Club" gave the episode a B+, complimenting the plot of the episode and incorporating the lead characters in the real-life event, stating: "What’s fascinating to me is the way that the show erects an incredibly convincing false history around actual events (like Alexander Haig coming into possession of the nuclear football), then uses it to illuminate the marriage of Phillip and Elizabeth."
_	This is similar to the way that Gauss's law defines the charge enclosed by a surface as the normal electric force multiplied by the area.
_	These refer to the way that the laser beam is moved over the material to be cut or processed.
_	"Snow and Milk": here, the binary opposition of white and black, cold and hot, is juxtaposed against the traditional artistic figure of the female nude, providing a symbolic matrix within which to consider the way that Western art has objectified as well as celebrated femininity and the body in general.
_	Also returning from AFL Live 2 is manager career mode, which is very similar to 'be a pro' mode in the way that you can start from the U18 TAC and work your way up, or you can jump straight into the AFL.
_	The authors of the "Buildings of England" series describe the interior as "superb", particularly in the way that the visitor experiences "increasing richness" when "progressing eastwards".
_	Writing in "Vogue" during the 2007 campaign, Rebecca Johnson called her "Hillary's secret weapon" and noted that what seemed to motivate Abedin were not the details of policy or political horse-racing, but rather "the way that politicians are uniquely invested with the power to help individuals—as with, say, the woman whose legs were badly broken by a piece of plane fuselage on September 11", whom Abedin and Clinton visited in the hospital.
_	Part of what held up Isis and other companies in the field, was the way that the oligomers were chemically modified to prevented hydrolysis which consequently also reduced affinity to the antisense molecules' targets; around 2004 the field was shifting to second generation modifications.
_	Whereas Mulvey notes that, when she first began writing about films, she had been "preoccupied by Hollywood's ability to construct the female star as ultimate spectacle, the emblem and guarantee of its fascination and power," she is now "more interested in the way that those moments of spectacle were also moments of narrative halt, hinting at the stillness of the single celluloid frame."
_	At a conference called "Techonomy" Mark Zuckerberg stated in regards to Donald Trump, "There's a profound lack of empathy in asserting that the only reason why someone could have voted the way that they did is because they saw some fake news".
_	It later emerged that Wakefield had received funding from litigants against vaccine manufacturers and that he had not informed colleagues or medical authorities of his conflict of interest; had this been known, publication in "The Lancet" would not have taken place in the way that it did.
_	Evolution is the way that the Holy creates in space and in time, in every sphere: material, biological, social, cultural, psychological, and spiritual.
_	is modelled on the way that true measures push forward (see the section cylinder set measures versus true measures).
_	He quoted the song "it ain't what you do but the way that you do it... that's what gets results!" and noted "It's one of life's great quirks that trashy lines often contain valuable nuggets of philosophy.
_	He had expressed his anger with the way that the U.S. government was running the country.<ref name="Lundy pp. 14/15">Lundy, Zeth, "33 Songs in the Key of Life", pp. 14/15.</ref>
_	(This parallels the way that members of fellow NYC noise rockers Sonic Youth began their careers in Branca's ensembles; Thurston Moore of Sonic Youth did play with Chatham as well.)
_	He believed that he received the forgiveness for his sins and saw the way that led to the eternal life.
_	These states were small and, with the exception of Navarre, did not have the capacity for attacking the Muslims in the way that Asturias did, but their mountainous geography rendered them relatively safe from being conquered, and their borders remained stable for two centuries.
_	While exact motives behind complex social behaviors are difficult to distinguish, the "ability to put oneself in the shoes of another person and experience events and emotions the way that person experienced them" is the definitive factor for truly altruistic behavior according to Batson's empathy-altruism hypothesis.
_	Hall tore into the way that white people, such as Kevin Costner, insisted on becoming spokespeople for the pain of Native Americans.
_	Another study used resonance with nonreciprocity triggered by angular-momentum biasing, which more closely mimics the way that signals passively circulate in a ferrite circulator.
_	Criticism has also been made of the way that advertising is being incorporated into the service.
_	From a sociological point of view, some economists argue that mathematical formulas actually change the way that economic agents use and price assets.
_	It uses studies of naturally occurring conversation to critique the way that topics have been conceptualised and treated in psychology.
_	At a conference on Lake Como, Italy in 1999, he explained that several new technologies — including gene therapy, stem cell therapy, tissue engineering, and biomechanical prosthetics — collectively opened up a new ability, to which he applied the term "regenerative medicine" in the way that it is used today: "an approach to therapy that ... employs human genes, proteins and cells to re-grow, restore or provide mechanical replacements for tissues that have been injured by trauma, damaged by disease or worn by time" and "offers the prospect of curing diseases that cannot be treated effectively today, including those related to aging."
_	Laura Miller of Salon wrote that "No one writes better or more stirringly about the way books shape a reader’s identity, and about the way that talking books with good friends becomes integral to how we understand the books, our friends and ourselves.
_	This Saturday morning show on ITV, in which she played Dawn Lodge, had a similar premise to that of "The Kumars at No. 42" in the way that the show was part sitcom, part chat show and based at a domestic residence.
_	However, the way that the conference identified socialism was in terms similar to those the Socialist International used at the time.
_	More specifically, the way that news in sports circulates nowadays versus the pre-internet era where sports news was mainly on T.V., radio, and newspapers.
_	Toward the end of the sessions it came down to Vedder to finish up the material, with Ament observing that "the way the record started and the way that it finished is probably two different things."
_	A review of the way that the stones were measured by Lothrop reveals that claims of precision are due to misinterpretations of the methods used in their measurement.
_	Ayckbourn deliberately sought to keep the character of Julia as one that ordinary teenage girls could relate to, in particular the way that ordinary parents push their children to achieve things on their behalf.
_	The judges were also very impressed by the way that the project used digital media in ground-breaking and novel ways to interact with audiences.
_	Solnit stated that the hashtag helped change the way that society talks about rape.
_	Dot informs them on the way that she is heading to Denver to restart her life, and that her mother has died.
_	Id Software's John D. Carmack praised Native Client at QuakeCon 2012, saying: "if you have to do something inside a browser, Native Client is much more interesting as something that started out as a really pretty darn clever x86 hack in the way that they could sandbox all of this in user mode interestingly.
_	Salas continued in her review that it was not a song that should be good, "but does that really matter when it’s good in the way that songs are during the summer [...]
_	In India some intellectual references of the movement can be found in the works of Vandana Shiva, an ecologist and feminist, who in her book "Biopiracy" documents the way that the natural capital of indigenous peoples and ecoregions is converted into forms of intellectual capital, which are then recognized as exclusive commercial property without sharing the private utility thus derived.
_	Richard often refers to Clarissa as "Mrs. Dalloway" – her namesake – because she distracts herself from her own life the way that the Woolf character does.
_	Because of the way that these churches dominate the region, the area has become known as the "Land of the Cross-Tipped Churches."
_	She connected these women's fashion to the way that American first ladies dress, inspiring her show "The President's Wives."
_	As expressed by George Mead in "Mind, Self and Society", symbolic interactionism suggests that the self is defined by the way that society responds to the individual.
_	Moreover, the chaplains were to hear each other’s confessions "in the way that they know is most helpful for the salvation of their souls."
_	No other film in the series has a genuine marriage to each of its partners the way that Schrader’s does."
_	Later, both Miguel Najdorf and János Flesch claimed to have broken that record, but their efforts were not properly monitored the way that Koltanowski's was.
_	Through this music, the lyrics quickly became misogynistic and violent in response to the way that these marginalized cultures viewed mainstream society.
_	Here he explained that color results from the way that the retina reacts to sensation.
_	She concluded from this that "at least some of the more knowledgeable scientists did not interpret this statement the way that it was intended [by the Discovery Institute] to be interpreted by the general public."
_	Soral’s withering response, on his website, was to invite potential readers to “prefer the original to the copy” Soral’s implicit condemnation of the Zemmour book for its lack of originality must nevertheless be set against the way that Soral’s own work was heavily influenced by the Marxist philosopher and sociologist Michel Clouscard.
_	They found that, based on the way that stress was conducted along the claw, they were ideal for climbing.
_	The EViD lab, led by Dr. Katie Shilton, focuses on the way that ethics and policy affect the design and use of technology.
_	In 2016, Josh Franceschi began to criticise the way that tickets are re-sold for extortionate prices as there were consequences for both musicians and fans.
_	Instead, there were lots of explosions, lots of yelling, and very little that held my attention or made me feel anything in the way that, say, some of the sacrifices in "Children of Earth" did.'
_	Ede music is very diverse and playing music is the way that Ede people communicate to both other people, and according to their beliefs, God (Ede language: yang).
_	He was of the opinion of Epicurus, that the soul dies with the body, and maintained that human happiness consisted in temporal pleasures; but he did not follow these in the way that Epicurus did, that is by making long fasts to have afterwards pleasure in eating dry bread; but was fond of good and delicate viands, and ate them without waiting to be hungry; and for this sin he is damned as a Heretic in this place.
_	Friedman challenged the way that the Freudian theory of the Oedipus complex was used by psychoanalysts at that time.
_	Of course, any phylogenetic algorithm could also be statistically inconsistent if the model it employs to estimate the preferred tree does not accurately match the way that evolution occurred in that clade.
_	Martianus Capella (5th century AD) identified Aion with Cronus (Latin Saturnus), whose name caused him to be theologically conflated with Chronos ("Time"), in the way that the Greek ruler of the underworld Plouton (Pluto) was conflated with Ploutos (Plutus, "Wealth").
_	that led Freud, as his writings show, to pave the way that shall forever bear his name".
_	That was the way that ""barbarian newcomers"" could fit amongst the Romanised natives.
_	His production style has proven influential in several general respects: "his recording techniques have helped change the way that modern musicians – particularly electronic musicians – view the studio.
_	Other ballistic fabrics, such as Dyneema, have been developed that resist puncture, and which do not degrade the way that Kevlar does.
_	Recovering, still almost entirely lame in bed, and unable to speak, he became strongly aware of the significance of non-verbal communication - body language, tone of voice and the way that these non-verbal expressions often directly contradicted the verbal ones.
_	According to Scheidemann's own recollection, someone told him along the way that the Spartacist (communist) leader Karl Liebknecht intended to declare Germany a Soviet Republic.
_	But watching this 1978 film again recently, I was struck more than ever with the conviction that this is the story of a teenage girl, told by her, and its subject is the way that hope and cheer have been beaten down in her heart.
_	What is distinctive of Carmelites is the way that they practice the elements of prayer, community and service, taking particular inspiration from the prophet Elijah and the Blessed Virgin Mary, patrons of the Order.
_	On of the arguments of the Turkic version is that Shamkhals were elected in the way that is traditional for Turkic peoples — tossing a red apple.
_	Carson lacked the mercurial, electric personality of Paar, and his version of "The Tonight Show" never riveted the country's attention the way that Paar's had, but his more predictable approach eventually became part of the cultural landscape by dint of the fact that the viewership, in a basically three-network paradigm, was infinitely more monolithic than it later became.
_	The series marked a big shift in the way that life in Australia is represented in TV drama.
_	The palace was first excavated in the 1930, but the change in the way that the river runs has washed away a lot of the foundations of the palace.
_	Michael sums up his feelings for Toby in the episode "Casino Night," asking, "Why are you the way that you are?
_	We changed the way that people looked at television."
_	DataRank is different from similar social listening and social analytics services in the way that it organizes the unstructured data and conversations that it brings in.
_	As former teammate Steve Kerr explains, "Mark really revolutionized the way that people attack the screen and roll.
_	Describing it as "the closest that Browning wrote to political propaganda", Isobel Armstrong stated that the play can be taken as "anti-Corn Law" writing in the way that it promotes the welfare of the townspeople against the ruling class, here represented by the struggle between Valence and Colombe to rule the Duchy fairly.
_	Arthur Symons also remarked on the way that Browning writes in a "deliberate and reflective" way.
_	It is assumed due to the title that it was released in 1998, however from 1998, all of Alexia's releases were through Dancepool, so it may be likely that this was released in late 1997 and named 'Remix Album '98' similar to the way that compilation albums released at the end of the year title themselves to the following year.
_	In "Chisom v. Edwards" (1988), a suit started in 1987 and brought under the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (as amended in 1982), the federal court found that the state's "system for electing justices diluted black voting strength" in the way that the districts were defined, in violation of the VRA.
_	He suggested that it had changed the way that "Beowulf" was valued, and that it had started "a new era of appreciation" of the poem.
_	And this is the way that transparency works and that corruption has been confronted in many cases."
_	He examines the way that colonial state structures were created to protect tributary populations involved in the silver, fur and slave trades.
_	An example of the latter is the way that cricket dropped the Gentlemen v Players fixture after amateurism was abolished in January 1963 and introduced the Gillette Cup limited overs knockout competition for primarily commercial reasons.
_	Critics also argued that with the large number of inconsistencies and exceptions with the doctrine of privity, it was "bad" law, as it provided no reliable rule; the way that the law works in theory is hugely different from how it is enforced in the courts.
_	In accord, Willa Paskin wrote in "Slate" that "the disfigured, beating heart of "Killing Eve" is the way that Villanelle’s gender and manner, her very femininity, keep our acculturated brains from being appropriately terrified of her."
_	Decay theory is similar to interference theory in the way that old memories are lost over time.
_	The context established is artificial in the way that it is created by the researcher to elicit the kind of social relationship under examination.
_	The test assumes that the way that the examinee responds to each frustrating situation depicts how they behave in the face of frustration.
_	The fourth season sought to be different from the previous series of "Enterprise" in the way that story arcs worked.
_	In reference to Benzino's shooting in particular, creator and executive producer Mona Scott-Young said "The timing and the way that it happened, you have another moment that you go, you can’t make this stuff up.
_	Numeraries generally have jobs outside of Opus Dei, although some are asked to work internally full-time and many modify the way that they go about their professional goals in order to be available for the Prelature.
_	Western churches have arrived at the position that, although the "Filioque" is doctrinally sound, the way that it was inserted into the Nicene Creed has created an unnecessary obstacle to ecumenical dialogue.
_	It is meticulous in the way that a curse might be."
_	Abusive power and control (or controlling behaviour or coercive control) is the way that abusers gain and maintain power and control over a victim for an abusive purpose such as psychological, physical, sexual, or financial abuse.
_	Nachmanides argued that the Biblical prophets regarded the future messiah as a human, a person of flesh and blood, and not as divine, in the way that Christians view Jesus.
_	This theory goes opposite to dualism in the way that it proposes no gap between the human mind and measurable matter.
_	The campaign generated over 800,000 responses and drew media attention for the way that Time Warner Cable handled the dispute.
_	He presented it in the form of a letter written directly to the boy, explaining why he was deciding the case in the way that he was.
_	What really matters are these two overheated voices working with and against each other, and the way that undeniable beat really comes alive when there is actually a beautiful melody underneath it."
_	Gough devised and constructed a wooden housing for a loudspeaker unit which importantly also acted as an acoustic chamber, rather in the way that the body of a violin serves as a sound box for the strings.
_	As Hudson explained, "Our writers write into a dialogue editor and that becomes fused with the way that you end up seeing many different pieces of Matinee play out in combination when you have a conversation with characters."
_	Differing from the traditional step-wise process, synthovation is a spiral, dynamic, and continuously moving process toward completion of the design and throughout the life of the project, including end-of life recycling and design for disassembly, a component of design for environment (DfE), with innovations added along the way that will increase the sustainability of the project over its entire life cycle.
_	The legend goes by the way that, this village and surrounding village were grazing ground for the cows of local chieftain from Kayathar.
_	In 2005, the European Monitoring Centre on Racism and Xenophobia (EUMC) published a working definition of antisemitism which gave as an example of the way that antisemitism might manifest itself.
_	I feel like I'm the only one out of the coast that's doing this gangsta rap shit the way that it used to be done...how niggas used to put detail in their music, not just going to the club and turning up."
_	Poniewozik also praised it, and wrote, "Artie and Becky's arc, on the other hand, really worked: it was sweet, uncomfortable and messy in the way that Glee does well."
_	Consequently, critics describe these policies as zero-logic policies because they treat juveniles the way that adults would be treated — or more harshly, given that children are seldom granted full permission to speak up in their own defense to adults with authority over them.
_	This retronymic process is linguistically comparable to the way that the words "electronic computer" and "digital computer" at first were needed to make useful distinctions in computing technology, but with the later irrelevance of the distinction, "computer" alone now covers their meaning.
_	Bremner is an example of the way that hip hop feminism creates space for women in male dominated spaces.
_	Differences between the "Sacrifice of Isaac" created by Brunelleschi and Ghiberti include the way that the panel was constructed and the overall efficiency of the panel.
_	GAD, a presynaptic autoantigen, is generally thought to play a key role in the condition, but exact details of the way that autoantibodies affect SPS patients are not known.
_	Theology was also affected by the change from absolute truth to relative truth in the way that mathematics is related to the world around it, that was a result of this paradigm shift.
_	The school council works similar to the way that the form groups work, as two school councilors are chosen from each tutor group and in Year 9 a selected amount of them may become trainee prefects throughout year 10, this gives them a better chance to become prefects and house captains in Year 11.
_	They are special in the way that each of them originally practices a particular profession which connects with one of the eight virtues and the town of that virtue.
_	Boyle said that any sequel to "Trainspotting" would be loosely based on "Porno" which he has described as "not a great book in the way that "Trainspotting", the original novel, is genuinely a masterpiece".
_	If one language uses roots from another language to coin words (in the way that many European languages use Greek and Latin roots to devise new words such as "telephone", etc.), this is an indication that the second language is a classical language.
_	These falls descend in stages from a height of 250 meters, flowing into seven pools on the way that tempt you to swim in them.
_	Day’s earlier works tended to follow the fashionable Grecian Style, which combined German, French, and English versions of the Greek Revival style to create a design trend wholly American in the way that it took popular styles and combined and elaborated on them.
_	In this framework, the Hamiltonian formalism in mechanics is generalized to field theory in the way that a field is represented as a system that varies both in space and in time.
_	Blobbiness also threatens Platonic universals: a particular instantiating a universal in a world of Platonic universals becomes a matter of the blob-particular having a relation to a universal "elsewhere" (in the Platonic heaven, say), rather than having an internal relation in the way that a chemical element does to a constituent atom.
_	This is represented as a Christian metaphor for the way that God uses challenges to mould a person's character.
_	Theo Barker the second Bishop of Bathurst, the Very Reverend Dr. Joseph Byrne made special arrangements with his vicar-general, Reverend Dr. John Dunne, about the way that he was to be interred.
_	Partly in response to pressures of this kind, proposals for reform of the way that court business is conducted have been under consideration for some time.
_	Writer and activist Cheryl Clarke wrote essays like "The Failure to Transform: Homophobia in the Black Community" and "Lesbianism: An Act of Resistance" which both explore the way that white male patriarchy and white supremacy create the gendered and racialized forms of homophobia that black lesbians experience.
_	Authors and composers are not commonly referred to as "Orientalist" in the way that artists are, and relatively few specialized in Oriental topics or styles, or are even best known for their works including them.
_	Some say a true papyromancer can crumple up any piece of paper, unfold it, and predict the future from the creased lines reading the creased paper the way that a palm reader would read a person’s palm.
_	There is no Island-specific opt-out of the BBC regional news programme "North West Tonight", in the way that the Channel Islands get their own version of "Spotlight".
_	There will be stuff that will go completely over your head for sure, but because of the way that they're telling this last season, it is this beautiful standalone conclusion."
_	British or American spelling can be used and they can be used together (in the way that Australian and New Zealanders will use American spellings for some words and British spellings for other words).
_	Aren't all beautiful words justifying wars only the way that we, people, devised to reconcile our consciences with killing?
_	Since diesel engines are unthrottled, EGR does not lower throttling losses in the way that it does for SI engines.
_	Odom was fearless in the way that he wrote about the luxury wood industry in his hometown.
_	It can be distinguished by its thinner fruit bodies, a black line in the flesh, and the way that the tubes often break into irregular flattened teeth in maturity.
_	As usual the season started with a 34-43 away defeat at Swindon, but there was encouragement in the way that Eric Boocock twice beat Barry Briggs, relieving him of the Silver Sash match race title in the process, and the consensus was that Pander was worth more than a solitary point from his first match.
_	One notable characteristic on the way that The Girl Who Was Plugged In was written was how the author used a male narrator to tell the story to a predominantly male audience in order to play with readers’ expectations on how the story will pan out.
_	Final results are, in most cases, awarded on the standard British undergraduate degree classification scale, although some universities award something structurally similar to 'Distinction', 'Merit', 'Pass' or 'Fail', as this is often the way that taught postgraduate master's degrees are classified.
_	For some, George Combe's ""Constitution"" [1828], in the way that it advocated personal responsibility and the possibility of naturally sanctioned self-improvement through education or proper self-control, largely inaugurated the self-help movement;" In 1841, an essay by Ralph Waldo Emerson, entitled Compensation, was published suggesting "every man in his lifetime needs to thank his faults" and "acquire habits of "self-help"" as "our strength grows out of our weakness."
_	In contrast, Ion is able to confess to Esther in the manga version right before he goes to talk to his grandmother (though it is revealed along the way that he still had to muster up a great amount of courage to do so, blushing furiously when looking back on it.).
_	Allen are all troubled by the way that he has been isolating himself from everyone.
_	In general, expectation states theory is meant to explain the way that interpersonal status hierarchies work (Berger et al., 1974).
_	Texts such as "Guns, Germs, and Steel" suggest that early advances in plant agriculture and husbandry fundamentally shifted the way that collective groups of individuals, and eventually societies, developed.
_	EDL supporters expressed criticism of the perceived ruthless entrepreneurship of Muslims, including the way that they profited off of the white working-class through charging high prices in their shops, also alleging that Muslims regularly avoided paying tax and that they always helped other Muslims get ahead of the white British population.
_	These gases changed the way that light from the sun hit the Earth's surface and greenhouse effects trapped heat.
_	In his book "Planet Simpson", author Chris Turner wrote, "when songs spring up one at a time, you might notice a clever line or two, or the way that they serve the same kind of plot-advancing or energy-generating purposes they do in "Singin' in the Rain" or "Cats", but piled together in ["All Singing, All Dancing"], they amount to a sort of Simpsonian side project: "Springfield: The Musical".
_	The former is a mention to the way that the school managed to successfully relocate during after the fire.
_	Butler said: "Going to Haiti for the first time with Régine was the beginning of a major change in the way that I thought about the world.
_	This legal change formalized Mapuche slavery that was already occurring at the time, with captured Mapuches being treated as property in the way that they were bought and sold among the Spanish.
_	Not only about this church of Scientology, which everybody's fascinated with partially because of the celebrities, but partially because of the way that the church seems to turn people to do things that I think they would normally never do if had they not entered the church."
_	Even industrial radiography (including industrial CT scanning) can be used, for example, to inspect internal thread geometry in the way that an optical comparator can inspect external thread geometry.
_	One reviewer noted that the book describes British authority in the way that they ruled.
_	Each Vicinity retail property typically has its own name, such as “The Glen” or “Colonnades” which reflects the way that the local community’s refer to the shopping centre and a logo that contains the Vicinity’ ribbon swirl.
_	Foxy says that death is too easy for her and wants her to suffer the way that Ms. Kathryn made her suffer.
_	It recommended changes to the way that public roads were funded to account for the growing demands of the motor car and road freight, and to ensure that road and rail were evenly regulated and competed fairly.
_	If this is not fully clear from Marx's writings, that is perhaps mainly because he never theorised the sphere of final consumption in any detail, nor the way in which commerce reshapes the way that final consumption takes place.
_	In the early 1970s, Sydney Brenner chose it as a model system for studying the way that genes control development, including neuronal development.
_	From the way that her family members (father, mother, brother and sister) look at her, Agnes is sure that they know her guilty secret—but never talk about it.
_	Grobet studied as a painter in Mexico for some time and then took a trip to Paris in 1968, it changed her life and the way that she viewed the art world.
_	I am, perhaps, not so much interested in the questions of details but on the way that the light is absorbed or reflected by the surface.
_	They were often a simple one-step or two-step and though some movements may have been adapted and integrated into some mainstream popular dances, blues dancing as a distinct dance genre and social practice never became a specific focus for white America in the way that dances such as the Lindy Hop and Charleston have.
_	Within the past decade, more scholarly texts have been openly accessible, which provides an innovative way for students to gain access to textual materials online for free, in the way that many scholarly journals like "Kairos", "Harlot of the Arts", and "Enculturation" are already available through open access.
_	The song is about the effects that Jones' lover has on her, specifically the way that he makes her world turn the wrong way whenever he is around her.
_	The songs received mixed to negative critical reviews and "did not go the way that it was expected".
_	Such children have been termed "", as inspired from the way that dandelions seem to prosper irrespective of soil, sun, drought, or rain.
_	This utopian mindset which held an integrated conception of the goal, the means to produce said goal and an understanding of the way that those means would inevitably be produced through examining social and economic phenomena can be contrasted with scientific socialism, which has been likened to Taylorism.
_	Barkley is energetic and playful, but is not anthropomorphized in the way that Rowlf the Dog and other characters are.
_	MS is more severe in some people than others, most likely from their family genetics and the way that genes are expressed within them.
_	I played the way that he dug, and he said it was groovy."
_	Some aspects of this design are unusual, both in the way that they are executed and in terms of their early date.
_	Their Shiman conspirator concurs that Shimans are intrinsically evil: despite some of them adopting Christianity and wanting to be "good" in the way that humans can be, they have been unable to overcome their violent and cannibalistic urges towards each other and anything else that can be eaten.
_	But I held to the way that I took joy in seeing... and it was not until I arrived in Venice – vulnerable, rotting, splendid Venice — that I finally succumbed to the seductions of color... color bold; color subtle, nuanced; a veritable paint pot of color.
_	While the company wanted to have the game follow on from its other zombie-centered game series, its development team opted to design the game with a more comical view of zombies in the horror genre, particularly in the way that players interacted with the zombies in the game, allowing them to be able to do anything against them in terms of what weapons they could use against them, while they also based the mall upon the stereotypical design of American shopping malls.
_	Huntsman oversaw large tax cuts and advocated reorganizing the way that services were distributed so that the government would not become overwhelmed by the state's fast growing population.
_	I love all the songs on the record, but that was a very magical, musical moment because it was so organic the way that happened."
_	They can be differentiated from other "Aloiampelos" species by the way that the soft, white, hair-like teeth ("=ciliaris") that grow along the margins of the leaves, extend all the way around the stem, at the base of the leaf.
_	This concept follows recent trends that see forms of sustainable business as the preferred method for development, because of the way that these types of businesses offer a positive influence to their environment.
_	The President of Georgia, Mikheil Saakashvili, thanked the hosts for the way that they handled Kumaritashvili's death which included a moment of silence and a tribute to Kumaritashvili at the opening ceremony.
_	The panel was first established in April 2002 when the ICC decided to reform the way that international cricket was umpired.
_	However, the way that Leppard had "realised" (as he termed his orchestrations) the opera was removed from the original work.
_	He attempts to explain that Emily is the way that she is because she was “strongly influenced by her despotic father” making her “eccentric and stubborn".
_	Fischer, "Oír su voz" demands “a reader who doesn’t let himself get seduced by the reality which the world on the surface and the references seem to offer him or, to put it in another way, that he observes what happens above and below the surface: a reader who reads the novel in the way that Pelayo comments with his intellectual friends, as fiction and not as a chronicle…
_	For Aristotle, matter as such can only "receive" actuality from form; it has no activity or actuality in itself, similar to the way that parts as such only have their existence "in" a whole (otherwise they would be independent wholes).
_	The series attempted to revitalize itself, much in the way that rival soap "Knots Landing" had successfully done, but by the beginning of the ninth (and final) season in 1989, Angela, Lance, and Emma were the only three characters from the original first-season cast remaining on the series.
_	It was not until June that the pivotal action of this movement (which ultimately led to its end) occurred and changed the way that indigenous peoples in Ecuador were viewed.
_	Scooters had provided inexpensive transportation for decades before the development of the mod subculture, but the mods stood out in the way that they treated the vehicle as a fashion accessory, expressed through clubs such as the Ace of Herts.
_	The low profitability of the TER system is primarily due to the way that the services are used by the travelling public, with commuter traffic in the morning and evening but significant under-utilisation during the rest of the day.
_	News that, although he first thought the Russian government was behind the posioning, his son's poisoning was "a widely publicized false-flag operation to show the world that Moscow was extremely "cruel," and the way that it allegedly "deals with its enemies."
_	He wrote: "... this is a kind of writing which simply makes you feel very strange; the way that living in the twentieth century makes you feel, if you are a person of a certain sensibility."
_	Drummer Erskine gives a masterclass in elevating the music throughout, in the way that Paul Motian always did, with a distinctively different approach.
_	Clair accepted the inevitability of the talking picture but at first retained very specific views about the way that sound should be integrated into film.
_	This device not only allows for more characters and their perspectives to come to the fore, but also marks a significant transformation in the way that the novels represent the criminal.
_	"It's just a collection of memories and people along the way that had maybe left my consciousness until I heard that music, and then they kind of came dancing back into my consciousness, and out the old pen onto the paper.
_	There are two major theories about the way that the "C9ORF72" mutation causes FTD and/or ALS.
_	In the Gospel of Matthew He says that the way that we're going to be judged at the end of our lives is not what church we prayed in or how we prayed but really ... how we treated the poor."
_	According to one commentary, "this parallels the way that members of fellow NYC noise rockers Sonic Youth began their careers in Branca's ensembles; Thurston Moore of Sonic Youth did play with Chatham as well."
_	From 1 June 2007 the UK introduced changes to the way that VAT is charged on mobile phones and computer chips to help combat fraud.
_	Final results are, in most cases, awarded on the standard British undergraduate degree classification scale, although some universities award something structurally similar to 'Distinction', 'Merit', 'Pass' or 'Fail' as this is often the way that taught postgraduate master's degrees are classified.
_	4) A conflict between what good character is and the way that character education proposes to teach it
_	Kris however was concerned rather to differentiate the way that 'Inspiration -...in which the ego controls the primary process and puts it into its service - needs to be contrasted with the opposite...condition, in which the ego is overwhelmed by the primary process'.
_	HP says that it is possible for memristors to eventually replace transistors in the way that transistors replaced the vacuum tube.
_	No future employer would ever try to "break" a union in the way that Murphy attempted to with the ITGWU.
_	The C. B. Newling Centre is of State research potential for providing an opportunity to investigate the way that an institution during World War Two set out to commemorate the fallen: initially by moving formal ceremonies held in the College auditorium and later by the construction of varied memorials including a gateway, rosemary hedge, Remembrance Book and Honour Rolls.
_	To solve the riddle of economic value, Marx argues, we must investigate the real historical origins of the conditions which give rise to the riddle in the first place, i.e. the real economic history of trade and the way that history has been reflected in human thought.
_	When you see the movie, you're gonna see the uptempo songs and the songs that are remakes in there as they would have sounded in the '80s, but the album is the way that I would make the record now, and the ballads can stand on their own as songs from a Mariah Carey album.
_	Long portrayed as an object lesson in overambition, the Astrographic Catalogue has more recently turned into a lesson in the way that old data can find new uses."
_	She had a rough time growing up with him because he tended to be cold and unloving towards her and she disagreed with the way that he sat back and never really ruled with his heart.
_	There are some fundamental aspects to this revolution, aimed as changing the way that energy is produced, distributed and consumed.
_	Confusion often stems from the way that different forms of English handle agreement with collective nouns.
_	These differ only in the way that the signal is transmitted.
_	Although the way that the uniforms are worn is usually not an issue, some state schools may have regulation on the subject (e.g. height of ties, whether the shirt is tucked in or not), the selection of clothes worn, whether they follow the policy, can be very strict.
_	One story has Dilton Doiley making calculations to scientifically prove that it's impossible for Jughead to eat the way that he does, and even convinces Pop Tate to cook everything Jughead ate earlier to prove it.
_	As pointed out by William Barnes (1801–1886), the date for the start of Temple construction using the Tyrian data is derived "wholly independently" of the way that date is derived using the Scriptural data.
_	People vary in the ways that they grieve and also in the way that they cope.
_	The appearance of Charles Darwin's Origin of Species in 1859 changed the way that taxonomists considered plant classification, incorporating evolutionary information into their schemata.
_	Environmental criminology is the study of crime, criminality, and victimization as they relate, first, to particular places, and secondly, to the way that individuals and organizations shape their activities spatially, and in so doing are in turn influenced by place-based or spatial factors.
_	Goriely and McMillen showed that the physical explanation is complex, involving the way that a loop travels down a tapered filament under tension.
_	The primary difference was the way that the MAJC design required the compiler to avoid "interlocks", pauses in execution while the results of one instruction need to be processed for the next to be able to run.
_	The criteria for seniority, used in this article, are derived from the way that the Father of the House is selected.
_	One of the earlier modern proposals for the Province of Montreal dates from the late 1960s, when it was proposed that "Mr. Montreal", Mayor Jean Drapeau, having many successes, and having Montreal as the economic engine of the Province of Quebec, become the premier of a new province, due to the way that Montreal tax dollars were spent outside of the region, to little benefit to Montrealers.
_	In the bioecological model, in contrast to his earlier models, Bronfenbrenner also includes time (known as the chronosystem in his model) as an important component in the way that people and environments change.
_	Their report suggests that it can improve care for patients and reduce strain on the stretched health service – particularly for people with long-term conditions such as diabetes or Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, but they are concerned that digital technology could increase demand for services, disengage staff and potentially disrupt the way that patients access care.
_	Pattinson, talking about the film, described his character as an astronaut and said, "...he's a criminal who volunteers for a mission toward a black hole, but he realizes along the way that a doctor on board also wants to do sexual experimentation with humans in space."
_	In Swaziland, the government chose not to immediately address the problem in the way that international health agencies advised, so many people died.
_	According to Porter, this "totalization" of physiognomythat is, connecting it to a variety of subjects like reproduction and sense perceptionwas the most dramatic change that occurred in the way that physiognomy was practiced "as it developed in the period between classical Athens and late fifteenth-century Europe".
_	Here Descartes notes that automata are capable of responding to human interactions but argues that such automata cannot respond appropriately to things said in their presence in the way that any human can.
_	He described the story as "a thoroughly wicked yarn full of sly jokes," and complimented the way that the Doctor wasn't in during the first third, calling it a "bold move."
_	She was disappointed in the way that the movie depicted her life and career.
_	Japanese double entendres have a rich history in Japanese entertainment, because of the way that Japanese words can be read to have several different meanings and pronunciations (homographs).
_	As another indicator of the way that the ACTA process was handled by the EU, the Council of Ministers officially adopted ACTA at a meeting of the Fisheries Council.
_	The usurers are to be found sitting on the sand, swatting away fire the way that animals swat bugs, and crying.
_	Keys told MTV News Canada that the song, "is really talking about the way that in relationships, the way that so many things are around you all the time to try to distract you.
_	The opening track, "Move Over", was written by Joplin, reflecting the way that she felt men treated women in relationships.
_	This reflects the way the camera works and how the data is stored in the computer, but it does not correspond to the way that people recognize colour.
_	Higdon said that he is "just really, really disappointed in the way that the plan worked out, as far as my losing Taylor County."
_	Because the Social Security tax was regressive, and Social Security benefits were based on how much each individual had paid into the system, the program would not contribute to income redistribution in the way that some reformers, including Perkins, had hoped.
_	If enterprise A sells a used asset to enterprise B, the valuation errors caused by the way that A and B each report this transaction will cancel out only if an overstatement of A’s reported GFCF is exactly matched by the understatement in B’s reported GFCF.
_	He stressed the role of gender (rather than sexual orientation) in the persecution, and the way that transgender women and "effeminate" men were especially targeted for arrest.
_	The committee's work served to standardize the way that birds are described, identifying them at the subspecies level and using a three-part trinomial name.
_	Minxin Pei said that the way that the PRC government was treating Anastasia Lin was an example of its realism as “they know that people will hold their noses and continue to kowtow to them because they have a big checkbook” and "part of a larger strategy for deterring would-be critics: the proverbial slaughter of the chicken that is killed to frighten all those monkeys.
_	This basic religious orientation should affect the way that the Christian understands things.
_	Depending on the way that the indene and fluorene are connected, five regioisomers can be formed where each regioisomer has unique properties, applications and extent of study.
_	Kenneth decides to show the obituary to Tracy himself, who, far from being pleased, laments the way that his legacy looks on television and declares that he does not want to be remembered the way he is.
_	Reddit has had a history of giving a platform to objectionable but legal content, and in 2011, news media covered the way that jailbait was being shared on the site before the site changed their policies to explicitly ban "suggestive or sexual content featuring minors".
_	Opinions dissented across the Atlantic; some British reviewers did not appreciate the writing in the way that American critics did.
_	He observed by the way that if both parties had fulfilled this duty, Charles would not have lost his head.
_	In a 2002 interview with Taylor, Susan Settlemyre Williams proposed Emily Dickinson, Marianne Moore, and Elizabeth Bishop as possible influences, but Taylor herself acknowledged Edna St. Vincent Millay as the poet she had read enthusiastically as a student, and who had "made me feel that poetry was contemporary and could relate to me right now, in the way that you know that all those wonderful heroines of poetry and heroes do, ...".
_	On performing live, Raposa noted that 'I guess it kind of depends on the mood that I’m in as far as how many people I want to bring out, or the way that I feel about presenting certain things at certain times kind of dictates who is playing and how many of them'.
_	Their second move is then to follow the way that particular religious ideas have shaped and motivated scientific thinking.
_	They describe the way that the development in Greek religious thought of the idea of a divine arche – a source or principle – giving a rational coherence to the universe, influenced Greek scientific thinking for almost a thousand years.
_	She was different than the other dancers of her time period in the way that she was known for being quite the performer.
_	Clayton Purdom of "The A.V. Club" gave the album a positive review stating, "It pretty much all works, in the way that all of YG's music works, anchored by superlative taste and a flow as versatile and reliable as T.I. in his prime."
_	Campbell named the band after a Manchester nightclub called "The Jigsaw Club", but the way that he 'pieced together' the band from other members of existing groups also gave added aptness to the name.
_	It was proposed as a general theory of film semiotics, but has often been used to explore the way that informal digital video production can construct, represent or dramatize the identities of young filmmakers.
_	In a more general sense, Mars also emphasized the importance of the live setting for Phoenix and its relationship to studio work: "I guess we're perfectionists in the way that when we make an album, we know it's going to last.
_	Ryan and Kehew quote Emerick as saying: "I know for a fact that, from the day it came out, "Revolver" changed the way that everyone else made records."
_	These words (“They’ve gone and killed the bitch / but the puppies still remain…”) refer to the way that the spark that began the Revolution created successive movements which were often quite independent of its original impulses and were difficult to bring to heel."
_	The colour of the robes symbolizes the way that the lotus flower grows straight and true through the mud.
_	""Superman Returns" didn't quite work as a film in the way that we wanted it to," Warner Bros.
_	He also criticized the way that the Favelas of Rio de Janeiro are portrayed in the film "Hunger, misery, traffickers?
_	Recorded with an ensemble of early music instruments, it was a completely unique approach to recording English folk music and was to be influential on bands such as Fairport Convention and Steeleye Span in the way that they addressed the traditional folk repertoire.
_	Over time changes were made to the way that the channel is broadcast or received.
_	They are not known nationally for their journalism in the way that (despite much syndication) some city-based newspapers in the USA are (e.g. "The New York Times", "The Washington Post", "The Boston Globe").
_	Adams also applauded the way that Carell's character brings honesty to the final scene in which Michael praises Pam's art and offers to buy it for the office, writing, "The boss should keep his mouth shut more often, but every once in a while, that constant stream of bad jokes, misattributed information, and banalities produces a warm and uplifting sentiment."
_	Compound antennas are made of multiple simple antennas, similar to the way that compound lenses are made of several simple lenses.
_	The Athletics organization began redefining the way that major league baseball teams evaluate player talent.
_	The pressure was heightened by the increasingly prominent environmental movement, which brought attention to the way that business as usual economics did not account for environmental costs, the largest of which, which is in turn connected to many other problems, is human-caused climate change.
_	As more network television channels have moved online in the early 21st century, joining web-native channels like Netflix, MAPs aggregates content the way that MSOs and MVPDs have used cable, and to a lesser extent satellite and IPTV infrastructure.
_	The depiction of Damascus as a "heap of ruins" has been understood as figurative language to describe the despoiling of the city, the leading of its people as captives to Kir (an unidentified city), and the way that the city lost much of its wealth and political influence in the years following Tiglath-Pileser's attack.
_	It is in the way that "Facundo" articulates this opposition that Sarmiento's book has had such a profound influence.
_	Having a little bit more time to work could only benefit the way that we think about making records at this point."
_	The font-size of both tables has been adjusted to 96% and all the information has been centered to ease the reading of every piece, the way that every opus number a, b or c has been marked in gray for the same purpose.
_	The movement would result in a shift in the way that Mexican Americans saw themselves in society.
_	There is a difference in the way that those living in Hokkaido (citizens of Furano included) and those that live in other parts of Japan pronounce the city's name.
_	" just learned along the way that writing comes from living.
_	It is meant in the way that Ayya giving the acts to Hari Gopalan Citar by sitting in the Pathi facing the north direction while Citar face the south.
_	Some devices claim to improve efficiency by changing the way that liquid fuel is converted to vapor.
_	The four men leave the studio, discovering on the way that the artist, Bentley, has cut his own throat with a shard of glass.
_	According to many theories that have gained wide acceptance among anthropologists, culture exhibits the way that humans interpret their biology and their environment.
_	He can be airy and vague on the keys but only in the way that a great jazz pianist can."
_	When she visited London in 2005 she described the way that her tour-de-force ‘Agua de bordes lúbricos' [Water of Jellyfish] operates:
_	I love the way that children change the scenes.
_	So know your intention, know where you're wanting to go with the scene with the way that you want it to go, the momentum shifts, the emphasis, where you want it to be."
_	It is unclear why Philip stood by her in the way that he did.
_	The social aspects in material culture include the social behavior around it: the way that the material is used, shared, talked about, or made.
_	Comstock's silver mines were criticized for the way that their share prices were manipulated on the San Francisco stock exchanges, and for the way that insiders skimmed the profits to the detriment of the common shareholders.
_	This is a reversal of the way that, in the theatre, the opening of curtains brings the viewer into the story.
_	He bemoans the way that, in contrast, avarice has motivated the actions of his successors, and "prophesies" events which occurred after the date in which the poem is set, but before the poem was written:
_	This manifested itself as a contributory factor in the problems of mutiny and piracy, but also in the way that conquests proved ephemeral and were quickly erased by new rebellions or invasions.
_	This can be compared with the way that cricket's Marylebone Cricket Club became the governing body of cricket by default, but later surrendered most of its powers to more representative bodies.
_	The CMI II was a high-level composition tool that not only shaped the sound of the 80s, but the way that music was actually written."
_	Also discussed is the way that corporations abuse copyright laws in order to silence anyone who might attempt to criticize their brand.
_	Mama describes herself as a feminist and not a womanist, arguing that feminism originates in Africa and that white feminism "has never been strong enough to be 'enemy'—in the way that say, global capitalism can be viewed as an enemy".
_	Some Unix-based implementations (CLISP, SBCL) can be used as a scripting language; that is, invoked by the system transparently in the way that a Perl or Unix shell interpreter is.
_	This is part of Swift's overwhelming honesty as a writer: he writes the way that life goes.
_	In response to comment that the expressions in her voice were very varied, Kawada stated that she simply sings with the music in the way that she most enjoys.
_	This theory was revolutionary because it changed the way that everyone thought about species and their distribution around the globe.
_	Though Wegener did not know the mechanism of this concept of Continental Drift, this contribution to the study of biogeography was significant in the way that it shed light on the importance of environmental and geographic similarities or differences as a result of climate and other pressures on the planet.
_	The main variations between drop-hammers is in the way that the hammer is powered; the most common being air and steam hammers.
_	The difference in units is attributed to the difference in the way that blood solutes are measured in the laboratory versus the way they are calculated.
_	The Levey-Jennings chart differs from the Shewhart individuals control chart in the way that sigma, the standard deviation, is estimated.
_	Loose candy is typically sold at kiosks, grocery stores and candy stores in the way that the customer picks up whatever kind, and how much, of candy they want (typically with a scoop) into a bag by themselves.
_	On 7 April 1831, worn down by years of administrative turmoil and political dissensions with both liberal and conservative sides of politics, including an attempt of republican secession, as well as unreconciled with the way that absolutists in Portugal had given to the succession of King John VI, Pedro I went to Portugal to reclaim his daughter's crown, abdicating the Brazilian throne in favor of his five-year-old son and heir (who thus became the Empire's second monarch, with the regnal title of Dom Pedro II).
_	She became interested in the way that small groups function.
_	The GENSO aims to increase the return from educational space missions and changed the way that these missions are managed, dramatically increasing the level of access to orbital educational spacecraft.
_	Her mind still thought in categories and didn't believe in the necessity of a reason for something; she just believed that things simply were the way that they were.
_	Dylan's lyrics have an edge due to the way that "Newsweek" had treated Dylan.
_	Other State Labor MPs were also said to be upset over Brumby's approach to the issue, and in particular, the way that he allegedly rail-roaded the policy through.
_	What is clear is that Georges is not single-minded in his attachment to their affair in the way that Alexandre is.
_	And the way that the instrumentation was decided on was based on what I heard in my head, and what I thought would the best.
_	She denied any intent to infect, apologising profusely and saying "When I was arrested I realised that the way that I had dealt with the illness had been wrong...
_	Furthermore, McCracken found it highly unlikely, as did Gardiner, who had worked with the anti-fascist underground, that so many people would have been used to help Hellman get money to Julia, or that money would be couriered in the way that Hellman said it did as Helllman admitted that Julia received money from the J. P. Morgan Bank.
_	He discusses Guetti's explanation of the way that realistic fiction sustains the illusion of life by directing focus to the imagined world and not to the words that the author used.
_	Ecological literacy and systems thinking implies a recognition of the manner in which all phenomenon are part of networks that define the way that element functions.
_	These accidents often resemble Rube Goldberg devices in the way that small errors of judgment, flaws in technology, and insignificant damages combine to form an emergent disaster.
_	The principle has its roots in the way that capitalism manages its affairs.
_	With the way that 1000BASE-T implements signaling, how the cable is wired is immaterial in actual usage.
_	Music is the area which has the richest influence from the "Kalevala", which is apt considering the way that the folk poetry and songs were originally performed.
_	The primary disadvantage of fluorescence versus radiotracers is a significant biological problem: chemically tagging a molecule with a fluorescent dye radically changes the structure of the molecule, which in turn can radically change the way that molecule interacts with other molecules.
_	He rallied to hit .306 the rest of the way that season, but played just one more year before ending his career in .
_	Pilates demands intense focus, the way that exercises are done is more important than the exercises themselves.
_	The dialect here is often thought to be a window into the past, with various claims being made that it is either a pocket of Elizabethan English which survived or the way that the Scots-Irish-origin people that make up a large fraction of the population there would have spoken.
_	A more realistic comparison is the way that people in North America would have spoken in the Colonial period.
_	The research on possible selves, which includes positive or negative views of the self in the future, explains that the way that youth think of themselves in the future can guide and determine current behavior.
_	According to Ferling, Adams's political philosophy was "out of step" with the way that the country was heading, as America tended further away from Adams's views of order and the rule of law and towards Jeffersonian ideas about liberty and weak central government.
_	The gadget, Smith explained, was important because it "defined the way that Walter works.
_	Plant cells have a number of features that distinguish them from cells of animals, and which lead to major differences in the way that plant life behaves and responds differently from animal life.
_	She feels that her Balinese heritage has affected her work less in its appearance than in the way that art 'is embedded in life- which is what public art does- and the idea of working together with people [...]
_	The third step is analysis of possible solutions where the possibility of each solution is seen as the way that can if it really can help to solve the problem.
_	The concept of Unschooling means the student learns according to the way that person wants for specific reasons and choice.
_	For various reasons, collecting data on the way that Syrian hamsters develop this lung cancer provides insight on how humans develop it.
_	This is because there is not a lot of energy lost when the transfer of heat from the heating apparatus to the water occurs, unlike traditional fire heated boilers where there is a substantial amount of energy loss because of the way that the flames must be kept lit and healthy.
_	The two ended up together and Fe eventually realized that there’s someone who can love her the way that she is.
_	The controlling effects can be seen in the way that CHV1 virus helps to control the damage that chestnut blight, "Cryphonectria parasitica", does to American chestnut trees, and in the way that bacteriophages can limit bacterial infections.
_	As Poland is a very centralised state, regional law enforcement agencies do not exist in the way that they do in the United States, Canada, Germany or the United Kingdom.
_	Kaz and Oliver would often work on various injured superheroes while having some misadventures along the way that would involve encounters with various supervillains.
_	Sometimes this inequality takes the form of neocolonialism, which manifests in the way that First World or Western feminists talk about women from the Third World, creating a binary of Us vs.
_	In acoustic terms, the interest that vibrato adds to the sound has to do with the way that the overtone mix (or tone color, or timbre) and the directional pattern of sound projection change with changes in pitch.
_	The play by Roy Williams is often called "The Superman Play" because of the way that Williams resembled Superman flying through the air with his arms stretched out at Chris Simms when he hit him.
_	Gill: "All the people are political prisoners in the way that they are prisoners of the system in which they are born".
_	On the interplay between design and fabrication methods, she said "the assumption that parts are made from single materials and fulfill predetermined functions is deeply rooted in design... [and] enforced by the way that industrial supply chains work.
_	Also, the gel did not release liquid water the way that fiber-based absorbents do.
_	Barbash is critical of the way that Foster failed to acknowledge the success of Samuel Gompers in establishing trade unions capable of withstanding the pressures of economic depression and his tendency to vilify his opponents as practitioners of "deliberate deception," calling them "ultra-reactionary, misleaders, and betrayers."
_	What distinguishes the call as being to a library function, versus being to another function in the same program, is the way that the code is organized in the system.
_	Duckworth argued that Austen followed Edmund Burke, who in his 1790 book "Reflections on the Revolution in France" had used the metaphor of an estate that represented the work of generations, and which could be only be improved, never altered, for the way that society ought to work.
_	After the protest ended, the government did announce a freeze on fuel duties, and promised changes would be made to the way that goods vehicles were taxed, which would include the taxing of foreign vehicles operating on British roads.
_	There is more research into the damage done by "irresponsible media reports" than into the protective effects of positive stories, but when newspapers refuse to publicize suicide events or change the way that they provide information about suicide events, the risk of copycat suicides declines.
_	Father Smith wrote, "A wise and very human monk once said to me that the things between God and us can be truthfully spoken about only in the way that friends talk to friends.
_	Lisa Delpit explores the way that power works in the classroom, shaped by varied socioeconomic and cultural conditions of students and teachers, results in alienation and miscommunication in the classroom that she terms the “silenced dialogue."
_	"That song -- the last one I wrote for the record -- is definitely the most representative of me now, the way that I feel.
_	Akin to the way that POU homeodomain
_	On the other hand, some people who hold social determinism theory assert technology is neutral, but it is the way that humans manipulate technology which brings about its social impact.
_	"Martin Scorsese Is Really Quite a Jovial Fellow" deals with the dark and often depressing nature of Scorsese's subjects and the way that a normally happy or perky person would also be quite depressed after watching one of his films.
_	There is no limited edition ("L12 Bong") version of this single in the way that most other Depeche Mode singles have been.
_	Paramount changed the way that individual episodes were funded, with overspending on some episode budgets allowed on the proviso that it would be recouped by a reduction in others.
_	However, no action was taken by McKay to change the way that Lee was running correlation.
_	In 2001, Greenberg published his scathing indictment of the way that the United States government spent money on science in "Science, Money, and Politics," which received broad notice.
_	As well as the creation of food aid and the way that food aid functions.
_	She seems to have embodied a blessed death; the "Suda" connects her name to the figure of speech "be gone to blessedness," instead of misery or damnation, which may be euphemistic, in the way that the dead are referred to as "the blessed ones."
_	It is not known if the Anglo-Saxons had a specific name for the game or if they generically referred to it as "tæfl" in the way that modern people might refer to "cards".
_	Susan Austin, writing in "GreenLeft", describes Buckman's section on national parks as "a little dry and detailed" but approves the way that, throughout the book, "time and time again Buckman exposes the 'development at all costs' attitudes of present and past state and federal governments".
_	All Von Neumann architecture systems, which includes the vast majority of general purpose computers today, can implicitly be described as homoiconic due to the way that raw machine code executes in memory, the data type being bytes in memory.
_	An editorial in Lancet Oncology criticized the way that information about the drug was released.
_	You can kind of see them start to fade to gray, and you wish you had them back the way that they used to be".
_	They have the responsibility for a patient’s in-hospital care, similar to the way that primary care physicians are responsible for outpatient care.
_	"Shimmer" is beautiful in the way that a collapsing building is; more beautiful, because throughout it you can cling to the hope that the building will somehow put itself back together."
_	Inherently, the way that people (and therefore taxpayer and voters) perceive decisions and outcomes will be influenced by their process of mental accounting.
_	He also describes the way that entities will be allowed in or out in the future.
_	A statutory subscription right was granted to entitled shareholders in the way that new shares could be offered through VEM Bank AG at a ratio of 2:1 for a subscription price of EUR 10.00 per share.
_	Like "Human Experience", this work stands out for its emphasis on the way that the important dimensions of our experience are embodied in the most basic material dimensions of our lives—everyday "things" and basic bodily practices—and this work thus offers a new metaphysics of "the thing" and of reality in general, arguing that issues of metaphysics cannot be separated from issues of ethics.
_	This working group then drafted the 24 Santiago Principles, to set out a common global set of international standards regarding transparency, independence, and accountability in the way that SWFs operate.
_	"Solera" means "on the ground" in Spanish, and it refers to the lower level of the set of barrels or other containers used in the process; the liquid (traditionally transferred from barrel to barrel, top to bottom, the oldest mixtures being in the barrel right "on the ground"), although the containers in today's process are not necessarily stacked physically in the way that this implies, but merely carefully labeled.
_	There have been plenty of cliffhangers deployed over four seasons, and plenty of things that were surprising as they've occurred, but it's not a show that relies on huge narrative twists to keep going in the way that shows like "Scandal" or "Empire" do on a weekly basis.
_	In particular it explores the way that he is subjected to a huge amount of security as a result of his position (he is held in a house overridden by police surveillance and lives in fear of terrorist violence from the left-wing underground) and the effect that this has on him and his family - his wife, Kathe, his daughter Sabine, and his sons Herbert and Rolf.
_	He wrote ""The Simpsons" has always been great about addressing/mocking the way that out culture treats the elderly."
_	It was rumored that Taj was displeased with the way that his signature frame was holding up after Hoffman Bikes moved their manufacturing overseas, and that he didn't want his name attached to something that he felt was of substandard quality.
_	He was shocked by the way that the artists with a reputation of decent and intelligent people behaved themselves when they faced with the fact that one of them would have to give up the garage.
_	Arthur, drawing a sword from a stone in the way that King Arthur did.
_	The result was ‘No Stone Unturned’ – a report with a national scope that included 89 recommendations by Lord Heseltine and focused on the way that changes in Government organisation and funding could be beneficial to driving localised growth, particularly in the cities.
_	The date is also very adventurous in the way that neither party knows what to expect and whether or not they will hit it off.
_	He theorizes that people tend to naturally give love in the way that they prefer to receive love, and better communication between couples can be accomplished when one can demonstrate caring to the other person in the love language the recipient understands.
_	As a lover of dance and music, and someone who believed that the human form is the greatest of all works of art, Rhee wondered what it would be like to add music to the choreographed body movements of Tae Kwon Do, similar to the way that music is used in Olympic skating, ballroom dancing, and gymnastic floor exercise routines.
_	These damages affect the way that the tube resonates.
_	Cross-cultural psychology as a discipline examines the way that human behavior is different and/or similar across different cultures.
_	One aim of Marx's theory is to explain how the nature of the market economy itself shapes the way that people will perceive it.
_	An attempt to introduce an 'upgrade' that was not fully accepted by GM management for a number of reasons including the way that it was promoted internally and cost.
_	Snowball is a variation of the swing dance that gets its name from the way that it gathers dancers.
_	The article also points out that the trend of Internet-related suicide pacts is changing the way that mental-health workers need to deal with depressed and/or suicidal young people, advising that it is "prudent for clinicians to ask routinely if young people have been accessing Internet sites, obtaining suicide information from such sites, and talking in suicide chat rooms".
_	It was said that the people of Ely, the closest town, were very saddened by her death, but happy that she died in the way that she wanted to.
_	Other cam site rules might prohibit working in a public place so that the model does not get a public indecency arrest, the way that Kendra Sunderland was charged after her 2014 performance inside the Oregon State University Library.
_	Some financial commentators and regulators have expressed concern about the way that CFDs are marketed at new and inexperienced traders by the CFD providers.
_	In particular the way that the potential gains are advertised in a way that may not fully explain the risks involved.
_	A significant focus of this regional task force is to work with the LASD Human Trafficking Unit to change the way that child survivors are handled and by focusing on the fact that they are victims not criminals.
_	What's different about this vaccine is the way that response is being created.
_	Pienaar said, "I was very fortunate to go to the School of Excellence 2000, to be able to polish the technique and the talent that God gave me and to learn how to use it in the way that God had wanted me to."
_	Her colleagues on the show all felt that her conduct was inappropriate and failed to support Le'Andria in the way that she had expected they would.
_	Each of these societies based the foundation of their society on that of the one which preceded it (much in the way that many aspects of Roman culture were borrowed from the Greeks).
_	The large chain-scythe that Kamatari uses exists in real life, but Watsuki made the blade larger to give it "a real super-impact look" and noted that it is not intended to be used in the way that Kamatari does.
_	All of these are defined in a specific biological way, which is not necessarily the same as the way that they are commonly used.
_	Chicano ideas often were similar to the ideas of those who were fighting anti-colonial struggles in the way that both groups fight against a rhetoric or culture of dominance.
_	Also importantly, Elaine Fuchs and her team have conducted research on the way that cancer stem cells interact with their microenvironments.
_	"Place" refers to the way that a product physically reaches the consumer – where the service or item is sold; it also includes the distribution channels in which the company uses to get products or services to market.
_	These "bolt-on" modifications alter the way that the engine flows, often causing the air to fuel ratio to change.
_	Since its inception, AvMA has provided advice and support to over 100,000 people affected by medical accidents, and succeeded in bringing about massive changes to the way that the legal system deals with clinical negligence and in moving patient safety higher up the agenda in the UK.
_	This can be scary for the child because they don’t necessarily understand why they act and think the way that they do.
_	Elena Georgieva (, 15 March 1930 – 10 January 2007) was a Bulgarian linguist whose work on Bulgarian syntax revolutionized the way that the Bulgarian language was studied by proposing that the word order was determined by the functional perspective of the subject and its theme.
_	They were great in the way that Elizabeth Bishop's poems were great, or Thom Gunn's or Philip Larkin's.
_	They were great in the way that tells us what poetry used to be, and is, and will be."
_	However, because of dissatisfaction with the way that Chairman Paul Skretting was handling negotiations with the municipality, six of the seven board members resigned, and were replaced, shortly before Christmas 2009.
_	When compared with other voting methods, the question of how to fill vacancies which occur under STV can be difficult given the way that results depend upon transfers from multiple candidates.
_	[...] the way that Stefan died — so suddenly, so forcefully, so without one last goodbye — felt oddly more final than the little death tour Damon gets to do here."
_	Several theories have been proposed as to the way that such associations hold rights.
_	Don and Betty’s marriage hits another rocky road when it comes to the way that Bobby should be disciplined.
_	In today's market all major manufacturers offer a Stepless box which will be branded by the manufacturer individually; however most operators will refer to it as a "Vario" much in the way that most vacuum cleaners are referred to as a "Hoover".
_	By turning toward Albert and Isabella (taking the position of the sun), the sunflower symbolizes the way that the arts were able to grow and blossom in the light and warmth of princely patronage.
_	Most Minnesotans were generally supportive of Ritchie, the canvassing board, and the way that election and recount were handled, as shown by polls taken at the time and statements from public figures, including Republicans such as Governor Tim Pawlenty and previous Secretary of State Mary Kiffmeyer.
_	In addition, Snyder overturns the way that individual regimes are often analyzed as operating alone and absent influence from outside.
_	He wasn’t a boisterous or flamboyant character in the way that Tim was.
_	One reviewer of the site observed, “With its unparalleled ability to connect people throughout the world, [the Internet] is changing the way that many people learn languages.
_	In 2004 the CEP participated in the English Constitutional Convention, a project which members hoped would encourage debate on the way that England should be governed.
_	Their words and confessions were written down exactly in the way that they are included here by the notaries whose names are listed below, in the presence of witnesses [also] listed below.
_	Writing in 2015, Paola Maria Caleff considered this usage a fad, but noted that people talking the way that they write was a consequence of computer-mediated communication.
_	This increased survivorship of the alloparent's young has been linked to the dilution effect, and the way that the geometry of the interspecific school is manipulated such that the cichlid young are forced to the periphery, where they are more vulnerable to predation.
_	This openness results in a “non-necessary belongingness” for the various elements of a given social formation, or an indeterminacy to the way that history, culture, economics or the material world, and social actors come together to form dominant notions.
_	a simplified and standardized way to access unstructured content across all vendors would increase the adoption of ECM products, but only if the standard could remain compatible with existing deployed systems, much the way that ODBC Open Database Connectivity did for the relational database market in the 1990s.
_	Like that genus their gills have a cloudy/speckled/mottled appearance due to the way that their spores ripen unevenly in spots, but they are distinguished because the spores are ornamented while those of "Panaeolus" (in the restricted sense) are smooth.
_	More recently, there has discussion in the Indonesian media about the way that the development of the Sangiran site has failed to bring any significant tangible benefits to the rural communities in the local area.
_	Its lyrics discuss the way that love and passion can turn abruptly into recklessness, described by "The Guardian" as a "theatrical interpretation of intimacy and romance."
_	By the end of the 1970s and 1980s, most of the Golden Age animators had retired or died, and their younger successors were ready to change the industry and the way that animation was perceived.
_	"I Surrender" was written "three or four years ago", however, McKinnon didn't like the original version he wrote, "but I always really loved it" so he later "got it finished in the way that I wanted it to be".
_	To understand how these changes are impacting our personal and social spaces, I have focused on a study of information processing, and the way that memory functions to locate the individual within their world.'
_	In April, 2015 voters approved an amendment to the state constitution that changed the way that the chief justice of the Supreme Court was selected.
_	The process of activation and binding in eukaryotes is different from bacteria in the way that specific DNA elements bind the factors for a functional pre-initiation complex.
_	Because a felt sense is a living interaction in the world, it is not relative in the way that concepts are.
_	Roberts chose the title to define his role in the organization, and didn't intend the designation to proliferate across the corporate world in the way that it has.
_	However, marketers use ethnographic research to study the consumer in terms of cultural trends, lifestyle factors, attitudes and the way that social context influences product selection, consumption and usage.
_	The fur trade did not involve barter in the way that most people presuppose, but were a credit/debit relationship when a fur trader would arrive in a community in the summer or fall, hand out various goods to the Indians who would pay him back in the spring with the furs from the animals they had killed over the winter; in the interim, there much further exchanges, which often involved both Indian men and women.
_	Food webs are also complex in the way that they change in scale, seasonally, and geographically.
_	An ideal can be used to construct a quotient ring similarly to the way that, in group theory, a normal subgroup can be used to construct a quotient group.
_	They influence the way that Camilla and her peers (specifically Luisa and Frank) view love and family.
_	They get their name from the way that viruses propagate.
_	Mongolians do not use surnames in the way that most Westerners, Chinese or Japanese do.
_	This was most likely the way that they were introduced to California: agricultural inspection stations have reported finding mussels on the hulls or motor compartments of at least 19 trailered boats arriving into the state.
_	In a way analogous to how the personhood theory imagines privacy as some essential part of being an individual, the intimacy theory imagines privacy to be an essential part of the way that humans have strengthened or intimate relationships with other humans.
_	Also, the way that the mechanical linkages were arranged that connected the regulator control from the driving trailer was somewhat unreliable in that there was play in the system that prevented the regulator from being opened fully.
_	Dana Walden, the CEO of the 20th Century Fox Television, said in an August 2018 interview in regards to the Apu controversy that the network trusts the showrunners "to handle it in the way that’s best for the show".
_	Ebert gave it two stars, saying the film was marked by a "quiet sadness" and the "film examines the way that naive idealists took on more than they could handle."
_	A further source of confusion lies in the way that the Archimedean solids are defined, again with different interpretations appearing.
_	He discussed the way that personality works and how it can change over time when a person is presented with new situational circumstances.
_	Khan himself stated that he was raised in the way that a handshake was too intimate, but didn't mean to disrespect women, and also noted that politics was not the right field for him.
_	He also noted that the Doctor did not talk as much as Curtis had written and recommended Curtis watch some episodes to see he was "rather efficient in the way that he talked".
_	While this is a musical commentary, it is also a commentary on the amount of decoration and frippery put on the stage, on the way that Handel's operas concentrated on their stories and music rather than their theatrical effects.
_	He considered that the way that astronomers once thought that God ordered the movement of individual planets was comparable to individual creation of species in particular countries, but divine powers were "much more simple & sublime" in creating the first animals so that species then arose by "the fixed laws of generation".
_	The National Weather Service was criticized for not employing its higher-resolution forecast models the way that its European counterpart did.
_	Because the variability of this disease is so great and the way that it reveals itself could be multi-faceted; once diagnosed, a multidisciplinary team is recommended to treat the disease and should include a craniofacial surgeon, ophthalmologist, pediatrician, pediatric urologist, cardiologist, pulmonologist, speech pathologist, and a medical geneticist.
_	Operation Banquet was never put into effect in the way that was originally intended but was periodically exercised under various guises.
_	The term is commonly used to refer to cases in which an individual, having observed a body movement, unintentionally performs a similar body movement or alters the way that a body movement is performed.
_	Ozaki was greatly upset at the way that the police tolerated these killings.
_	In line with a general trend for schools to listen more to the views of students, the concept of "student voice" at King's Manor was used to allow students to help review the way that houses and subjects operated and how teaching and learning was delivered.
_	Adolescents also are changing cognitively by the way that they think about social matters.
_	Adolescent egocentrism governs the way that adolescents think about social matters, and is the heightened self-consciousness in them as they are, which is reflected in their sense of personal uniqueness and invincibility.
_	Tiptree is writing about a girl who is masking her appearance in order to be successful which is eerily similar to the way that masking her image is for the same reason.
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine of AllMusic writes ""Special One is never embarrassing, the way that some of the group's late-'80s efforts are to their core audience, but it never delivers the goods, either, and it's hard to hear the group strain to reach the idealized heights that their fans believe they once reached effortlessly."
_	The Rietveld Schröder House is an excellent example of the way that the "modern" lives of the family demanded a new architecture.
_	In his portrait "The Mulatress" (1924), Motley features a "mulatto" sitter who is very poised and elegant in the way that "the octoroon girl" is.
_	Finding out along the way that although some are nice, there are others who are not so kind, meaning Purple, Gray and Aqua are frequently forced to protect Kaya whilst struggling to keep their secret identities hidden from the rest of the world.
_	"Harper"'s film critic, Lee Siegel, believes that the film's recurring motif is the Christmas tree, because it symbolizes the way that "Compared with the everyday reality of sex and emotion, our fantasies of gratification are [...] pompous and solemn in the extreme [...]
_	This is also signified by the way that "from the face of the earth" forms an "inclusio" around , hearkening back to how the phrase is used in the Genesis flood narrative in , , , where it also connotes an undoing of creation.
_	He also was familiar with the way that complementary colors, such as red and green, strengthened each other when they were placed next to each other.
_	Hence the novel cannot portray what was learnt by the experience and findings of the 1938 dig, and how that helped the 1939 discovery to unfold in the way that it did.
_	Others believe that the sound is produced by the friction of grain against grain that have been coated with dried salt, in a way that is analogous to the way that the rosin on the bow produces sounds from a violin string.
_	The same method has also been used to detect planets around stars, in the way that the movement's measurement determines the planet's orbital period, while the resulting radial-velocity amplitude allows the calculation of the lower bound on a planet's mass using the binary mass function.
_	Others have applauded the way that Canadian Jainism promotes a more casteless modern interpretation of the religion.
_	In Chapter 89, Ishmael expounds the concept of the fast-fish and the loose-fish, which gives right of ownership to those who take possession of an abandoned fish or ship, and observes that the British Empire took possession of American Indian lands in colonial times in just the way that whalers take possession of an unclaimed whale.
_	In 1874 her studies led her to advocate a change in the way that nurses were trained.
_	Everyone makes different choices along the way that define that road and I think with these three characters, everyone has a distinct, separate path."
_	As a consequence, internal organs are moved closer together and out of their original positions in a way similar to the way that a pregnant woman's expanding uterus causes the organs to be displaced.
_	It's a record that changed the way that people thought about putting music together.
_	This is given credence by the fact that Mihalka gave his seal of approval to this release, and a written introduction by him precedes the beginning of the special edition DVD, stating that this version was the way that the film was meant to be seen.
_	However, Dutch campaigners for a "Yes" vote appealed to the electorate to avoid damaging the Netherlands' standing in Europe in the way that the French result was perceived, in some quarters, to have weakened the position of France.
_	When the strength of the structure is considered the acts of ship collision are considered in the way that the ships structure is altered.
_	Oliass makes the argument that Jünger's argument is non-topical for the time period, claiming, "It doesn't appear that technology replaces nature of man the way that Jünger thinks.
_	Zab has the same abilities I have, but Zab still has to put it together and do it the way that Zab knows how to do it."
_	Ono also said that in the way that he had challenged her late husband's legacy, McCartney had placed himself in the role of the envious Antonio Salieri to Lennon's Mozart.
_	Morales has explained that he is no longer involved with the discipline due to the way that it has changed over the years.
_	Shirky has pioneered the notion of a "cognitive surplus", to describe the way that time spent on the internet can have an increasing social value.
_	Israel's catcher Ryan Lavarnway noted after the win: "two generations ago, the way that this team was put together would have meant that we were being killed...
_	In order to get into the male psyche, they spend a day at Walthamstow Stadium dog track and subsequently decide to invent six rules of fashion for men based on the way that the betting information is arranged.
_	This device not only allows for more characters and their perspectives to come to the fore, but also marks a significant transformation in the way that the novels represent the criminal.
_	However, the most important use of the dominant seventh chord in musical composition is the way that the introduction of a non-diatonic dominant seventh chord (sometimes called a "chromatic" seventh), which is borrowed from another key, can allow the composer to modulate to that other key.
_	He went on to talk about the principle of parental choice, saying there are "two competing rights in a state-funded school system: people’s right to choose to have their children educated in the way that they wish, and the right of [other] taxpayers who live near state-funded schools to have some ability to access them despite the over-representation of people from the faith that the system allows."
_	Robin Pierson of The TV Critic also gave it a mixed review, criticizing the writers for using the character of Herbert and the episode's musical moment which he called an "un-amusing waste of time", although he did praise the way that the episode satirized the "Star Wars universe"; he ended his review by saying that "Chances are the more you like "Star Wars", the more you will enjoy this.
_	Decisions of the UKIPO, made by senior Hearing Officers, are not binding on the UKIPO in the way that judgments of the Courts are.
_	There isn't much to him, really—he's just a smiling Johnny one-note with a secret hip-hop dance move—and so we start to react to him the way that Alice does to everything else: by wondering when he's going to stop making nonsense."
_	But this was not the way that the Catholic community viewed the situation, especially following so closely the dismissal of Simmons.
_	The album received mainly positive reviews from critics; for instance, Doug Freeman praised the way that "McCauley's caustic growl gets softened by the smoother tenors of Goldsmith and Vasquez."
_	And that's probably just the way that fans would want it."
_	She questions the Buffalo Soldiers' treatment of the Native Americans and the way that "we changed, made necessary readjustments to our gods and belief systems to accommodate the Christianity thrust upon us as our salvation." (p. 54).
_	It seeks to change the way that markets work, so that poor people are included in the benefits of growth and economic development.
_	This was shown through its first publication (ACT), its official recognition by the church, and the way that CFM groups from other cities were able to communicate with each other.
_	That was the idea and that's the way that the writers took it."
_	In his memoirs "Die Nigger Die!" (1969), H. Rap Brown writes that the children he grew up with employed the Dozens to kill time and stave off boredom, in the way that whites might play Scrabble.
_	There is significant autonomy and differentiation in the way that Street Law is taught nationally in the U.S. and globally, and Street Law expressly encourages law schools and law students to experiment with different teaching methodologies to account for different learning styles depending on age, culture, regional and state differences, and so on.
_	No one else but God could ever love me and accept me for who I am the way that He can.
_	Sprague later commented by admitting that he had made a great deal of money, but not in the way that Carter portrayed it.
_	Now, the way that I would say that and the way that I would feel that kind of pain is a lot different."
_	Also of note is the way that tanks are best deployed, massed and concentrated, which prevents their dispersion for safety and for screening.
_	It is said that Bhaṭṭoji Dīkṣita, the author of the Siddhanta Kaumudi, on hearing about Bhattathiri, set out for Kerala to meet him, but had to return disappointed on hearing on the way that Bhattathiri had died.
_	Precalculus prepares students for calculus somewhat differently from the way that pre-algebra prepares students for algebra.
_	Doctor Jim Swire, whose 23-year-old daughter Flora was killed in the Lockerbie bombing, said "I don't believe for a moment that this man was involved in the way that he was found to have been involved.
_	His discussion of the poem focuses on the way that it fits into the history of English literature and its use of common motifs and techniques.
_	It accounts for the way that racism and the long-lasting political, economic, and cultural effects of colonialism affect non-white, non-Western women in the postcolonial world.
_	He claims to learn a lot about a man by the way that he plays golf.
_	Itō was especially critical of the way that most Japanese people automatically deferred to the state and accepted the claim that the emperor was a god who had to be obeyed unconditionally, leading her to complain that it was very difficult to get most people to think critically.
_	This suggests that the satellite virus could perform horizontal gene transfer between viruses, paralleling the way that bacteriophages ferry genes between bacteria."
_	Historians have questioned why India did not undergo industrialisation in the nineteenth century in the way that Britain did.
_	In a manner similar to the way that the US Strategic Defense Initiative impacted the economy of the Soviet Union during the Cold War, the threat of the Cold Start doctrine and the increase in the Indian defence budget from $24 billion to $40 billion between 2007 and 2009 both apparently prompted the Pakistan government to increase its defence budget sharply to 32% of their federal government's net revenue receipts, further increasing the strain on that country's already-tenuous economy.
_	Since they shared a universal human nature, was not civilization their entitlement," he is speaking of the way that the novel was cited by anti-slavery forces in the 1760s, not the 1690s, and Southerne's dramatic adaptation is significantly responsible for this change of focus.
_	This is due to the way that state labels are paired with transition labels to form the input/output pairs.
_	However, corporations are not considered living entities in the way that humans are.
_	For example, in a manner analogous to the way that one obtains a multiple soliton solution of the KdV from the single soliton solution (which can be found from Lie's notion of point symmetry), one can obtain a multiple Kerr object solution, but unfortunately, this has some features which make it physically implausible.
_	The technique is essentially classic ballet (in the way that Americans employ it) and to make the whole ballet a declarative statement—open, positive, inventive, joyous (rather than introspective)—a parade; a presentation; perhaps elegant, witty, tender and with a sure technique.
_	The video went viral with over 6 million views, and started conversations about the way that rape victims in India are treated in the media and by law enforcement.
_	In probability theory and statistics, the Conway–Maxwell–binomial (CMB) distribution is a three parameter discrete probability distribution that generalises the binomial distribution in an analogous manner to the way that the Conway–Maxwell–Poisson distribution generalises the Poisson distribution.
_	In response to the way that Wicca was increasingly portrayed as trendy, eclectic, and influenced by the New Age movement, many Witches turned to the pre-Gardnerian origins of the Craft, and to the traditions of his rivals like Cardell and Cochrane, describing themselves as following "Traditional Witchcraft".
_	What remained unexplained for Müller and his readers was the way that a "heightened sensitivity to the upheavals of modernity, a turbocharged vitality, and possibly even genius religiosity, alongside a number of liberal convictions, could go hand in hand with a brazenly populist ideology.
_	I believe that this news must be published as soon as possible (you gentlemen shall do it in the way that you judge to be more satisfactory) in order to prevent the formation of parties that would be a great evil for our country.
_	In one episode, they explored the way that a new Baskin-Robbins ice cream flavor was developed by creating the Apricot Marmalade flavor (to match the "AM" initials).
_	The Catechism of the Catholic Church states that sacramentals such as the Brown Scapular "do not confer the grace of the Holy Spirit in the way that the sacraments do, but by the Church's prayer, they prepare us to receive grace and dispose us to cooperate with it."
_	This new web standard changes the way that users are affected by the internet and their privacy on the internet.
_	PCA works in the way that principal components with larger possible variance are preserved while discarding low variance components.
_	Because to me, being an artist you should -- for my method, I'm not saying all artists, but in the way that I try to produce art, and that’s part of the reason I do live stuff too -- you should try to be egalitarian about it, you should try and reach as many people as possible.
_	Jean-Marc Lofficier and Randy Lofficier, co-authors of the book, "The Pocket Essential Tintin", described Hergé's depiction of Castafiore in the story as "a force of nature", praising the way that he depicted her many outfit changes.
_	There’s nothing shy about the way that we sound and the way we put ourselves out there.
_	Surprise represents the difference between expectations and reality, the gap between our assumptions and expectations about worldly events and the way that those events actually turn out.
_	Metal Hammer seconded this opinion noting the way that "those theoretically disparate stylistic stands combine to create something that thrums with vitality and a laudable devotion to making music that impresses and resonates".
_	Acrylic being a synthetic polymer material, it does not break down by natural weathering the way that a cement, sand, and lime mixture will, persisting in the natural environment for centuries as synthetic chemical compounds that have unknown long-term effects on ecosystems.
_	However, Grandison is never challenged in the way that Clarissa is, and he is a static, passive character.
_	It deals with not only the economic impacts that hyperinflation had upon society in the Weimar Republic, but also the way that society itself changed.
_	When Bérenger declares his love for Daisy, it is a sign that he still retains his humanity, despite the way that others mocked him for believing in love.
_	Regarding their importance, major media outlets such as the BBC have stated: "it’s the way that [WFANFC and The Longcut, another British music group] have distilled Manchester’s history into an exciting future brew that makes them important."
_	The concept of strobogrammatic numbers is not neatly expressible algebraically, the way that the concept of repunits is, or even the concept of palindromic numbers.
_	Linda España-Maram ("The Western Historical Quarterly") wrote that the work was "significant in the way that Vergara unpacks questions related to socioeconomic standing".
_	It differs only in the way that castling and "en passant" tags are used.
_	The work represents the end product of research into the way that a library affected the lives of political prisoners between 1972 and 1995.
_	"I was amazed at the way that the Report program tried to destroy the image of a great Italian company like Inalca of Modena…
_	Despite his disdain towards the way that the issue was being attended, Fernós attempted to harmonize the local and federal processes.
_	I think the book really helped them come to understand what was wrong with the system in the way that any number of treatises could never do, because it was popular art, because it was told from a child's point of view."
_	In 1921, the Metre Convention was extended to include all physical units, including the ampere and others thereby enabling the CGPM to address inconsistencies in the way that the metric system had been used.
_	The song is a testament to the way that music can instantly trigger a memory that was seemingly forgotten.
_	"There are certain songs along the way that are milestones – that define a writer to themselves.
_	Indeed, Sharon was the only person who truly viewed Den in a softened light, and certainly she did not seem to see him in the way that Angie, Chrissie or Dennis did – something which became a source of contention between Sharon and Dennis, the latter seeing more plainly the darker, manipulative side to Den.
_	Fullerton's book, "Jane Austen and Crime" (2004), explores Austen's childhood fascination with crime and the way that crime and punishment affected her life.
_	West focused on Carell's acting, explaining that "the way that Michael's desire to boast and his healthy fear of offending Jan played out on Steve Carell's face was fantastic.
_	It is regarded as having changed the way that photographers look at sports, having shown the power of capturing a moment of reaction.
_	In the case that this gradual progression is true, it would have implications both on the way that workers-organizations and their like are perceived both by those who hope for mass communes to be a reality and those who do not.
_	Blending Christian and pre-Columbian symbolism is part of the way that Barraza reshapes the traditional narrative of history.
_	He was interested in exploring the way that the body and mind influence technical creativity, understanding needs and cultural meaning in the creation of products, and incorporating functional, aesthetic and humanistic concerns in design.
_	Another criticism of Swift's use of misogyny delves into Gulliver's repeated use of the word 'nauseous,' and the way that Gulliver is fighting his emasculation by commenting on how he thinks the women of Brobdingnag are disgusting.
_	His views are reflected in the structure of the IB Diploma Programme, in the way that it incorporates elements such as the Extended Essay, the CAS programme, and Theory of Knowledge: the student is required to do independent research, to participate in meaningful tasks outside the immediate school community to benefit society, and to develop a concrete image on the nature of knowledge that he comes across in his studies.
_	Correspondence and pilgrims were the way that Shoghi Effendi conveyed his messages.
_	The film demonstrates the power of compassion and individual kindness, particularly in the way that John's simple act of defending Linda during her childhood was such a profound moment in her life.
_	This is because the loose ligaments cannot support the arch in the way that they should.
_	To begin with, peer governance is a new mode of governance and bottom-up mode of participative decision-making that is being experimented in peer projects, such as Wikipedia and FLOSS; thus peer governance is the way that peer production, the process in which common value is produced, is managed.
_	The criteria for seniority, used in this article, are derived from the way that the Father of the House is selected.
_	The backplate and wing differs from the jacket style primarily in the way that the functions required of a BCD (attachment to diver, buoyancy control and attachment to cylinder(s)) are performed by distinct components, rather than a single unit.
_	Although "not extremely complex or technically impressive in the way that many other launch titles strive to be" Turner believed the graphics were "extremely well-realized and perfectly suited to the game."
_	However, the new Klungkung kingdom proved unable to wield power over Bali in the way that its predecessor in Gelgel had done.
_	For him, the sense of an expression in language describes a certain state of affairs in the world, namely, the way that some object is presented.
_	In order to try to change the way that people digest music, we had to take a leap of faith," says Royce.
_	Unhappy with the way that OverLord was running the Vicious Circle, two of its seemingly minor members joined forces to try and claim power for themselves.
_	The music video was described on the way that "reflects the melancholy and solitude that expresses the song's lyrics".
_	During the meeting, Goldring and Thomson made a full and unqualified apology for the way that Oxfam had responded to the behaviour of some of their staff in Haiti.
_	These events lead to greater labor difficulties, fan disaffection, skyrocketing prices, changes in the way that the game is played, and problems with the use of performance-enhancing substances like steroids tainting the race for records.
_	It is assumed that she is very similar to Charlie in the way that she believed in Anna's ways and fought/rebelled against her parents.
_	Combined with the regional approach to planning, the diverse and multicultural nature of the Canadian population has led to some challenges in the way that planning is conducted in Canada.
_	Instead, he says that what is needed is an artificial brain to create real intelligence, “much in the way that an artificial heart is used to create a real heartbeat.
_	These agreements, along with the section 41(2) of the Act, can govern the way that unpublished material can be accessed and used.
_	This contact is not as common, but is compatible with the 4-pin connector in the way that a towing vehicle with this connector can be connected to a trailer with the 4-pin flat plug.
_	Arendt was also critical of the way that some Jewish leaders, notably M. C. Rumkowski, acted during the Holocaust, which she described as a moral catastrophe.
_	In the course of doing the music, that phrase crossed my mind, so then you go back and say, 'OK, I like the way that phrase, Lean On Me, sounds with this song.'"
_	Organisations continuously face environments in which uncertainty is constantly challenging the existing ways of doing business and the way that risk needs to be managed.
_	GPX1 forms a highly reactive selenenic acid intermediate, providing insight into the way that the protein environment stabilizes these intermediates and paving the way for new therapeutics.
_	Together, the rules changes and the new protective equipment transformed the catcher's defensive role to the way that it is presently played.
_	Hogg was very gentle when discussing this with his stepdaughter, hoping to avoid treating her the way that Timothy Shelley had treated Percy Shelley years earlier, but Mary Shelley thought that Hogg took much too passive a stance.
_	The players hold the instrument in a distinct manner similar to the way that citole players were shown to hold their instruments, resting the instrument on the playing arm, and bringing their forearm and wrist to the strings from underneath the body of the instrument.
_	According to Sforno, Abraham's servant did not make what he said a sign whereby he might recognize Isaac's destined wife, because that would be divination; rather he prayed that it might occur the way that he described.
_	Now was the time for Safmarine to get into the container business which was starting to change the way that cargo was transported all round the world.
_	For example, Miller noted that critics rarely "identify catchy melodies as specific passages within a song", in the way that working musicians might discuss "the A-minor in the second measure of the chorus".
_	Uses the Central Park jogger, sensational 1989 New York City rape case, to examine racial tensions in New York, and the way that the city's fabric of corruption (incorporated by its founding fathers) is obscured and sustained by a sentimentality for the narratives it tells about itself, whether they are true or not.
_	What sets "Warzone" apart from other games in the genre is the way that each objective is used.
_	Lexical access is the way that an individual accesses the information in the mental lexicon.
_	We have serious concerns about the way that such editing affects the neutrality and reliability of Wikipedia."
_	These themes come together in a very compassionate discussion of the way that individual people, rich and poor, are pushed to compromise themselves as they try to navigate a near-chaotic transitional society."
_	Simply holding a spoon by its neck and rapidly tilting it back and forth can create the illusion that the spoon is bending, due to the way that the human eye perceives the rocking motion.
_	He also reiterated that he and Bush had continued to try to find a way to avert war, "As it happened, we weren't able to do that because – as I think was very clear – there was no way that Saddam Hussein was ever going to change the way that he worked, or the way that he acted,".
_	An obvious feature in photographs is the way that the wing roots tapered so as to "reduce" in thickness, designed to increase lateral control at low speeds.
_	An additional change in the way that reclamation projects were funded came in 1922 with passage of Hayden's legislation authorizing revenues from sale of hydroelectric power to be credited to repayment of project debts.
_	In it he expresses his dismay at the way that the North looks down upon The South.
_	Kahlo holds the scissors with one hand menacingly close to her genitals, which can be interpreted as a threat to Rivera whose frequent unfaithfulness infuriated her and/or a threat to harm her own body like she has attacked her own hair, a sign of the way that women often project their fury against others onto themselves.
_	He is like a tragic hero in the way that he longs for Susana and is totally unable to get over her death.
_	It involves some elements of classical tragedy — "noble" characters and the audience's foreknowledge of Thomasina's death — but the predominant element is comedy, in the way that the characters interact with each other and in their witty, epigrammatic dialogue.
_	It is similar in concept to the fission-fragment rocket in that the fission by-products are directly harnessed as working mass, and differs primarily in the way that the fragments are used for thrust.
_	But there's so much to appreciate along the way that it's a real page-turner."
_	Many get their endowments who are not worthy and this is the way that devils are made."
_	He added that he does not believe homosexuality inhibits the talents of the players and that everyone should be free to live their personal lives the way that they want to.
_	The topography of the area is typical of the sort of site chosen for early ecclesiastical establishments and the building of chapels or churches on pagan sites is a classic example of the way that Christianity supplanted pagan beliefs and practices.
_	Overall, cryogenic processors are radically changing the way that cryogenics used to be done.
_	After escaping to Kenya, he fell in love with hip hop in the way that it identified issues being faced by the neighbourhood, which he was able to identify with in a unique manner.
_	Worth noting is the way that the Dörrebach percolates into the ground along its eastern stretch, beginning under the bridge at the Weinbergerhof inn.
_	That story relates the way that they were named as follows:
_	Its connections have been summarized as "it seems not to be interconnected with ‘downstream’ areas in the way that other prefrontal areas are.
_	Also called sometimes Church of the Christ of the Travelers is a religious building of the Catholic Church in the way that communicates to the city of Barcelona, capital of the Anzoátegui State with the locality of Píritu, both in the metropolitan area of Barcelona, to the northwest of the country South American country of Venezuela.
_	Which gave me a whole different look again ... which really changed the way that my photography looked."
_	Hobsbawm analyses the Revolution, primarily from the perspective of how it has been subsequently interpreted over the course of the two centuries since it occurred, and examines the way that it has been re-written based on contemporary ideologies.
_	Whitney was often upfront in the way that she wrote.
_	Most of the clergy who signed are Protestant, an artifact of the way that people were originally invited to sign the letter.
_	It was built over "Suntur Wasi", which was an Inca ceremonial building adjoining the palace of Viracocha, in a similar way to the way that the Cathedral is now adjoined to the earlier "Iglesia del Triunfo".
_	Badawi was a fierce critic of socialism, particularly the way that the ideology was adopted by Egypt and Syria.
_	Hans Rosenfeldt confirmed that Bodnia had left the show because Bodnia was not happy about the way that his on-screen character was evolving.
_	In India, the caste system affected the way that women's liberation was approached in that gender and class could rarely be separated.
_	The campaign highlights the way that violence against women is taking new forms through the use of ICT.
_	Afraid, perhaps, to toy with viewers the way that "Lost" did, "Fringe" keeps the action moving, rapidly unspooling its mysteries, and that decision proves to be a wise one.
_	In a 1995 interview, Gardner said, "I was amazed at the way that silly little song was picked up by the whole country."
_	Those campaigns do not stress cultural or ethnic identity in the way that the UFW did, but have linked immigrant workers' struggles with the political interests of Mexican-Americans in many communities, such as Los Angeles.
_	He also expressed excitement in the doors opened by the previous season's cliffhanger, seeing the arrival of Montgomery (Walsh) as "certainly speaking to the show's focus on relationships over the nuts and bolts of being a surgeon", while praising Rhimes for continuing to "merge those disparate elements in the way that does, or at least should be a source of enthusiasm for both men and women, creating an atmosphere both professional and intimately personal, often at the same time".
_	But it is important to seek an understanding of the way that groups separate power from power, thus "magic" often describes an art or practices that are much more specific.
_	In a piece produced by CNBC which indicates that their own interview questions for Sophia were heavily rewritten by her creators, Geortzel responds to the Hanson quote by susggesting Hanson means Sophia is "alive" in the way that, to a sculptor, a piece of sculpture becomes "alive" in the sculptor's eyes as the work nears completion.
_	Ke also derided the way that Vietnamese employees of the French colonial system squabbled among themselves over their personal status and standing.
_	Despite the popularity of its great classics the I Ching and the Tao Te Ching, the specific practices of Taoism have not been promulgated in America with much success; these religions are not ubiquitous worldwide in the way that adherents of bigger world religions are, and they remain primarily an ethnic religion.
_	The newsboys' strike of 1899 was a U.S. youth-led campaign to force change in the way that Joseph Pulitzer and William Randolph Hearst's newspapers compensated their child labor force of newspaper hawkers.
_	Folio 6 contains multiple diagrams of birds flying and their bone structure, and all of the commentary is on flight and how birds fly the way that they do.
_	Flint has a major part in the 1924 prequel "Porto Bello Gold", by A. D. Howden Smith, which depicts the way that the treasure was captured from a Spanish galleon.
_	In another review published in November 2016 by "Dakota Student" website, author Breanna Roen says that she has never seen the way that this book, "The Absolutely True Diary of a Part-Time Indian", conveys so much happiness, love, and grief.
_	Different discourses have shaped the way that sustainable development is approached, and as time goes on women have become more integrated in shaping these ideas.
_	Current programs include providing ACPs with discretionary direct 24-hour access to PCI labs, bypassing the emergency department, and representing a fundamental change in both the way that patients with S-T segment elevation myocardial infarctions (STEMI) are treated, but also profoundly affecting survival rates.
_	He was critical of the way that midwives and obstetricians treated women and his work was summarized in a paper in the "Lancet" in 1960.
_	In 2010, "EastEnders" came under criticism from the police for the way that they were portrayed during the "Who Killed Archie?" storyline.
_	He describes the way that radically depleted fisheries were evaluated by experts who used the state of the fishery at the start of their careers as the baseline, rather than the fishery in its untouched state.
_	For the Society’s estimated 11,300 members, this mutual status means that they are able to challenge and change the way that the business operates and shape the future of the Society.
_	And the way that Caesar and the others are kept alive is through writing, through history, and in some senses through Shakespeare himself.
_	in the way that the laws of gravitation and electrical attraction have.
_	But if I play an instrument that is now a part of me, and do it according to the way that feels right for me ... I'll always be an original".
_	Dr Harold Priestley's book "Plaistow Sec: The Story of a School" credits this to Miss M "Maggie" Lamb, MA, an English teacher who joined the school in 1927 and who translated it as "Not to what end, but how" (also translated as "Not by whom but in what manner"), in other words the end does not justify the means or (colloquially) ""It ain't what you do it's the way that you do it"".
_	The campaign targeted John Lewis and Currys, criticising the way that such retailers attempt to sell expensive cables with their new televisions and computers, and accusing them of a campaign of "deliberate misinformation" with regard to this issue.
_	The lyrics "tell of the struggles of life and love and the obstacles in the way that we attempt to dodge."
_	Another is that species do not differ much in their structural genes, such as those coding for enzymes; what does differ is the way that gene expression is regulated by the toolkit genes.
_	Object relations theory has also pointed to the way that underdoing defences means the patient "experiencing" their underlying conflicts more fully, and reacting negatively to that.
_	It refers to the cutting of existing solid shapes into different forms; it is used as a metaphor for the way that famous people (singers, actors. etc.) are often 'shaped' by the demands of fame.
_	These reforms helped to centralize the financial industry and shaped the way that the public understood money, the economy, and culture.
_	I have never seen it done since in the way that we did it.
_	Dependency grammars do not acknowledge phrasal categories in the way that phrase structure grammars do.
_	Because Hyakutake was at its brightest for only a few days, it did not have time to permeate the public imagination in the way that Comet Hale–Bopp did the following year.
_	It humorously criticised the way that functionality of vehicles at the time was always put above aesthetics, much to Crosby’s disappointment.
_	He has published important National Academies reports: the "National Science Education Standards" (NSES; NRC, 1996), intended to change the way that science is taught K-12, and "Inquiry and the National Science Education Standards" (NRC, 2000)
_	Similar to the way that electromagnetic fields are determined using charges and currents via Maxwell's equations, the EFE are used to determine the spacetime geometry resulting from the presence of mass–energy and linear momentum, that is, they determine the metric tensor of spacetime for a given arrangement of stress–energy in the spacetime.
_	Tobias shows very little affection to his wife except in the way that he reinforces her thoughts, giving her assurances, for instance, that she, of all people, should not worry about going mad.
_	This second declaration is hidden from Internet Explorer for Windows by exploiting other bugs in the way that it parses CSS rules.
_	The transitions on the album in particular are something to behold, such as the way that the title track opens like a wound and gives way to the massive, crawling "Serpentskin," or the way the ecstatic violence of "Nigredo" shudders, hunches and splits into "Schisma."
_	McCartney himself commented that he loved the way that Durband cut down the stories to expose their most basic themes, therefore simplifying them so as to be easily understood.
_	Loomis and Brackett head to the Strode home, with Brackett explaining along the way that Laurie is really Michael's baby sister, having been adopted by the Strodes following their mother's suicide.
_	You've gotta tell the story the way that it happened to you and the way that you experienced it.
_	The biggest change has been in the respect given to female athletes and the way that female athletes are thought about.
_	To confront the way that our acts cannot be undone is to meet the Absolute in its temporal necessity.
_	Their lyrics are in English and for the most part explore the human psyche and the way that everyday events can affect a person psychologically, hence the band's slogan:
_	The Court ultimately ruled in favor of Arizona, however they agreed with the way that California interpreted that it got surplus water was correct and so there was essentially some compromise on both sides.
_	Artist Neil Goodman, who curated an Indiana University show of this work, described the paintings as “both troubling and enticing, yet beautiful in the way that only visual language can embrace a paradox.
_	Such arguments may have some plausibility, but if they are examined in fine detail, it is clear that a whole series of different arguments are actually being made about the way that falling profitability is connected to economic slumps.
_	"An Essay on the Shaking Palsy" described the characteristic resting tremor, abnormal posture and gait, paralysis and diminished muscle strength, and the way that the disease progresses over time.
_	Wiley's younger brother, Cadell, was unimpressed with the way that Stormzy had used the same instrumental as his sibling but turned it into something marketable.
_	He was describing the passage about the path you choose in your life, and the way that you live your life as the art of dying.
_	Sometimes it’s just the way that you treat your life that determines your destiny."
_	Through solid parish welfare services, the Church of Sweden Abroad gains trust and is able to serve its members in the way that it should.
_	SLOC measures are somewhat controversial, particularly in the way that they are sometimes misused.
_	She asserts that her attempt to change the way that people like her are viewed "is a long fight.
_	Hayes' analysis also noted issues with the way that bankruptcy and debt-shifting are addressed.
_	This proposition of sexual selection readily tied into his theory of natural selection in the way that evolution will have different outcomes depending on the traits of the suitor the females chooses to reproduce with.
_	Various critics praised the way that the game's storyline ties cohesively with the missions, allowing for better and more involving gameplay.
_	Both Carruthers and Cooper reflect on the way that Chaucer's Wife of Bath does not behave as society dictates in any of her marriages.
_	According to his 1917 obituary, a sculpture of the Twelve Apostles was also included, and the event was widely reported at the time, with Hems making much of the way that he had made the Twelve Apostles pay his income tax.
_	She expressed criticism of the American health system in an interview in May 2010 while at the Sydney Writers' Festival in Australia, in which she said she was "exasperated with the way that medical matters were run in my country" and considers that she is taking "my life in my hands.
_	The key feature to this approach is that the "researcher is there to learn from the respondent rather than impose an external frame of reference, epitomized in Spradely's (1979: 34) representation of the researcher's posture as being that 'I want to know what you know in the way that you know it...Will you become my teacher and help me understand?'".
_	It is a corset-like device designed for the neck instead of the waist, but usually it is not used to compress the neck in the way that a normal corset compresses the waist, except in breathplay.
_	Clays can be categorized depending on the way that tetrahedral and octahedral sheets are packaged into "layers".
_	The difference between the two models then lies in the way that the symmetry is broken, generating different particles that may or may not be important at low scales and accessible by current experiments.
_	In 1971 Pamela Gradon used "The Assembly of Gods" as an example in her discussion of the way that late medieval literature relied on shallow, static visual images and contrasts it directly with the depth and immediacy of the characters in the "Psychomachia" and the depth of meaning of the beasts in the opening of Dante’s "Divine Comedy" (62-63).
_	She also compares the way that the poem uses visual representations to "The Romance of the Rose" and Dante’s "Purgatorio" (369-373).
_	Carey also notes how this change in the perception of space changed the way that people thought.
_	While his works have often been compared to those from other key figures of the pop art movement, such as Andy Warhol and Roy Lichtenstein, Rosenquist’s pieces were unique in the way that they often employed elements of surrealism using fragments of advertisements and cultural imagery to emphasize the overwhelming nature of ads.
_	By late 1915, the General Staff and the Minister of Defence, Senator George Pearce, had become concerned by the way that the Australian Intermediate Base and the AIF training depot in Egypt were being run.
_	Because their linguistic distance to it is greater, they do not mesh with Standard German the way that High German dialects (such as Bavarian, Swabian, Hessian) can.
_	When Adams and Hussey tired of the way that the Sisters of Mercy worked, they left and together they formed The Mission (initially the Sisterhood).
_	"What negates a good comparison and a bad comparison is not really the artist they mention, it's in the way that their face looks when they say it," said Guarisco.
_	Also, the way that Harold has changed represents how America has been changed from the war.
_	He subsequently operated the Memory as a schoolship, along similar lines to the way that the Thalatta would later be employed.
_	In their book "Defining Visual Rhetorics", Charles Hill and Margeurite Helmers discuss the revision of the symbolism of the towers upon their destruction: "Strong national symbols such as the eagle and the flag are liberally in use in the popular and mass media as a means of gathering together the imagined national community, and to these patriotic and sentimental images the twin towers of the World Trade Center have been added in the way that the red poppy came to symbolize the First World War."
_	LTP is the way that connections between neurons and synapses are strengthened.
_	However, it is possible that different structures may be involved in the pain experience of other animals in the way that, for example, crustacean decapods have vision despite lacking a human visual cortex.
_	Gurdjieff argued that many of the existing forms of religious and spiritual tradition on Earth had lost connection with their original meaning and vitality and so could no longer serve humanity in the way that had been intended at their inception.
_	Of course, none of these things has happened, even though "Flast" has not previously been expanded in the way that respondents urge.
_	Furthermore, he argues that the "hipster is defined by a lack of authenticity, by a sense of lateness to the scene" or the way that they transform the situation into a "self-conscious scene, something others can scrutinize and exploit".
_	The party has since slightly changed its focus; it now hopes to force changes to the way that British Columbia is governed within Canada.
_	The season did not start the way that trainer Berger had hoped.
_	She has been inspired by the theories of French architect and urban planner Jean Renaudie, as well as the way that towns were planned in the Middle Ages, the Renaissance and the Baroque period.
_	He criticized that adjustments to character mechanics were "generally no more than tweaks, and as such are a little uninspiring", with a few exceptions including "wizards that cast offensive spells at two levels beyond their ability, and wizards that gain intelligence-determined spell bonuses in the way that clerics gain wisdom bonuses".
_	Dearlove stated that, "For ISIS to be able to surge into the Sunni areas of Iraq in the way that it has done recently has to be the consequence of substantial and sustained funding."
_	These countries may differ in the way that the cabinet is used or established.
_	Aquino possessed a PhD in political science and this formal education was reflected in the way that he presented his arguments, in which he draws broadly upon Western philosophy and science.
_	For its part, the Society of Jesus made the decision at the first General Congregation held after the restoration to keep the organization of the Society the way that it had been before the suppression was ordered in 1773.
_	The cunningham differs from a typical downhaul in the way that it attaches to the sail.
_	It was later revealed during an argument between Leyla and Alicia that Justin was unhappy with the way that Alicia treated her sister because their son Jacob (Joe-Warren Plant) was actually Leyla's son.
_	"Dana Loesch, I want you to know that we will support your two children in the way that you will not," González said at the town hall.
_	The BBC's official historian of the Proms later wrote, "Davis never really identified himself with the Proms in the way that Sargent had done.
_	One of the more common attachments was a ball screw or ball puller, which was literally just a screw that could be screwed into the lead ball to remove it if it had become jammed in the barrel, similar to the way that a corkscrew is used to remove a wine cork.
_	It differs from the other summer camps in the way that the whole camp is a campaign and every mission is part of a bigger picture.
_	In April 2015, Heaton posted an open letter online expressing frustration with her label adding that she wasn't proud of her "Bad Intentions" EP that had dropped seven months prior, "They wanted me to change the way that I looked, the way that I acted, the way I sang, the words I wrote, who I was as an artist, but also who I was as a person.
_	Amtrak calculates this in a way which is not equivalent to the way that it determines the costs of other train services, and most of the Acela's costs for using track and fuel are paid for by Silver Service long distance trains, according to TRAINS Magazine's Fred Frailey.
_	This is evident not only in its surreal humour, but in the way that elements of one routine are threaded through subsequent scenes, transcending the stand-alone sketch form - a tactic subsequently favoured by the Python team"; and "Empire" magazine called it "Sublime slapstick surrealism."
_	To achieve a high level of play, speedrunners often have to reason about the game differently from the way that ordinary players might.
_	Sorrow, the way that record might have sounded if the Pretty Things had roots closer to the Beatles than the Rolling Stones.
_	Keys revealed the inspiration behind the song during one of her live performances while on tour, stating, "Some things don't always work out the way that you wish that they would, but [...] you have to give it a try, and at the very least, I have a song for that too."
_	Since the post-war expansion of Dublin city, Phibsborough along with Glasnevin and Drumcondra provided amenities to the north city business district in the way that Ranelagh, Rathmines and Harold's Cross did to the south city.
_	In Spring that year, Guy set out to return to Greece, receiving news on the way that William II had been defeated by Michael VIII Palaeologus at the Battle of Pelagonia and taken prisoner.
_	The typical Real-Time Delphi process can be described in the way that participants get access to an online questionnaire portal for a certain time frame, within which they are allowed to log in and log out as often as they want.
_	With age, however, Tetrazzini's middle register filled out to some extent; and the way that her mid-voice sounded, even when she was younger, does not seem to have troubled the ears of Mediterranean critics, going by their written record.
_	The SPE's core message is not that a psychological simulation of prison life is the same as the real thing, or that prisoners and guards always or even usually behave the way that they did in the SPE.
_	He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race.
_	She was positive of the level of violence the series depicted, and all of its "brutal" and "beautiful" fight sequences, as well as the way that the series explores the consequences of the films on average people, while committing to building its own universe within the already established MCU.
_	He oversaw tax cuts and advocated reorganizing the way that services were distributed so that the government would not become overwhelmed by the state's fast growing population.
